We are drawn to behaviors that earn us respect, approval, admiration, and status. We want to be the one in the gym who can do muscleups or the musician who can play the hardest chord progressions or the parent with the most accomplished children because these things separate us from the crowd. Once we fit in, we start looking for ways to stand out.
“The stress response produces a predictable set of physiological changes, including increased heart rate and blood pressure, rapid breathing, dilated pupils, a sudden increase of blood flow to the extremities, slowed digestion, and increased perspiration”
“How can we distinguish what is biologically determined from what people merely try to justify through biological myths? A good rule of thumb is ‘Biology enables, Culture forbids.’ Biology is willing to tolerate a very wide spectrum of possibilities. It’s culture that obliges people to realise some possibilities while forbidding others”
“Unlike lying, an imagined reality is something that everyone believes in, and as long as this communal belief persists, the imagined reality exerts force in the world”
What we’re really talking about here—when we’re discussing immediate rewards—is the ending of a behavior. The ending of any experience is vital because we tend to remember it more than other phases. You want the ending of your habit to be satisfying. The
Ignoring what goes on in other people's souls-no one ever came to grief that way. But if you won't keep track of what your own soul's doing, how can you not be unhappy?
“A wealthy man in ancient Egypt would never have dreamed of solving a relationship crisis by taking his wife on holiday to Babylon. Instead, he might have built for her the sumptuous tomb she had always wanted.”
When setting expectations, no matter what has been said or written, if substandard performance is accepted and no one is held accountable—if there are no consequences—that poor performance becomes the new standard. Therefore, leaders must enforce standards. (Location 802)
as often as possible, the new world of onshore skeleton crews can benefit from a person who knows how to lead people and projects but can also roll up their sleeves and fix some last-minute critical bugs while the offshore team is sleeping. The same is true of a software architect who could perhaps dramatically speed up progress on a project if he or she would only write some code to get things moving. When it comes to hierarchical boundary crossing, it’s most often not reluctance that stops people from doing it. It’s ability. Programmer geeks can’t lead, and leaders can’t hack. It’s rare to find someone who’s even decent at both.
“Let go of concerns about what others are thinking: People who have panic attacks often believe that everyone is looking at them or that they’ll somehow embarrass themselves. If you feel symptoms of panic, try not to let your cortex guess what other people may be thinking.”
yet am afraid to tamper with such dignity.
“never imagine that because the master loves you, you can do anything you want. Entire books could be written about favorites who fell out of favor by taking their status for granted, for daring to outshine.”
realized that the SEALs in Charlie Platoon who suffered the worst combat fatigue, whose attitudes grew progressively more negative as the months of heavy combat wore on, who most questioned the level of risk we were taking on operations—they all had the least ownership of the planning for each operation. (Location 3027)
“Realizing that your amygdala stores emotional memories that your cortex has no knowledge of can help you better understand some of your emotional reactions”
Life progresses in a cycle of choice-consequence-choice.
Perhaps it’s time for you to take a temporary break from pursuing goals to find the knots in the garden hose that, once removed, will make everything else better and easier? It’s incredible what can happen when you stop driving with the emergency brake on. (Location 7412)
“the most important finding of all is that happiness does not really depend on objective conditions of either wealth, health or even community. Rather, it depends on the correlation between objective conditions and subjective expectations. If you want a bullock-cart and get a bullock-cart, you are content. If you want a brand-new Ferrari and get only a second-hand Fiat you feel deprived. This is why winning the lottery has, over time, the same impact on people’s happiness as a debilitating car accident. When things improve, expectations balloon, and consequently even dramatic improvements in objective conditions can leave us dissatisfied”
The goal of the Five Whys is to land on a “what” or “how”.
What we’re really talking about here—when we’re discussing immediate rewards—is the ending of a behavior. The ending of any experience is vital because we tend to remember it more than other phases.
“Consider two teenagers waiting for their driver’s exams to be scored. Jose sat worrying about whether he’d passed, doubting his answers, and imagining being told that he couldn’t get his license. Meanwhile, Ricardo’s father joked around with him after he took his exam, which kept Ricardo from focusing on possibly failing. Thanks to his father’s distracting antics, Ricardo didn’t think about potential negative outcomes. As it turned out, both passed the test, but only Jose had endured a stressful, anxious waiting period. When people change their thoughts, they may be able to prevent cortex-based processes from contributing to their anxiety”
Across all guests, the most common answer to this question is some variation of “It’s all going to be alright.” (Location 9510)
You don't want to block your thoughts, emotions, and so on; nor do you want to chase after them. If you chase after them, if you let them lead you, they begin to define you, and you lose your ability to respond openly and spontaneously in the present moment. On the other hand, if you attempt to block your thoughts, your mind can become quite tight and small.
The human mind wants to “win” whatever game is being played. This pitfall is evident in many areas of life. We focus on working long hours instead of getting meaningful work done. We care more about getting ten thousand steps than we do about being healthy. We teach for standardized tests instead of emphasizing learning, curiosity, and critical thinking. In short, we optimize for what we measure. When we choose the wrong measurement, we get the wrong behavior.
“The foragers’ secret of success, which protected them from starvation and malnutrition, was their varied diet. Farmers tend to eat a very limited and unbalanced diet. Especially in premodern times, most of the calories feeding an agricultural population came from a single crop – such as wheat, potatoes or rice – that lacks some of the vitamins, minerals and other nutritional materials humans need. The typical peasant in traditional China ate rice for breakfast, rice for lunch, and rice for dinner. If she were lucky, she could expect to eat the same on the following day. By contrast, ancient foragers regularly ate dozens of different foodstuffs. The peasant’s ancient ancestor, the forager, may have eaten berries and mushrooms for breakfast; fruits, snails and turtle for lunch; and rabbit steak with wild onions for dinner. Tomorrows menu might have been completely different. This variety ensured that the ancient foragers received all the necessary nutrients”
and certain understanding of the enemy’s actions or (Location 3368)
Obstacles make us emotional, but the only way we’ll survive or overcome them is by keeping those emotions in check—if we can keep steady no matter what happens, no matter how much external events may fluctuate
Luxury, to me, is feeling unrushed. No hurry, no pause. (Location 9709)
Before you begin work, always ask yourself, “Is this task in the top 20 percent of my activities or in the bottom 80 percent?”
“To blame someone for not understanding you fully is deeply unfair because, first of all, we don’t understand ourselves, and even if we do understand ourselves, we have such a hard time communicating ourselves to other people. Therefore, to be furious and enraged and bitter that people don’t get all of who we are is a really a cruel piece of immaturity.” (Location 7983)
“Under no circumstances should you listen to people who tell you that it’s all in your head or you should just get over it. Panic attacks are caused by an overreaction of the amygdala. They’re a biological reality, and you can’t reason yourself out of them using your cortex”
“To me, the definition of success is being cool with your parents, your grandparents [if still alive], and your kids. Being able to navigate the difficult task of dealing with each other as human beings.” (Location 7329)
“THE PURPOSE OF LIFE IS A LIFE OF PURPOSE.” (Location 7180)
Had we succumbed to the pressure, Chris would have put a large caliber round into an American soldier, almost certainly killing him. (Location 3353)
This discrepancy between evolutionary success and individual suffering is perhaps the most important lesson we can draw from the Agricultural Revolution. When we study the narrative of plants such as wheat and maize, maybe the purely evolutionary perspective makes sense. Yet in the case of animals such as cattle, sheep and Sapiens, each with a complex world of sensations and emotions, we have to consider how evolutionary success translates into individual experience.”
isn't rooted in arrogance or pride. We'll realize that we're always shel- tered, always safe, and always home.
“To understand amygdala-based anxiety, it’s useful to think of the amygdala as your protector. Natural selection has given humans a fear-producing amygdala that has protection as a central goal. As you go about your day, the amygdala is vigilant for anything that might indicate potential harm”
great man who uses earthenware dishes as if they were silver; but he is equally great who uses silver as if it were earthenware. It is the sign of an unstable mind not to be able to endure riches.
His willingness to take responsibility-and blame for both.
“Of course I am happy here! It’s wonderful! Especially when I have no choice!”
Concentrate every minute like a Roman-like a man-on doing what's in front of you with precise and genuine seriousness, tenderly, willingly, with justice. And on freeing yourself from all other distractions. Yes, you can-if you do everything as if it were the last thing you were doing in your life, and stop being aimless, stop lete ting your emotions override what mind tells you, stop being your hypocritical, self-centered, irritable.
“As a leader, you want to be seen—you need to be seen—as decisive, and willing to make tough choices. The outcome may be uncertain, but you have enough understanding and information to make a decision,” (Location 3465)
Bitter yesterdays create a better tomorrow because of the maturity gained out of those experiences. When bad things happen to good people, they become better people.
If we never learn to take something apart, test our assumptions about it, and reconstruct it, we end up bound by what other people tell us—trapped in the way things have always been done. When the environment changes, we just continue as if things were the same, making costly mistakes along the way.
If you truly want to discover a lasting sense of peace and content- ment, you need to learn to rest your mind. Only by resting the mind can its innate qualities be revealed. The simplest way to clear water obscured by mud and other sediments is to allow the water to grow still. In the same way, if you allow the mind to come to rest, ignorance,
Most inventors and engineers I’ve met are like me—they’re shy and they live in their heads. They’re almost like artists. In fact, the very best of them are artists. And artists work best alone—best outside of corporate environments, best where they can control an invention’s design without a lot of other people designing it for marketing or some other committee. I don’t believe anything really revolutionary has ever been invented by committee. Because the committee would never agree on it!
No matter how exhausted from an operation or how busy planning for the next mission, time is made for this debrief because lives and future mission success depend on it. (Location 2749)
you had a gun to your head or contracted some horrible disease, and you had to limit work to 2 hours per week, what would you do to keep things afloat?” (Location 9594)
Indifference to superficial honors.
learn at a fairly young age is the skill of being an ultra-thrifty, (Location 7775)
And it is true that everywhere dangers and difficulties are exaggerated by the local people, if only as a good excuse for extortion or malingering: one must go oneself to know the truth.
“You cry, I’m suffering severe pain! Are you then relieved from feeling it, if you bear it in an unmanly way?” (Location 557)
“Extreme Ownership—good leadership—is contagious,” (Location 865)
“What enables banks – and the entire economy – to survive and flourish is our trust in the future. This trust is the sole backing for most of the money in the world.”
The term “Rodriguez list” has come to mean writing down all of your assets and building a film around the list. (Location 10101)
The punch line is clear: people who make a specific plan for when and where they will perform a new habit are more likely to follow through.
Once a habit has been established, however, it’s important to continue to advance in small ways. These little improvements and new challenges keep you engaged. And if you hit the Goldilocks Zone just right, you can achieve a flow state.
Perhaps she knows better than to think at all, but goes simply about the business of survival, like the wolf; survival is her way of meditation.
The more you ritualize the beginning of a process, the more likely it becomes that you can slip into the state of deep focus that is required to do great things.
“To practice diaphragmatic breathing, sit comfortably and place one hand on your chest and the other on your stomach. Take a deep breath and see which part of your body expands. Effective diaphragmatic breathing will cause your stomach to expand as you inhale and retract as you exhale. Your chest shouldn’t move much at all”
without micromanagement from the top. (Location 2485)
The primary indication, to my thinking, of a well-ordered mind is a man’s ability to remain in one place and linger in his own company.
The brain’s tendency to prioritize the present moment means you can’t rely on good intentions. When you make a plan—to lose weight, write a book, or learn a language—you are actually making plans for your future self.
On why women are given less importance. Just a theory. “A woman, on the other hand, had no problem finding a man willing to impregnate her. However, if she wanted her children to provide her with grandchildren, she needed to carry them in her womb for nine arduous months, and then nurture them for years. During that time she had fewer opportunities to obtain food, and required a lot of help. She needed a man. In order to ensure her own survival and the survival of her children, the woman had little choice but to agree to whatever conditions the man stipulated so that he would stick around and share some of the burden”
“biologists from the same department, possessing the same professional skills, have both applied for a million-dollar grant to finance their current research projects. Professor Slughorn wants to study a disease that infects the udders of cows, causing a 10 per cent decrease in their milk production. Professor Sprout wants to study whether cows suffer mentally when they are separated from their calves. Assuming that the amount of money is limited, and that it is impossible to finance both research projects, which one should be funded?
Your Bookmark on page 110 | Location 1683 | Added on Saturday, June 5, 2021 4:31:17 PM
“When it comes to power, outshining the master is perhaps the worst mistake of all.”
Considering all that he has at stake, he is remarkably patient and resilient,
We remember the times we saw our favorite band in concert, but we don’t remember the times we listened to their albums. (Location 2683)
warn you, however, not to act after the fashion of those who desire to be conspicuous rather than to improve,
“If that’s the case, even immortality might lead to discontent. Suppose science comes up with cures for all diseases, effective anti-ageing therapies and regenerative treatments that keep people indefinitely young. In all likelihood, the immediate result will be an unprecedented epidemic of anger and anxiety.
They must have implicit trust that their senior leaders will back their decisions. Without this trust, junior leaders cannot confidently execute, which means they cannot exercise effective (Location 2479)
“We need to look at ourselves and see what we can do better,” Jocko continued. “We have to write more-detailed reports that help them understand what we are doing and why we are making the decisions we are making. We have to communicate more openly in calls, and when they have questions, we need to immediately get them whatever information they need so that they understand what is happening out here.” (Location 3138)
He never exhibited rudeness, lost control of himself, or turned * violent. No one ever saw him sweat. Everything was to be approached logically and with due consideration, in a calm and orderly fashion but decisively, and with no loose ends.
“If someone is able to show me that what I think or do is not right, I will happily change, for I seek the truth, by which no one was ever truly harmed. It is the person who continues in his self - deception and ignorance who is harmed.” by Marcus Aurelius
Every time you get upset, a little bit of life leaves the body. Are these really the things on which you want to spend that priceless resource? Don’t be afraid to make a change—a big one. (Location 606)
‘Man, I’m trying to tell you, the pull-up bars are everything.’” (Location 9724)
If I show you how to do something, you might forget it, but if you do something yourself, you’re much more likely to remember it, and if you actually teach what you’re trying to learn to someone else, not only do you remember it, but you get a much deeper understanding of it. (Location 2915)
“Human happiness conditioning systems also differ from person to person. On a scale from one to ten, some people are born with a cheerful biochemical system that allows their mood to swing between levels six and ten, stabilising with time at eight. Such a person is quite happy even if she lives in an alienating big city, loses all her money in a stock-exchange crash and is diagnosed with diabetes. Other people are cursed with a gloomy biochemistry that swings between three and seven and stabilises at five. Such an unhappy person remains depressed even if she enjoys the support of a tight-knit community, wins millions in the lottery and is as healthy as an Olympic athlete.”
The key-the how of Buddhist practice-lies in learning to simply rest in a bare awareness of thoughts, feelings, and perceptions as they occur. In the Buddhist tradition, this gentle awareness is known as mindfulness,
We marvel at certain animals because they can pass through fire and suffer no bodily harm; but how much more marvellous is a man who has marched forth unhurt and unscathed through fire and sword and devastation!
The central idea is to create an environment where doing the right thing is as easy as possible. Much of the battle of building better habits comes down to finding ways to reduce the friction associated with our good habits and increase the friction associated with our bad ones.
Habits are easier to build when they fit into the flow of your life. You are more likely to go to the gym if it is on your way to work because stopping doesn’t add much friction to your lifestyle.
A crow carrying a piece of meat in its beak found itself being chased by all the other birds. It dropped the piece of meat, and all the birds went after the meat. Now, alone in the sky, the crow remarked, "In losing that piece of meat, I gained the freedom of the skies."
Do external things distract you? Then make time for yourself to learn something worthwhile; stop letting yourself be pulled in all directions. But make sure you guard against the other kind of confusion. People who labor all their lives but have no purpose to direct every thought and impulse toward are wasting their timeeven when hard at work.
“While people in today’s affluent societies work an average of forty to forty-five hours a week, and people in the developing world work sixty and even eighty hours a week, hunter-gatherers living today in the most inhospitable of habitats – such as the Kalahari Desert work on average for just thirty-five to forty-five hours a week. They hunt only one day out of three, and gathering takes up just three to six hours daily. In normal times, this is enough to feed the band. It may well be that ancient hunter-gatherers living in zones more fertile than the Kalahari spent even less time obtaining food and raw materials. On top of that, foragers enjoyed a lighter load of household chores. They had no dishes to wash, no carpets to vacuum, no floors to polish, no nappies to change and no bills to pay.”
you have to be willing to stick to it in any mood. Professionals take action even when the mood isn’t right. They might not enjoy it, but they find a way to put the reps in.
Don’t break the chain. Try to keep your habit streak alive.
Legends, myths, gods and religions appeared for the first time with the Cognitive Revolution. Many animals and human species could previously say, ‘Careful! A lion!’ Thanks to the Cognitive Revolution, Homo sapiens acquired the ability to say, ‘The lion is the guardian spirit of our tribe.’ This ability to speak about fictions is the most unique feature of Sapiens language”
“Throughout history, societies have suffered from two kinds of poverty: social poverty, which withholds from some people the opportunities available to others; and biological poverty, which puts the very lives of individuals at risk due to lack of food and shelter. Perhaps social poverty can never be eradicated, but in many countries around the world biological poverty is a thing of the past”
Without reflection we cannot learn. Without learning we are doomed to repeat mistakes, become frustrated when the world doesn’t work the way we want it to, and wonder why we are so busy. The cycle goes on.
“Recognizing that you’re experiencing a panic attack and nothing more, and not buying into the cortex’s misinterpretation of your amygdala-based symptoms, will help you recover more quickly.”
Each time you repeat an action, you are activating a particular neural circuit associated with that habit. This means that simply putting in your reps is one of the most critical steps you can take to encoding a new habit.
Are You Doing What You’re Uniquely Capable of, What You Feel Placed Here on Earth to Do? Can You Be Replaced? (Location 6387)
This experience underscored two things for me: 1) To get huge, good things done, you need to be okay with letting the small, bad things happen. 2) People’s IQs seem to double as soon as you give them responsibility and indicate that you trust them. (Location 9609)
“As you’ll see later in the book, many cortex-based anxiety symptoms do respond to logical arguments, but when it comes to amygdala-based anxiety, there’s only one sure way for the amygdala to learn: experience.”
“‘Follow your dreams.’ It’s impossible to do without self-knowledge, which takes years. You discover your ‘dream’ (or sense of purpose) in the very act of walking the path, which is guided by equal parts choice and chance.” (Location 6815)
The same can be said of natural mind. The neuronal gossip that keeps you from seeing your rriind in its fullness doesn't really change the funda- mental nature of your mind. Thoughts like ''I'm ugly," ''I'm stupid," or ''I'm boring" are nothing more than a kind of biological mud, temporarily obscuring the brilliant qualities of Buddha nature, or natural mind.
(Is it the flag that moves? Is it the wind? Neither, said Hui-Neng, the sixth Ch’an Buddhist Patriarch of China: It is your mind.
Knowing that someone is watching can be a powerful motivator. You are less likely to procrastinate or give up because there is an immediate cost. If you don’t follow through, perhaps they’ll see you as untrustworthy or lazy. Suddenly, you are not only failing to uphold your promises to yourself, but also failing to uphold your promises to others.
“Exercise has surprisingly powerful effects on the amygdala, surpassing many antianxiety medications in effectiveness. Sleep also has a strong impact on the amygdala’s functioning, with lack of sleep leading to heightened anxiety.”
One of the most effective things you can do to build better habits is to join a culture where your desired behavior is the normal behavior. New habits seem achievable when you see others doing them every day. If you are surrounded by fit people, you’re more likely to consider working out to be a common habit.
This means leaders must be heavily engaged in training and mentoring their junior leaders to prepare them to step up and assume greater responsibilities. (Location 3815)
and eating a field mouse. But it turns out that the energy required to do so exceeds the caloric content of the mouse itself. So a lion that spent its day hunting and eating field mice would slowly starve to death. A lion can’t live on field mice. A lion needs antelope. Antelope are big animals. They take more speed and strength to capture (Location 9677)
A true leader is not intimidated when others step up and take charge. Leaders that lack confidence in themselves fear being outshined by someone else. (Location 3624)
Fortunately, 10x results don’t always require 10x effort. Big changes can come in small packages. (Location 346)
surrenders himself to her is not kept waiting; he is emancipated
They couldn’t ask, “What do I do?” Instead, they had to state: “This is what I am going to do.” (Location 2318)
To read attentively-not to be satisfied with "just getting the of it." And not to fall for every smooth talker.
Prioritize and Execute. Even the greatest of battlefield leaders could not handle an array of challenges simultaneously without being overwhelmed. That risked failing at them all. I had to remain calm, step back from my immediate emotional reaction, and determine the greatest priority for the team. Then, rapidly direct the team to attack that priority. (Location 2136)
Attachment is in many ways comparable to addiction, a compulsive dependency on external object~ or experiences to manufacture an illu- sion of wholeness. Unfortunately, like other addictions, attachment becomes more intense over time. Whatever satisfaction we might ex- perience when we attain something or someone we d~sire doesn't last. Whatever or whoever made us happy today, this month, orthis year is bound to change. Change is the only constant of relative reality.
I heard a number of psychologists compare the experience of "mind" or "self" to watching a movie. When we watch a movie, they explained, we seem to experience a continu- ous flow of sound and motion as individual frames pass through a projector. The experience would be drastically different, however, if we had the chance to look at the film frame by frame
“Make it clear that your advice is merely an echo of his advice.”
So I would just say, ‘Believe in yourself more deeply. You’re bigger than that. Dream bigger,’ I would (Location 8810)
We are not the average of the five people we spend the most time with.We are the average of the five thoughts we spend the most time with.And those thoughts needn’t come from people in our life. Our thoughts come from people we follow on social media, the books, podcasts, anything we consume.We aren’t with people any more.We are with ideas, thoughts and identities.Pick wisely.
ever) is coming from this position because, just like me, they want to be happy and they want to avoid suffering. That's their basic purpose. They're not out to get me; they're only doing what they think they need to do."
So, if I don't get what I want in life, which I sometimes won't; if after all my efforts the results don't turn out to be what I aspired for, which they sometimes won't; if the consequences of my choices aren't what I intended, as they sometimes won't be... I will not lose heart.
These other guys seem to know.’ No, they don’t know. None of them know. That’s the beauty of it. You don’t have to know. You just have to keep moving forward.” (Location 10259)
Unfortunately, people typically try to avoid such experiences, and this avoidance prevents the amygdala from forming new connections.”
When I began my writing career, I published a new article every Monday and Thursday for the first few years. As the evidence grew, so did my identity as a writer. I didn’t start out as a writer. I became one through my habits.
you want to create or be anything lateral, bigger, better, or *truly* different, you need room to ask “what if?” without a conference call in 15 minutes. The aha moments rarely come from the incremental inbox-clearing mentality of, “Oh, fuck . . . I forgot to . . . Please remind me to . . . Shouldn’t I? . . . I must remember to . . .” (Location 9411)
“DON’T BELIEVE EVERYTHING THAT YOU THINK.” (Location 6646)
The label “jack-of-all-trades but master of none” is normally meant to be derogatory, implying that the labelee lacks the focus to really dive into a subject and master it. But, when your online shopping application is on the fritz and you’re losing orders by the hundreds as each hour passes, it’s the jack-of-all-trades who not only knows how the application’s code works but can also do low-level UNIX debugging of your web server processes, analyze your RDBMS’s configuration for potential performance bottlenecks, and check your network’s router configuration for hard-to-find problems. And, more important, after finding the problem, the jack-of-all-trades can quickly make architecture and design decisions, implement code fixes, and deploy a new fixed system to production.
When you give what you desire the most, you don’t desire it any more.If you share because you are expecting something in return, it is not sharing.It is a transaction!
The key is to direct your effort toward areas that both excite you and match your natural skills, to align your ambition with your ability.
They were looking for someone to blame, and most likely someone to (Location 408)
THE DICKENS PROCESS—WHAT ARE YOUR BELIEFS COSTING YOU? (Location 7383)
People generally take the path of least resistance. It is just in our nature. (Location 1967)
“THE MODERN ECONOMY GROWS THANKS to our trust in the future and to the willingness of capitalists to reinvest their profits in production. Yet that does not suffice. Economic growth also requires energy and raw materials, and these are finite. When and if they run out, the entire system will collapse”
“As the twenty-first century unfolds, nationalism is fast losing ground. More and more people believe that all of humankind is the legitimate source of political authority, rather than the members of a particular nationality, and that safeguarding human rights and protecting the interests of the entire human species should be the guiding light of politics. If so, having close to 200 independent states is a hindrance rather than a help. Since Swedes, Indonesians and Nigerians deserve the same human rights, wouldn’t it be simpler for a single global government to safeguard them?”
“One final and extremely important point: When you feel panicky, it’s important to resist the strong urge to flee the situation. While it’s an extremely frightening and unpleasant experience, a panic attack won’t physically hurt you. In fact, the sensations you’re experiencing are signs of a healthy, reactive body. Escaping the situation may make you feel better in the short term, but in the long run it will reinforce the power of panic attacks and make them more difficult to overcome. If possible, try to relax, breathe deeply, and remain in the situation.”
‘Have you seen the snow leopard?’ ‘No, isn’t that wonderful!’ Even a materialist can take comfort in this rejection of hubris, in its acceptance of the world-as-it-is, with its own priorities, and not always the world as we want it to be.
‘Don’t do it, because if you do that, you’re going to have to come up with those lines all the time. You’re going to be someone you’re not. . . .’ (Location 8768)
habit tracking provides visual proof that you are casting votes for the type of person you wish to become, which is a delightful form of immediate and intrinsic gratification.
he looked to what needed doing and not the credit to be gained from doing it.
“Franklins empirical observations, coupled with his knowledge about the qualities of electrical energy, enabled him to invent the lightning rod and disarm the gods”
“Christian theologians argued that God created the human body, intending each limb and organ to serve a particular purpose. If we use our limbs and organs for the purpose envisioned by God, then it is a natural activity. To use them differently than God intends is unnatural. But evolution has no purpose. Organs have not evolved with a purpose, and the way they are used is in constant flux. There is not a single organ in the human body that only does the job its prototype did when it first appeared hundreds of millions of years ago. Organs evolve to perform a particular function, but once they exist, they can be adapted for other usages as well.”
Be clear that your ladder is leaning against the right building.” (Location 9470)
This may sound clichéd, but how you do anything is how you do everything.” (Location 9359)
As a leader, if you don’t understand why decisions are being made, requests denied, or support allocated elsewhere, you must ask those questions up the chain. Then, once understood, you can pass that understanding down to your team. (Location 3168)
“If you want the amygdala to change its response to an object (for example, a mouse) or a situation (such as a noisy crowd), the amygdala needs experience with the object or situation for new learning to occur. Experience is most effective when the person interacts directly with the object or situation, although observing another person has also been shown to affect the amygdala (Olsson, Nearing, and Phelps 2007). You can reason with the amygdala for hours, but if you’re trying to change amygdala-based anxiety, that tactic won’t be as effective as a few minutes of direct experience will be”
“Wheat did it by manipulating Homo sapiens to its advantage. This ape had been living a fairly comfortable life hunting and gathering until about 10,000 years ago, but then began to invest more and more effort in cultivating wheat. Within a couple of millennia, humans in many parts of the world were doing little from dawn to dusk other than taking care of wheat plants. It wasn’t easy. Wheat demanded a lot of them. Wheat didn’t like rocks and pebbles, so Sapiens broke their backs clearing fields. Wheat didn’t like sharing its space, water and nutrients with other plants, so men and women laboured long days weeding under the scorching sun. Wheat got sick, so Sapiens had to keep a watch out for worms and blight. Wheat was defenceless against other organisms that liked to eat it, from rabbits to locust swarms, so the farmers had to guard and protect it. Wheat was thirsty, so humans lugged water from springs and streams to water it. Its hunger even impelled Sapiens to collect animal faeces to nourish the ground in which wheat grew.”
Life is short. That's all there is to say. Get what you can from the present–thoughtfully, justly.
The leader, convinced that he might be betrayed, acts first and betrays others first. Afraid that he’s not well liked, he works so hard to get others to like him that it has the opposite effect. Convinced of mismanagement, he micromanages and becomes the source of the mismanagement. And on and on—the things we fear or dread, we blindly inflict on ourselves. (Location 551)
This is a key to understanding our history and psychology. Genus Homo’s position in the food chain was, until quite recently, solidly in the middle. For millions of years, humans hunted smaller creatures and gathered what they could, all the while being hunted by larger predators. It was only 400,000 years ago that several species of man began to hunt large game on a regular basis, and only in the last 100,000 years – with the rise of Homo sapiens – that man jumped to the top of the food chain. That spectacular leap from the middle to the top had enormous consequences. Other animals at the top of the pyramid, such as lions and sharks, evolved into that position very gradually, over millions of years.”
“Ever more scholars see cultures as a kind of mental infection or parasite, with humans as its unwitting host. Organic parasites, such as viruses, live inside the body of their hosts. They multiply and spread from one host to the other, feeding off their hosts, weakening them, and sometimes even killing them. As long as the hosts live long enough to pass along the parasite, it cares little about the condition of its host. In just this fashion, cultural ideas live inside the minds of humans. They multiply and spread from one host to another, occasionally weakening the hosts and sometimes even killing them”
What it boils down to is that on a strictly cellular level, repeated experience can change the way the brain works.
The CO and his staff weren’t bad guys out to make our lives harder and stifle our operations. They were good people trying to do their jobs the best they could and give us what we needed to accomplish our mission. But they weren’t on the battlefield with us. They didn’t fully understand the threats we dealt with on a daily basis and how hard we were working to mitigate every risk we possibly could. (Location 3100)
Habits are a dopaminedriven feedback loop. When dopamine rises, so does our motivation to act.
Look for those where you can gain the most and avoid those where you can contribute the least. When I see the same face popping up at every meeting, I start to wonder when that particular executive has time to get anything else done.
“The producer of a great work wants to feel he is more than just the provider of the financing. He wants to appear creative and powerful, and also more important than the work produced in his name. Instead of insecurity you must give him glory. Galileo did not challenge the intellectual authority of the Medicis with his discovery, or make them feel inferior in any way; by literally aligning them with the stars, he made them shine brilliantly among the courts of Italy. He did not outshine the master, he made the master outshine all others.”
When I started working from home—once I learned to focus—I was able to get much more work done in a shorter period of (Location 1959)
With a culture of Extreme Ownership within the team, every member of the team could contribute to this effort and ensure the highest levels of performance. (Location 748)
Others who were blessed with all the natural talent in the world will fail as leaders if they are not humble enough to own their mistakes, admit that they don’t have it all figured out, seek guidance, learn, and continuously grow. (Location 3805)
I had to take complete ownership of what went wrong. That is what a leader does—even if it means getting fired. If anyone was to be blamed and fired for what happened, let it be me. (Location 430)
The answers are almost never immediately obvious. In some cases, the answers to who attacked and how will never be known. Regardless, leaders cannot be paralyzed by fear. That results in inaction. It is critical for leaders to act decisively amid uncertainty; to make the best decisions they can based on only the immediate information available. (Location 3372)
The Goldilocks Rule states that humans experience peak motivation when working on tasks that are right on the edge of their current abilities.
The past has no reality, except in the memory in which it is processed.
“Why haven’t I reached it already? What is it in me that is holding me back?”
when the alarm goes off, do you get up out of bed, or do you lie there in comfort and fall back to sleep? If you have the discipline to get out of bed, you win—you pass the test. If you are mentally weak for that moment and you let that weakness keep you in bed, you fail. (Location 3572)
The human brain loves a challenge, but only if it is within an optimal zone of difficulty.
“Why are so many people afraid that we are running out of energy? Why do they warn of disaster if we exhaust all available fossil fuels? Clearly the world does not lack energy. All we lack is the knowledge necessary to harness and convert it to our needs. The amount of energy stored in all the fossil fuel on earth is negligible compared to the amount that the sun dispenses every day, free of charge”
“How do you cause people to believe in an imagined order such as Christianity, democracy or capitalism? First, you never admit that the order is imagined. You always insist that the order sustaining society is an objective reality created by the great gods or by the laws of nature. People are unequal, not because Hammurabi said so, but because Enlil and Marduk decreed it. People are equal, not because Thomas Jefferson said so, but because God created them that way. Free markets are the best economic system, not because Adam Smith said so, but because these are the immutable laws of nature.”
If a behavior can get us approval, respect, and praise, we find it attractive.
“Man is pushed by drives but pulled by values.” (Location 284)
When Patty Olwell, a therapist from Austin, Texas, started smoking, she would often light up while riding horses with a friend. Eventually, she quit smoking and avoided it for years. She had also stopped riding. Decades later, she hopped on a horse again and found herself craving a cigarette for the first time in forever. The cues were still internalized; she just hadn’t been exposed to them in a long time. Once a habit has been encoded, the urge
Just that you do the right thing. The rest doesn't matter.
“Most people throughout history lived under conditions of scarcity. Frugality was thus their watchword”
And to be the same in all circumstances-intense pain, the loss of a child, chronic illness.
Making a choice that is 1 percent better or 1 percent worse seems insignificant in the moment, but over the span of moments that make up a lifetime these choices determine the difference between who you are and who you could be.
We both absolutely love Levels of the Game by John McPhee, an entire book about a single tennis match between Arthur Ashe and Clark Graebner in 1968. (Location 9271)
“So be aware that if you’re going without sleep, you’re making it more likely that your amygdala will be reactive and cause you to experience anxiety or other emotional reactions, such as anger and irritability.”
a leader should not seek that recognition. (Location 3626)
It is critical to utilize all assets and lean on the expertise of those in the best position to provide the most accurate and up-to-date information. (Location 2722)
You can work whatever hours you’d like to work, but set a schedule for each week and stick to it. The more regular and routine the schedule, the better. My (Location 1929)
Improvement is not just about learning habits, it’s also about finetuning them. Reflection and review ensures that you spend your time on the right things and make
“fiction has enabled us not merely to imagine things, but to do so collectively. We can weave common myths such as the biblical creation story, the Dreamtime myths of Aboriginal Australians, and the nationalist myths of modern states. Such myths give Sapiens the unprecedented ability to cooperate flexibly in large numbers. Ants and bees can also work together in huge numbers, but they do so in a very rigid manner and only with close relatives. Wolves and chimpanzees cooperate far more flexibly than ants, but they can do so only with small numbers of other individuals that they know intimately. Sapiens can cooperate in extremely flexible ways with countless numbers of strangers. That’s why Sapiens rule the world, whereas ants eat our leftovers and chimps are locked up in zoos and research laboratories.”
“our current mental-hygiene philosophy stresses the idea that people ought to be happy, that unhappiness is a symptom of maladjustment. Such a value system might be responsible for the fact that the burden of unavoidable unhappiness is increased by unhappiness about being unhappy.”
With angry emotion, I wrestled with how best to professionally respond to those critics, particularly from senior officers with no real combat experience. (Location 2982)
For it is not boyhood that still stays with us, but something worse, – boyishness.
“The truth is, the cortex often comes up with reasons for our behaviors, which may or may not be accurate explanations.”
The truth of the matter is that things change. Over time the things that made you uncomfortable become second nature. You have to give it enough time and be willing to go through that awkwardness until it stops being awkward. (Location 2841)
“If you want to be tougher mentally, it is simple: Be tougher. Don’t meditate on it.” (Location 6864)
Habit tracking naturally builds a series of visual cues like the streak of X’s on your calendar or the list of meals in your food log. When you look at the calendar and see your streak, you’ll be reminded to act again. Research has shown that people who track their progress on goals like losing weight, quitting smoking, and lowering blood pressure are all more likely to improve than those who don’t. One
“After this connection has been created, you’ll feel anxious whenever the amygdala recognizes similar sensory information. The sights, sounds, or smells associated with the negative event become capable of activating the amygdala’s alarm system. The term trigger refers to anything—an event, object, sound, smell, and so on—that activates the amygdala’s alarm system as a result of association-based learning. In the example above, dogs become a trigger for anxiety. Triggers are an important aspect of the language of the amygdala”
Let me ask you this: Are there any high-potential frontline personnel that could take their jobs? It may be time for a battlefield promotion. It’s likely the real in-depth knowledge on the various projects is with the frontline troops, not with Eduardo and Nigel.” (Location 3460)
A lot of professionals have an ego problem: their view of themselves does not line up with the way other people see them. Before people can change they need to know these outside views. We need to go to people we trust, who can give us honest feedback about our traits. These people are in a position to observe us operating within our circles, and are thus able to offer relevant perspectives on our competence.
·what it's reflecting.
You can then right-click any file, such as an image that the site wouldn’t otherwise let you download, and click Copy Link Address to get the direct URL. (Location 7148)
Don't be predictable. You don't want to give someone above you the opportunity to say, 'So-and-so is up to his old tricks again
“A crowd is just a crowd, an elevator is just an elevator, and so on. These things become triggers when an emotional memory is made, whether with anxiety, happiness, or even affection.”
Looking back, I could have yelled a lot less and encouraged more. (Location 738)
“Whenever a shortage of either has threatened to slow economic growth, investments have flowed into scientific and technological research. These have invariably produced not only more efficient ways of exploiting existing resources, but also completely new types of energy and materials.”
“Game theory explains how in multi-player systems, views and behaviour patterns that harm all players nevertheless manage to take root and spread. Arms races are a famous example. Many arms races bankrupt all those who take part in them, without really changing the military balance of power. When Pakistan buys advanced aeroplanes, India responds in kind. When India develops nuclear bombs, Pakistan follows suit. When Pakistan enlarges its navy, India counters. At the end of the process, the balance of power may remain much as it was, but meanwhile billions of dollars that could have been invested in education or health are spent on weapons. Yet the arms race dynamic is hard to resist. ‘Arms racing’ is a pattern of behaviour that spreads itself like a virus from one country to another, harming everyone, but benefiting itself, under the evolutionary criteria of survival and reproduction.”
“Be a skeptic, don’t be a cynic.” (Location 9501)
The spell of silence on this place is warning that no man belongs here.
“The fact is that a jumbo brain is a jumbo drain on the body. It’s not easy to carry around, especially when encased inside a massive skull. It’s even harder to fuel. In Homo sapiens, the brain accounts for about 2–3 per cent of total body weight, but it consumes 25 per cent of the body’s energy when the body is at rest. By comparison, the brains of other apes require only 8 per cent of rest-time energy. Archaic humans paid for their large brains in two ways. Firstly, they spent more time in search of food. Secondly, their muscles atrophied. Like a government diverting money from defence to education, humans diverted energy from biceps to neurons. It’s hardly a foregone conclusion that this is a good strategy for survival on the savannah. A chimpanzee can’t win an argument with a Homo sapiens, but the ape can rip the man apart like a rag doll.”
“Josh doesn’t show up for a dinner date with Monique and Jayden. Jayden is furious at Josh and expresses her anger. Monique, on the other hand, isn’t too concerned and simply wants to enjoy her time with Jayden, whom she hasn’t seen in weeks. The event is the same for both women: Josh doesn’t show up. But their interpretations are obviously quite different. Jayden’s interpretation might be Josh should follow through when he says he’s coming or He doesn’t have any respect for us, leading to her reaction of anger. In contrast, Monique has a different interpretation: This is an opportunity to spend time alone with my friend Jayden.”
“Cultivating wheat provided much more food per unit of territory, and thereby enabled Homo sapiens to multiply exponentially”
Every day, there are a handful of moments that deliver an outsized impact. I refer to these little choices as decisive moments. The moment you decide between ordering takeout or cooking dinner. The moment you choose between driving your car or riding your bike. The moment you decide between starting your homework or grabbing the video game controller. These choices are a fork in the road. DECISIVE MOMENTS
IMMEDIATE FOLLOW UP
You had to assume they were, and you had to plan for them on every operation and mitigate the risk of those threats as much as possible. To assume otherwise was a failure of leadership. (Location 2703)
Determining how much leaders should be involved and where leaders can best position themselves to command and control the team is key. (Location 2489)
“Sex is child’s play; but gender is serious business. To get to be a member of the male sex is the simplest thing in the world. You just need to be born with an X and a Y chromosome. To get to be a female is equally simple. A pair of X chromosomes will do it. In contrast, becoming a man or a woman is a very complicated and demanding undertaking. Since most masculine and feminine qualities are cultural rather than biological, no society automatically crowns each male a man, or every female a woman. Nor are these titles laurels that can be rested on once they are acquired. Males must prove their masculinity constantly, throughout their lives, from cradle to grave, in an endless series of rites and performances. And a woman’s work is never done – she must continually convince herself and others that she is feminine enough”
The human brain evolved to prioritize immediate rewards over delayed rewards.
Habits are a dopaminedriven feedback loop. Every behavior that is highly habitforming—taking drugs, eating junk food, playing video games, browsing social media—is associated with higher levels of dopamine.
So if my boss wasn’t comfortable with what I was doing, it was only because I had not clearly communicated it to him.” (Location 3216)
What did the prisoner dream about most frequently? Of bread, cake, cigarettes, and nice warm baths.
“There was no need to discover something that nobody yet knew. For example, if a peasant in some thirteenth-century Yorkshire village wanted to know how the human race originated, he assumed that Christian tradition held the definitive answer. All he had to do was ask the local priest”
Your good qualities should face inwards.
Habit stacking works best when the cue is highly specific and immediately actionable. Many people select cues that are too vague. I made this mistake myself. When I wanted to start a pushup habit, my habit stack was “When I take a break for lunch, I will do ten pushups.” At first glance, this sounded reasonable. But soon, I realized the trigger was unclear. Would I do my pushups before I ate lunch? After I ate lunch? Where would I do them? After a few inconsistent days, I changed my habit stack to: “When I close my laptop for lunch, I will do ten pushups next to my desk.” Ambiguity gone.
It is important to know the system so that you can work through it.
As long as we don't recognize our real na- ture, we suffer. When we recognize our nature, we become free from suffering. Whether you recognize it or not, though, its qualities remain unchanged. But when you. begin to recognize it in yourself, you change, and the quality of y9ur life changes as well.
“Foragers were never obliged to handle large amounts of mathematical data. No forager needed to remember, say, the number of fruit on each tree in the forest. So human brains not adapt to storing and processing numbers” _this is why we don’t remember numbers easily
Before, I was so overworked, I was such a chronic workaholic that I didn’t have a life. And in order for art to imitate life, you have to have a life.” (Location 7841)
Temptation bundling is one way to make your habits more attractive. The strategy is to pair an action you want to do with an action you need to do.
You don’t have to build the habits
Yes, the man in the arena is admirable. As is the soldier and the politician and the businesswoman and all the other occupations. But, and this is a big but, only if we’re in the arena for the right reasons. (Location 544)
It’s my firm belief that every software developer who cares about their career should invest in creating a blog. (Location 2382)
Even the most competent of leaders can be overwhelmed if they try to tackle multiple problems or a number of tasks simultaneously. The team will likely fail at each of those tasks. Instead, leaders must determine the highest priority task and execute. When overwhelmed, fall back upon this principle: Prioritize and Execute. (Location 2180)
To write straightforward letters, (like the one he sent my mother from Sinuessa). And to behave in a conciliatory way people who have angered or annoyed us want to make up.
The best teams anywhere, like the SEAL Teams, are constantly looking to improve, add capability, and push the standards higher. It starts with the individual and spreads to each of the team members until this becomes the culture, the new standard. (Location 816)
“You get it in your own way—thinking that you needed to know something, a trick or a process, before it would flow. If you got out of the way, it would just flow. (Location 10229)
We must never forget that we may also find meaning in life even when confronted with a hopeless situation, when facing a fate
“The supreme commandment of the rich is ‘Invest!’ The supreme commandment of the rest of us is ‘Buy!”
“the real root of suffering is this never-ending and pointless pursuit of ephemeral feelings, which causes us to be in a constant state of tension, restlessness and dissatisfaction. Due to this pursuit, the mind is never satisfied. Even when experiencing pleasure, it is not content, because it fears this feeling might soon disappear, and craves that this feeling should stay and intensify.”
Make sure you’re setting up activities in the week that will take you out of the house and give you opportunities to see other human beings. (Location 1969)
Continually check and question the plan against emerging information to ensure it still fits the situation. (Location 2772)
The good leaders took ownership of the mistakes and shortfalls. That’s the key difference. (Location 588)
Habit tracking also helps keep your eye on the ball: you’re focused on the process rather than the result. You’re not fixated on getting sixpack abs, you’re just trying to keep the streak alive and become the type of person who doesn’t miss workouts.
“about 10,000 years ago, when Sapiens began to devote almost all their time and effort to manipulating the lives of a few animal and plant species. From sunrise to sunset humans sowed seeds, watered plants, plucked weeds from the ground and led sheep to prime pastures. This work, they thought, would provide them with more fruit, grain and meat. It was a revolution in the way humans lived – the Agricultural Revolution”
Whenever a habit successfully addresses a motive, you develop a craving to do it again. In time, you learn to predict that checking social media will help you feel loved or that watching YouTube will allow you to forget your fears. Habits are attractive when we associate them with positive feelings, and we can use this insight to our advantage rather than to our detriment.
Being specific about what you want and how you will achieve it helps you say no to things that derail progress, distract your attention, and pull you off course. We often say yes to little requests because we are not clear enough about what we need to be doing instead.
Doing great work simply because you love it, sounds, in our culture, somehow flimsy, and that’s a failing of our culture, not of the choice of work that artists make.” (Location 6774)
ground noises, conflicts with other people. Years later I would come to realize I wasn't actually getting worse; I was simply becoming more
Try it—write down a precise sequence of curse words that takes 7 to 10 seconds to read. Then, before a creative work session of some type, read it quickly and loudly (Location 8592)
Nothing happens to anyone that he can't endure. The same thing happens to other people, and they weather it unharmed-out of sheer obliviousness or because they want to display “character."
“Over the last few years, banks and governments have been frenziedly printing money. Everybody is terrified that the current economic crisis may stop the growth of the economy. So they are creating trillions of dollars, euros and yen out of thin air, pumping cheap credit into the system, and hoping that the scientists, technicians and engineers will manage to come up with something really big, before the bubble bursts. Everything depends on the people in the labs. New discoveries in fields such as biotechnology and nanotechnology could create entire new industries, whose profits could back the trillions of make-believe money that the banks and governments have created since 2008. If the labs do not fulfil these expectations before the bubble bursts, we are heading towards very rough times”
“You must want to be a butterfly so badly, you are willing to give up being a caterpillar.” (Location 10340)
Whatever your identity is right now, you only believe it because you have proof of it. If you go to church every Sunday for twenty years, you have evidence that you are religious. If you study biology for one hour every night, you have evidence that you are studious. If you go to the gym even when it’s snowing, you have evidence that you are committed to fitness. The more evidence
“Wasn’t it Bill Clinton who said that when dealing with anyone who’s upset, he always asks, ‘Has this person slept? Have they eaten? Is somebody else bugging them?’ He goes through this simple checklist. . . . When we’re handling babies and the baby is kicking and crying, we almost never once say, ‘That baby’s out to get me’ or ‘She’s got evil intentions.’” (Location 7974)
Life is not primarily a quest for pleasure, as Freud believed, or a quest for power, as Alfred Adler taught, but a quest for meaning. The greatest task for any person is to find meaning in his or her life.
Alice and I were married two years later. And our marriage lasted just a little longer than my career at Hewlett-Packard, which is funny in a sad way. Because I thought both of those arrangements were going to last forever.
As a professional you must strive to constantly improve and increase the quality of the work you produce. You won’t always be able to produce the quality of work you desire, but over time, with consistency, you’ll reach your standards. (Location 1473)
Again, see your peers as your allies, not as your competition.
He minimizes input to maximize output, much like Rick Rubin. Josh (Location 9307)
We pick up habits from the people around us. We copy the way our parents handle arguments, the way our peers flirt with one another, the way our coworkers get results. When your friends smoke pot, you give it a try, too. When your wife has a habit of doublechecking that the door is locked before going to bed, you pick it up as well.
And like it or not, your boss is judging you by these three criteria:
By controlling these three factors, we can control or develop the intensity and depth of a relationship.
They had each very clearly put extensive time and effort into the bonus plan and now tried desperately to defend their efforts despite its glaring overly complex deficiency. (Location 1955)
“A good person avoided luxuries, never threw food away, and patched up torn trousers instead of buying a new pair. Only kings and nobles allowed themselves to renounce such values publicly and conspicuously flaunt their riches.”
“There is only one person to blame for this: me. I am the commander. I am responsible for the entire operation. As the senior man, I am responsible for every action that takes place on the battlefield. There is no one to blame but me. And I will tell you this right now: I will make sure that nothing like this ever happens to us again.” (Location 443)
A habit tracker is a simple way to measure whether you did a habit—like marking an X on a calendar.
Whenever we are unsure how to act, we look to the group to guide our behavior. We are constantly scanning our environment and wondering, “What is everyone else doing?” We check reviews on Amazon or Yelp or TripAdvisor because we want to imitate the “best” buying, eating, and travel habits.
“For me, pride worked because my fear of failure was way greater than my fear of fire. I didn’t often feel fear of fire, to be totally frank. I’m not trying to pretend I’m so brave. It’s just that I had a bigger fear—humiliation, failure, letting down women. Pride can be a really great motivator.” (Location 7560)
‘Work will work when nothing else will work.’” (Location 7314)
While pushing to make your superior understand what you need, you must also realize that your boss must allocate limited assets and make decisions with the bigger picture in mind. You and your team may not represent the priority effort at that particular time. Or perhaps the senior leadership has chosen a different direction. Have the humility to understand and accept this. (Location 3162)
When leading up the chain of command, use caution and respect. But remember, if your leader is not giving the support you need, don’t blame him or her. Instead, reexamine what you can do to better clarify, educate, influence, or convince that person to give you what you need in order to win. (Location 3171)
Only then did I spot the guard at my side who was using his stick. At such a moment it is not the physical pain which hurts the most (and this applies to adults as much as to punished children); it is the mental agony caused by the injustice, the unreasonableness of it all.
whenever possible, measurement should be automated. You’ll probably be surprised by how much you’re already tracking without knowing it.
that man’s existence is inseparable from sorrow; that the cause of suffering is craving; that peace is attained by extinguishing craving; that this liberation may be brought about by following the Eight-fold Path: right attention to one’s understanding, intentions, speech, and actions; right livelihood, effort, mindfulness; right concentration, by which is meant the unification of the self through sitting yoga.
Instead of ignoring Mara or driving him away, the Buddha would calmly acknowledge his presence, saying, “I see you, Mara.” (Location 9016)
We talk a lot about courage as a society, but we forget that at its most basic level it’s really just taking action—whether that’s approaching someone you’re intimidated by or deciding to finally crack a book on a subject you need to learn. Just as Earhart did, all the greats you admire started by saying, Yes, let’s go. And they usually did it in less desirable circumstances than we’ll ever suffer.
is not the man who has too little, but the man who craves more, that is poor.
Never regard something as doing you good if it makes you betray a trust, or lose your sense of shame, or makes you show hatred, suspicion, ill will, or hypocrisy, or a desire for things best done behind closed doors.
Leaders must delegate the planning process down the chain as much as possible to key subordinate leaders. Team leaders within the greater team and frontline, tactical-level leaders must have ownership of their tasks within the overall plan and mission. (Location 2723)
Waking up early was the first example I noticed in the SEAL Teams in which discipline was really the difference between being good and being exceptional. (Location 3579)
“Money is thus a universal medium of exchange that enables people to convert almost everything into almost anything else. Brawn gets converted to brain when a discharged soldier finances his college tuition with his military benefits. Land gets converted into loyalty when a baron sells property to support his retainers. Health is converted to justice when a physician uses her fees to hire a lawyer – or bribe a judge. It is even possible to convert sex into salvation, as fifteenth-century prostitutes did when they slept with men for money, which they in turn used to buy indulgences from the Catholic Church.”
“For example, after running on a treadmill for thirty minutes, men showed greater activation in the left frontal cortex compared to the right frontal area (Petruzzello and Landers 1994). Greater left frontal activation has been associated with a more positive mood, suggesting that exercise can stimulate the cortex in a manner that produces more positive feelings. Those positive feelings are likely to help reduce anxiety”
“You get paid for being right first, and to be first, you can’t wait for consensus.” (Location 8930)
Whenever I have been cheated or betrayed or exploited or hurt, I have always told myself, "Thank god that I was cheated, but I wasn't the cheat; I was betrayed, but I didn't betray;I was hurt, but I didn't hurt. Let me suffer the wrong, but never inflict the wrong."
Did the person take 10 minutes to do their homework? Are they minding the details? If not, don’t encourage more incompetence by rewarding it. Those who are sloppy during the honeymoon (at the beginning) only get worse later. (Location 6755)
Consequences for failing need not be immediately severe, but leaders must ensure that tasks are repeated until the higher expected standard is achieved. Leaders must push the standards in a way that encourages and enables the team to utilize Extreme Ownership. (Location 803)
Human behavior follows the Law of Least Effort. We will naturally gravitate toward the option that requires the least amount of work.
He established a new and higher standard of performance and accepted nothing less from the men in his boat crew.” (Location 862)
Whenever someone says ‘You will never know how I am feeling’, remind yourself that they are telling you life’s most fundamental truth.We will never know!We will never truly understand what the other person is going through.
This is the own-worst-enemy syndrome. Even if you have something worth saying, if you express it in a tone or a manner that is a turn-off, it guarantees no one will listen.
I do what is mine to do; the rest doesn't disturb me.
we'll experience ourselves as weak, stupid, or incompetent.
“How can I turn it into a positive and get something much better than if I had all the time and money in the world?” I (Location 10141)
A personality in balance: dignity and grace together .
With enough practice, your brain will pick up on the cues that predict certain outcomes without consciously thinking about it.
You can never be the other. You can only be yourself. You do not benchmark yourself with others, but you do benchmark yourselfwith your value system.
“Nations existed in the distant past, but their importance was much smaller than today because the importance of the state was much smaller. A resident of medieval Nuremberg might have felt some loyalty towards the German nation, but she felt far more loyalty towards her family and local community, which took care of most of her needs”
“In the wake of the Cognitive Revolution, gossip helped Homo sapiens to form larger and more stable bands. But even gossip has its limits. Sociological research has shown that the maximum ‘natural’ size of a group bonded by gossip is about 150 individuals. Most people can neither intimately know, nor gossip effectively about, more than 150 human beings.
But conversion should your always rest on a conviction that it's right, or benefits others-nothing else. Not because it's more appealing or more popular.
When it comes to habits, the key takeaway is this: dopamine is released not only when you experience pleasure, but also when you anticipate it. Gambling addicts have a dopamine spike right before they place a bet, not after they win. Cocaine addicts get a surge of dopamine when they see the powder, not after they take it. Whenever you predict that an opportunity will be rewarding, your levels of dopamine spike in anticipation. And whenever dopamine rises, so does your motivation to act.
“He looked at me and he says, ‘You know, I never took a chance in my life.’ I was almost in my own Field of Dreams moment. There were some tears coming down. He says, ‘I came out of that goddamn fucking Dust Bowl, and when I got a job, Kevin, I didn’t want to lose it. I was going to hold on to that, because I knew there would always be food on the table.’ And I said, ‘There was. There was.’ There was really kind of just an amazing moment, my dad sitting there.” “On one level, wisdom is nothing more than the ability to take your own advice. (Location 7448)
Constant awareness that everything is born from change. The knowledge that there is nothing nature loves more than to alter what exists and make new things like it.
Want to improve your diet? Chop up a ton of fruits and vegetables on weekends and pack them in containers, so you have easy access to healthy, readytoeat options during the week.
rewards teach us which actions are worth remembering in the future. Your brain is a reward detector. As you go about your life, your sensory nervous system is continuously monitoring which actions satisfy your desires and deliver pleasure.
In the beginning (point A), a habit requires a good deal of effort and concentration to perform. After a few repetitions (point B), it gets easier, but still requires some conscious attention. With enough practice (point C), the habit becomes more automatic than conscious. Beyond this threshold—the habit line—the behavior can be done more or less without thinking. A new habit has been formed.
Instead, tranquility and peace are found in identifying our path and in sticking to it: staying the course —making adjustments here and there, naturally—but ignoring the distracting sirens who beckon us to turn toward the rocks. (Location 295)
Make your list the night before for the workday ahead.
Mastery is the process of narrowing your focus to a tiny element of success, repeating it until you have internalized the skill, and then using this new habit as the foundation to advance to the next frontier of your development.
It is the anticipation of a reward—not the fulfillment of it—that gets us to take action. The greater the anticipation, the greater the dopamine spike.
The worst thing you can ever do is think that you know enough. Never stop learning. Ever. (Location 91)
Your Bookmark on page 129 | Location 1973 | Added on Saturday, June 5, 2021 5:21:23 PM
“I’m glad you didn’t listen to me,” he admitted. (Location 3360)
That was the idea—I’m there to learn. I’m not there to win; I’m there to learn, because then I’ll win, eventually. . . . (Location 10166)
The sweet spot of desire occurs at a 50/50 split between success and failure. Half of the time you get what you want. Half of the time you don’t. You need just enough “winning” to experience satisfaction and just enough “wanting” to experience desire.
“[My mentor’s] life advice to me, when I’m going into a conflict or a difficult situation with my parents or an argument with Neil [Gaiman, her husband] is, ‘Say less.’ That’s it. Just say less.” (Location 8462)
“people became obsessed with the idea that machines and engines could be used to convert one type of energy into another. Any type of energy, anywhere in the world, might be harnessed to whatever need we had, if we could just invent the right machine”
“Before you get the idea that you might be better off without your amygdala, remember that its role is to protect you. In addition, it produces positive emotions due to association-based learning. For example, if your special someone gives you a necklace as a gift, you’ll experience feelings of warmth and love for your partner. Later, when you see the necklace, the association formed between the necklace and the emotion of love will make you experience warm, affectionate feelings again”
This negative attitude infected his entire boat crew. (Location 847)
you’ll reinforce that learning (Location 2928)
If you look at the most habitforming products, you’ll notice that one of the things these goods and services do best is remove little bits of friction from your life. Meal delivery services reduce the friction of shopping for groceries. Dating apps reduce the friction of making social introductions.
All great men were ordinary men who were forced by circumstances to meet great challenges.
“Ancient traditions of knowledge admitted only two kinds of ignorance. First, an individual might be ignorant of something important. To obtain the necessary knowledge, all he needed to do was ask somebody wiser”
What we’re really talking about here—when we’re discussing immediate rewards—is the ending of a behavior. The ending of any experience is vital because we tend to remember it more than other phases. You want the ending of your habit to be satisfying.
“This finding indicates, once again, that the effects of exercise on the brain last much longer than duration of the exercise period and may in fact persist for days. It’s quite possible that when you exercise, you’re raising your endorphin level not just for that day, but for days afterward.”
Boiling water will soften a potato but harden an egg. You can’t control whether you’re a potato or an egg, but you can
“The purpose of this unloading week is to prepare the body for the increased demand of the next phase or period,” and to mitigate the risk of overtraining. (Location 9395)
The breaking of a habit doesn’t matter if the reclaiming of it is fast.
Habits reduce cognitive load and free up mental capacity, so you can allocate your attention to other tasks.
“As you can see, amygdala-based emotions aren’t rational. They’re based on associations, not logic”
There is a 'Doer' in each of us. That's the self that acts in the world.
Junior leaders must be empowered to make decisions and take initiative to accomplish the mission. That was critical to our success on the battlefield. And it will greatly help you here.” (Location 2557)
I saw it with some of the older, experienced SEALs. Those who were at work before everyone else were the ones who were considered the best “operators.” That meant they had the best field craft, the most squared away gear, they were the best shots, and they were the most respected. It all tied into discipline. (Location 3580)
If you alienate your peers, you won't need any other corporate enemies.
attachment, aversion, and all other mental afflictions will gradually settle, and the compassion, clarity, and infinite expanse of your mind's real nature will be revealed.
“All these cooperation networks – from the cities of ancient Mesopotamia to the Qin and Roman empires – were ‘imagined orders’. The social norms that sustained them were based neither on ingrained instincts nor on personal acquaintances, but rather on belief in shared myths.”
As soon as we experience the slightest dip in motivation, we begin seeking a new strategy—even if the old one was still working.
All of these scenarios hold the same thing in common. As Epictetus says, it’s wanting something outside our control. (Location 508)
“If, on the other hand, you know that your anxiety began in the cortex, the more effective approach is to change your thoughts and images to decrease the resulting amygdala activation”
The most effective form of learning is practice, not planning.
Leaders must never get so close that the team forgets who is in charge. (Location 3656)
Find something that makes you truly happy—like petting your dog or taking a bubble bath—and then create a short routine that you perform every time before you do the thing you love. Maybe you take three deep breaths and smile. Three deep breaths. Smile. Pet the dog. Repeat. Eventually, you’ll begin to associate this breatheandsmile routine with being in a good mood. It becomes a cue that means feeling happy.
Review your work list right now and put an A, B, C, D, or E next to each task or activity. Select your A-1 job or project and begin on it immediately.
“People talk about leadership requiring courage. This is exactly one of those situations. It takes courage to go to the CEO’s office, knock on her door, and explain that you don’t understand the strategy behind her decisions. You might feel stupid. But you will feel far worse trying to explain to your team a mission or strategy that you don’t understand or believe in yourself. (Location 1215)
‘If you’re studying my game, you’re entering my game, and I’ll be better at it than you.’” (Location 9326)
Unwavering adherence to decisions, once he'd reached them.
“All masters want to appear more brilliant than other people”
Not to be constantly telling people (or writing them) that I'm too busy, unless I really am. Similarly, not to be always ducking my responsibilities to the people around me because of "pressing business."
Personal experience has taught me that it's possible to overcome any sense of personal limita- tion. Otherwise I'd probably still be sitting in my retreat room, feel- ing too scared and inadequate to participate in group practiCes. As a thirteen-year-old boy, I only.knew haw to get over my fear and insecu- rity. Through the patient tutoring of experts in the fields of psychology and neuroscience, like Francisco Varela, Richard Davidson, Dan Gole- man, and Tara Bennett-Goleman, I've begun to recognize why, from an
Research has shown that once a person believes in a particular aspect of their identity, they are more likely to act in alignment with that belief. For example, people who identified as “being a voter” were more likely to vote than those who simply claimed “voting” was an action they wanted to perform. Similarly, the person who incorporates exercise into their identity doesn’t have to convince themselves to train. Doing the right thing is easy.
Leaders who lose their temper also lose respect. But, at the same time, to never show any sense of anger, sadness, or frustration would make that leader appear void of any emotion at all—a robot. People do not follow robots. (Location 3636)
In some way, suffering ceases to be suffering at the moment it finds a meaning, such as the meaning of a sacrifice.
Distrust leaves you distressed.
All day, murderous bursts of machine gun fire hammered our position, shattering windows and impacting interior walls, each round with the violence and kinetic energy of a sledgehammer wielded at full force. Some of the incoming rounds were (Location 2015)
“We learn to fear triggers that are associated with negative events, whether or not a trigger actually causes a negative experience. When a trigger is paired with a negative event, the amygdala is programmed to produce anxiety”
Total responsibility for failure is a difficult thing to accept, and taking ownership when things go wrong requires extraordinary humility and courage. But doing just that is an absolute necessity to learning, growing as a leader, and improving a team’s performance. (Location 488)
tell them, “If it is really important, someone will tell you.” If something important happens at home, at work, in the country, or in the world, someone else can spend hours following the news for you, and he or she will usually tell you on the first possible occasion.
Then what should we work for?
The first part of the plan went smoothly. People indeed worked harder. But people did not foresee that the number of children would increase, meaning that the extra wheat would have to be shared between more children. Neither did the early farmers understand that feeding children with more porridge and less breast milk would weaken their immune system, and that permanent settlements would be hotbeds for infectious diseases. They did not foresee that by increasing their dependence on a single source of food, they were actually exposing themselves even more to the depredations of drought. Nor did the farmers foresee that in good years their bulging granaries would tempt thieves and enemies, compelling them to start building walls and doing guard duty.
People who are always helping others solve their problems often finds that it’s a bit easier to solve their own problems with all that practice, and when they really get stuck, they usually have several people to turn to. (Location 2568)
“When you experience this amygdala-based control of your brain, you’ll feel unable to control your thoughts. Remember, from an evolutionary standpoint the amygdala’s ability to seize control when it detects danger helped our distant ancestors survive. Therefore, the amygdala has retained this capacity. Still, it’s both disconcerting and frustrating to temporarily lose the ability to decide what to focus on or think about”
Clarity is perhaps the most important concept in personal productivity.
At last he decided to abandon outside advice altogether and seek the solution to the problem of suffering in the place he had begun to suspect it origi-
In such situations, the leaders did not call me and ask me what they should do. Instead, they told me what they were going to do. (Location 2361)
When you’re young, you want to be prolific and make and do things, but you don’t want to measure them in terms of productivity. You want to measure them in terms of extreme performance, you want to measure them in extreme satisfaction.” (Location 7758)
In days of peace the soldier performs maneuvers, throws up earthworks with no enemy in sight, and wearies himself by gratuitous toil, in order that he may be equal to unavoidable toil. (Location 7798)
This is the corporate version of getting a divorce because your spouse squeezes toothpaste from the middle of the tube.
“As a reminder, don’t leave the situation while your fear is still high. If you flee and then feel relief, you’ll teach your amygdala that escape is the answer. This will only increase your anxiety in the future”
Ultimately, man should not ask what the meaning of his life is, but rather he must recognize that it is he who is asked. In a word, each man is questioned by life; and he can only answer to life by answering for his own life; to life he can only respond by being responsible.
“Decreasing the number of times your cortex causes your amygdala to become activated will cut down on your overall anxiety.”
The most important question had been answered: Why? Once I analyzed the mission and understood for myself that critical piece of information, I could then believe in the mission. If I didn’t believe in it, there was no way I could possibly convince the SEALs in my task unit to believe in it. (Location 1054)
“There is never enough time to do everything, but there is always enough time to do the most important thing.”
“When you come to terms with the idea that you need to activate the amygdala’s circuits to generate new associations, you’ve learned an important lesson. We like the pithy phrase “activate to generate” as shorthand for this requirement, which is perhaps the most challenging lesson in the language of the amygdala. It’s challenging because it involves accepting the experience of anxiety as necessary for new learning to occur.”
On TrueFilms.com, Kevin has reviewed the best documentaries he’s seen over decades. The counterpart book series, True Films 3.0, contains the 200 documentaries he feels you should see before you die, and it is available as a PDF on kk.org. Three docs we both love are The King of Kong, Man on Wire, and A State of Mind. (Location 7771)
I will set up a phone call for 10 a.m., and will call precisely at 10 a.m. I will promise to have a letter on somebody's desk by next Monday, and that letter will be there by next Monday. I will show appointment exactly when I said I would.
A friend once told me that killing yourself is like taking your pain, multiplying it by 10, and giving it to the ones who love you. (Location 10030)
the leader is truly and ultimately responsible for everything. (Location 471)
when it comes to performance standards, It’s not what you preach, it’s what you tolerate. (Location 901)
‘Look, Richard, if you work for the awards, you don’t do good work. But if you do good work, the awards will come.’” (Location 9136)
but for a happy existence he needs only a sound and upright soul,
The way in which a man accepts his fate and all the suffering it entails, the way in which he takes up his cross, gives him ample opportunity—even under the most diffcult circumstances—to add a deeper meaning to his life. It may remain brave, dignified and unselfish. Or in the bitter fight for self-preservation he may forget his human dignity and become no more than an animal. Here lies the chance for a man either to make use of or to forgo the opportunities of attaining the moral values that a diffcult situation may afford him. And this decides whether he is worthy of his sufferings or not.
If everyone’s trying to get through that one little door, you’re in the wrong place. (Location 10153)
“All worldly pursuits have but one unavoidable and inevitable end, which is sorrow: acquisitions end in dispersion; buildings, in destruction; meetings, in separation; births, in death.
It was almost always a question of their ability to listen, open their mind, and see that, maybe, there’s a better way to do things. That is from a lack of humility. . . . (Location 6905)
Rule: Resist the temptation to clear up small things first.
“If you would enjoy real freedom, you must be the slave of Philosophy.”
pair of green glasses, everything you see is green.
“Clearly, it’s an effective relaxation strategy, and we’ve spoken to many people who find that incorporating regular meditation into their morning routine decreases their overall anxiety and helps them feel more prepared to cope with the demands of the day.”
The more a habit becomes part of your life, the less you need outside encouragement to follow through. Incentives can start a habit. Identity sustains a habit.
The Cortex(behind forehead) and the Amygdala(at the centre of head) -- are the two pathways (sources) of anxiety
What if I did the opposite of all the other sales guys, just for 48 hours? (Location 9560)
The whole thing used forty-five chips, and Steve paid me half the seven hundred bucks he said they paid him for it. (They were paying us based on how few chips I could do it in.) Later I found out he got paid a bit more for it—like a few thousand dollars—than
I think about the lammergeier seen this morning; in fifteen minutes, in a single glide, the great vulture could go where we have gone in ten hard hours.
Habits like scrolling on our phones, checking email, and watching television steal so much of our time because they can be performed almost without effort. They are remarkably convenient.
The point is to always be moving forward. (Location 2885)
nated: within his own mind.
The upside of habits is that we can do things without thinking.
Consider doing the opposite of what someone expects. Often, it's remarkably effective.
About why all large animals in Australia died as soon as humans appeared in Australia. “Large animals – the primary victims of the Australian extinction – breed slowly. Pregnancy is long, offspring per pregnancy are few, and there are long breaks between pregnancies. Consequently, if humans cut down even one diprotodon every few months, it would be enough to cause diprotodon deaths to”. “the Australian giants had no time to learn to run away. Humans don’t come across as particularly dangerous. They don’t have long, sharp teeth or muscular, lithe bodies. So when a diprotodon, the largest marsupial ever to walk the earth, set eyes for the first time on this frail-looking ape, he gave it one glance and then went back to chewing leaves. These animals had to evolve a fear of humankind, but before they could do so they were gone” Excerpt From Sapiens: A Brief History of Humankind Yuval Noah Harari This material may be protected by copyright. outnumber births. Within a few thousand years the last, lonesome diprotodon would pass away, and with her the entire species”.
Is today’s I better than yesterday’s “I”?
Whatever you experience when you simply rest your attention on whatever's going on in your mind at any given moment is ·~editation. Simply resting in this way is
said, ‘I’m going to tell you a secret in life: You never have to be upset about anything. Everything is for a purpose. (Location 10298)
Implementing a disciplined search method drastically improved our effectiveness and efficiency. (Location 3556)
“What I discovered, which is what many writers discover, is that I write in order to think. I’d say, ‘I think I have an idea,’ but when I begin to write it, I realize, ‘I have no idea,’ and I don’t actually know what I think until I try and write it. . . . That was the revelation.” (Location 7745)
you’re thinking about only yourself. (Location 10285)
That is leading down the chain of command. It requires regularly stepping out of the office and personally engaging in face-to-face conversations with direct reports and observing the frontline troops in action to understand their particular challenges and read them into the Commander’s Intent. (Location 3055)
“The market shapes to an ever-greater degree the way people conduct their romantic and sexual lives. Whereas traditionally the family was the main matchmaker, today it’s the market that tailors our romantic and sexual preferences, and then lends a hand in providing for them – for a fat fee. Previously bride and groom met in the family living room, and money passed from the hands of one father to another. Today courting is done at bars and cafés, and money passes from the hands of lovers to waitresses. Even more money is transferred to the bank accounts of fashion designers, gym managers, dieticians, cosmeticians and plastic surgeons, who help us arrive at the café looking as similar as possible to the markets ideal of beauty.”
There are these two young fish swimming along and they happen to meet an older fish swimming the other way, who nods at them and says “Morning, boys. How’s the water?” And the two young fish swim on for a bit, and then eventually one of them looks over at the other and goes “What the hell is water?”
The more clearly we see things as they are, the more willing and able we become to open our hearts toward other be- ings. When we recognize that others experience pain and unhappiness because they don't recognize their real nature, we're spontaneously moved by a profound wish for ~hem to experience the same sense of peace and clarity that we've begun to know.
Waiting for the 100 percent right and certain solution leads to delay, indecision, and an inability to execute. Leaders must be prepared to make an educated guess based on previous experience, knowledge of how the enemy operates, likely outcomes, and whatever intelligence is available in the immediate moment. (Location 3379)
The difference a tiny improvement can make over time is astounding. Here’s how the math works out: if you can get 1 percent better each day for one year, you’ll end up thirtyseven times better by the time you’re done. Conversely, if you get 1 percent worse each day for one year, you’ll decline nearly down to zero. What starts as a small win or a minor setback accumulates into something much more.
THE BENEFITS OF TREATING THINGS LIKE A “TEST” “I didn’t think anyone was going to see [El Mariachi]. It was really just a test film. That’s (Location 10115)
Just writing good content, consistently, will easily put you in the top 1% of developers—at least in terms of marketing yourself. (Location 2473)
“Your amygdala needs to learn that it’s safe and that escape isn’t necessary. Remember, this is something you must show the amygdala; it only learns through experience”
Energy is precious, and the brain is wired to conserve it whenever possible. It is human nature to follow the Law of Least Effort, which states that when deciding between two similar options, people will naturally gravitate toward the option that requires the least amount of work.
You create a great opportunity to be able to show how effectively you can communicate your ideas and to influence your coworkers and even your boss. (Location 2671)
Motion makes you feel like you’re getting things done. But really, you’re just preparing to get something done. When preparation becomes a form of procrastination, you need to change something. You don’t want to merely be planning. You want to be practicing. If you want to master a habit, the key is to start with repetition, not perfection. You don’t need to map out every feature of a new habit. You just need to practice it. This is the first takeaway of the 3rd Law: you just need to get your reps in.
one understands why “village life” has been celebrated as the natural, happy domain of man by many thinkers from Lao-tzu to Gandhi.
It doesn’t matter if it’s been twentyone days or thirty days or three hundred days. What matters is the rate at which you perform the behavior. You could do something twice in thirty days, or two hundred times. It’s the frequency that makes the difference. Your
The more things we desire and the more we have to do to earn or attain those achievements, the less we actually enjoy our lives—and the less free we are. (Location 414)
One other thing: the Cream Soda Computer turned out to be the way I first met Steve Jobs. I was four years ahead of him in school so I didn’t know him; he was closer to Bill Fernandez’s age. But one day Bill told me, "Hey, there’s someone you should meet. His name is Steve.
you (wrongly) assume that everyone is going to respond with smiles and high-fives, you are going to get slapped, you’ll respond impulsively, and you’ll triple the damage. (Location 8690)
Temptation bundling works by linking an action you want to do with an action you need to do. In Byrne’s case, he bundled watching Netflix (the thing he wanted to do) with riding his stationary bike (the thing he needed to do).
We all tend to learn best by doing and teaching. (Location 2918)
Subconsciously, we should be constantly asking ourselves this question: Do I need to freak out about this?
You often decide what to do next based on what you have just finished doing. Going to the bathroom leads to washing and drying your hands, which reminds you that you need to put the dirty towels in the laundry, so you add laundry detergent to the shopping list, and so on. No behavior happens in isolation. Each action becomes a cue that triggers the next behavior.
“If you help enough people get what they want, you will get what you want.” This is the primary strategy that you should use in marketing yourself. It will be more effective than any other technique. (Location 2528)
that a man’s last thoughts will determine the quality of his reincarnation. Therefore, every moment of life is to be lived calmly, mindfully, as if it were the last, to insure that the most is made of precious human state—the only one in which enlightenment is possible.
'“Even what people take to be their most personal desires are usually programmed by the imagined order. Let’s consider, for example, the popular desire to take a holiday abroad. There is nothing natural or obvious about this. A chimpanzee alpha male would never think of using his power in order to go on holiday into the territory of a neighbouring chimpanzee band. The elite of ancient Egypt spent their fortunes building pyramids and having their corpses mummified, but none of them thought of going shopping in Babylon or taking a skiing holiday in Phoenicia. People today spend a great deal of money on holidays abroad because they are true believers in the myths of romantic consumerism.”
When an event that generates a strong biological response-such as the release of a large amount of adrenaline or other hormones- occurs, th~ hippocampus sends a signal down to the brain stem, where it is stored as a pattern. As a result, many people are able to recall ex- actly where they were and what was going on around them when, for example, they heard about or saw the space shuttle disasters or the as-
The more you repeat a behavior, the more you reinforce the identity associated with that behavior.
Understanding reality is the name of the game. Understanding not only helps us decide which actions to take but helps us remove or avoid actions that have a big downside that we would otherwise not be aware of. Not only do we understand the immediate problem with more accuracy, but we can begin to see the second-, third-, and higher-order consequences. This understanding helps us eliminate avoidable errors. Sometimes making good decisions boils down to avoiding bad ones.
Certainly, you are capable of doing very hard things. The problem is that some days you feel like doing the hard work and some days you feel like giving in. On the tough days, it’s crucial to have as many things working in your favor as possible so that you can overcome the challenges life naturally throws your way. The less friction you face, the easier it is for your stronger self to emerge.
We don’t choose our earliest habits, we imitate them. We follow the script handed down by our friends and family, our church or school, our local community and society at large.
Your effectiveness in a company is directly proportionate to your ability to leverage yourself: How and where can I make the most impact in the least amount of time?'
The present is the same for everyone; its loss is the same for everyone;
Increase the friction associated with bad behaviors. When friction is high, habits are difficult.
A leader must find a way to become effective and drive high performance within his or her team in order to win. (Location 917)
Most men ebb and flow in wretchedness between the fear of death and the hardships of life; they are unwilling to live, and yet they do not know how to die.
how do you become that person whose name comes up when they’re looking for a superhero to save the day? The key is to be able to solve the problems that may arise.
now—is to sit down, set a timer for 15 minutes, and start working. During that 15-minute timer, you have to work. You can’t allow yourself to become distracted; you must focus on the task at hand. After 15 minutes of clear, focused work, you’ll probably find it’s much easier to keep moving forward. It turns out that once we give our undivided attention to something for that long, we end up getting drawn into what we’re doing and we have some motivation to continue. I call this momentum. (Location 1953)
People who have invested a sincere effort in exploring their inner wealth naturally tend to develop a certain kind of fame, respect, and credibility, regardless of their external circumstances. Their conduct in all kinds of situations inspires in others a profound sense of respect, admiration, and trust. Their success in the world has nothing to do with personal ambition or a craving for attention. It doesn't come from owning a nice car or a beautiful home, or having an important job title. It stems, rather, from a spacious and relaxed state of well-being, which allows them to see people.and situations more clearly, but also to maintain a basic sense of happiness regardless of their personal circumstances.
One last piece of advice on setting your rate: if you’re never having any potential client tell you “No” or that your rate is too high, raise it. (Location 1724)
“Why, for example, do people gorge on high-calorie food that is doing little good to their bodies? Today’s affluent societies are in the throes of a plague of obesity, which is rapidly spreading to developing countries. It’s a puzzle why we binge on the sweetest and greasiest food we can find, until we consider the eating habits of our forager forebears. In the savannahs and forests they inhabited, high-calorie sweets were extremely rare and food in general was in short supply. A typical forager 30,000 years ago had access to only one type of sweet food – ripe fruit. If a Stone Age woman came across a tree groaning with figs, the most sensible thing to do was to eat as many of them as she could on the spot, before the local baboon band picked the tree bare. The instinct to gorge on high-calorie food was hard-wired into our genes”
“In an old-fashioned medieval community, when my neighbour was in need, I helped build his hut and guard his sheep, without expecting any payment in return. When I was in need, my neighbour returned the favour. At the same time, the local potentate might have drafted all of us villagers to construct his castle without paying us a penny. In exchange, we counted on him to defend us against brigands and barbarians. Village life involved many transactions but few payments. There were some markets, of course, but their roles were limited. You could buy rare spices, cloth and tools, and hire the services of lawyers and doctors. Yet less than 10 per cent of commonly used products and services were bought in the market. Most human needs were taken care of by the family and the community.”
Prioritize your problems and take care of them one at a time, the highest priority first. Don’t try to do everything at once or you won’t be successful.” (Location 2242)
want to be easier on myself, but I worry that if I do that, I will lose whatever magic, if there is such a thing, that enables me to do what I do.” (Location 8242)
Leif received a situational update from the patrol. He and the young SEAL element leader both communicated with a clear, calm voice, despite the chaos of the situation, just like we had trained. (Location 1847)
The first mistake is never the one that ruins you. It is the spiral of repeated mistakes that follows. Missing once is an accident. Missing twice is the start of a new habit. This is a distinguishing feature between winners and losers.
The essence of his teachings, how- ever, can be reduced to a single point: The mind is the source of all ex- perience, and by changing the direction of the mind, we can change the quality of everything we experience. When you transform your mind, everything you experience is transformed. It's like putting on a pair of yellow glasses: Suddenly, everything you see is yellow. If you put on a
Derek wrote a book called Reasons and Persons, which Will considers one of the most important books written in the 20th century. “FOLLOW (Location 7362)
“Generally, exercise results in decreased muscle tension for at least an hour and a half afterward, and reductions in anxiety last from four to six hours”
It’s about being the type of person who doesn’t miss workouts. It’s easy to train when you feel good, but it’s crucial to show up when you don’t feel like it—even if you do less than you hope. Going to the gym for five minutes may not improve your performance, but it reaffirms your identity.
“Relax. Look around. Make a call.” (Location 143)
Then, after minutes of moving silence, one prisoner said to another, “How beautiful the world could be!”
“By letting others outshine you, you remain in control, instead of being a victim of their insecurity. This will all come in handy the day you decide to rise above your inferior status. If, like Galileo, you can make your master shine even more in the eyes of others, then you are a godsend and you will be instantiy promoted.”
What mattered was that she took the opening and then pressed ahead. That was the reason for her success
Up of twelve months. Every day of each month is made up of twenty- four hours. Every hour is made up of sixty minutes; every minute is made up of sixty seconds; and every second is made up of microsec- onds and nanoseconds. You can break down the present into smaller and smaller increments, but between the instant of present experience and the instant you identify that instant as "now," the moment has al- ready passed. It's no longer now. It's then.
But how foolish men are now! They whisper the basest of prayers to heaven; but if anyone listens, they are silent at once.
when someone acts in some way or says something that is against our wishes, we're able to have some basis for understanding: "Oh, well, this person (or what-
The secret to maximizing your odds of success is to choose the right field of competition. This is just as true with habit change as it is with sports and business. Habits are easier to perform, and more satisfying to stick with, when they align with your natural inclinations and abilities.
“Level two chaos is chaos that reacts to predictions about it, and therefore can never be predicted accurately. Markets, for example, are a level two chaotic system. What will happen if we develop a computer program that forecasts with 100 per cent accuracy the price of oil tomorrow? The price of oil will immediately react to the forecast, which would consequently fail to materialise. If the current price of oil is $90 a barrel, and the infallible computer program predicts that tomorrow it will be $100, traders will rush to buy oil so that they can profit from the predicted price rise. As a result, the price will shoot up to $100 a barrel today rather than tomorrow. Then what will happen tomorrow? Nobody knows”
His ability to feel at ease with people-and put them at their ease, without being pushy.
Coco Chanel once said that if a person is poorly dressed, you  notice the dress, and if he/she's impeccably dressed, you notice the person.
“But we had two choices,” I said. “Throw our hands up in frustration and do nothing, or figure out how to most effectively operate within the constraints required of us. We chose the latter. (Location 3202)
But looking back on literally every such disaster, not a single one has made a lasting, noticeable impact on me or my career. So, as panicked or depressed or upset as I’ve gotten over these seemingly disastrous situations, not one has been a true disaster.
Perhaps the biggest tragedy in our lives is that freedom is possible, yet we can pass our years trapped in the same old patterns. (Location 9843)
Simply put, forget what you have done for the world.
One of the best ways to build a new habit is to identify a current habit you already do each day and then stack your new behavior on top. This is called habit stacking.
did love my job at Electroglas. I got to stand up all
Is this “I” the kind of “I” you intended to become?
My boat crew at times had struggled to perform, until I figured out that I had to put myself in the most difficult position at the front of the boat and lead. (Location 732)
“There’s no way to change the circuitry the lateral nucleus has created without giving the amygdala new experiences with a cat and, as a consequence, creating some anxiety. In fact, the child’s anxiety is a good indication that the correct circuits in the amygdala have been activated and are ready for new learning.”
He’s a mediocre performer with a bad attitude. So what if he has high potential! Right now, he’s not showing it. The company doesn’t make money because of potential. Shareholders don’t hang onto investments if their potential isn’t met. Furthermore, his attitude makes his managers want to stop investing in him.
Your ability to control your thoughts-treat it with respect. It's all that protects your mind from false perceptions.
Our inward power, when it obeys nature, reacts to events by accommodating itself to what it faces-to what is possible. It needs no specific material. It pursues its own aims as circumstances allow; it turns obstacles into fuel. As a fire overwhelms what would have quenched a lamp. What's thrown on top of the conflagration is absorbed, consumed by it-and makes it burn still higher.
Reflection and review enables the longterm improvement of all habits because it makes you aware of your mistakes and helps you consider possible paths for improvement. Without reflection, we can make excuses, create rationalizations, and lie to ourselves. We have no process for determining whether we are
A craving is just a specific manifestation of a deeper underlying motive. Your brain did not evolve with a desire to smoke cigarettes or to check Instagram or to play video games. At a deep level, you simply want to reduce uncertainty and relieve anxiety, to win social acceptance and approval, or to achieve status.
“The flowering of the consumerist ethic is manifested most clearly in the food market. Traditional agricultural societies lived in the awful shade of starvation. In the affluent world of today one of the leading health problems is obesity, which strikes the poor (who stuff themselves with hamburgers and pizzas) even more severely than the rich (who eat organic salads and fruit smoothies). Each year the US population spends more money on diets than the amount needed to feed all the hungry people in the rest of the world. Obesity is a double victory for consumerism. Instead of eating little, which will lead to economic contraction, people eat too much and then buy diet products – contributing to economic growth twice over.”
you ask your girlfriend or your wife, ‘What did we do last year on your birthday?’ They won’t remember. A year goes by and you will not remember the details. You go back and you see the journals, it’s even better the second time. You live through it again and you realize the importance of it.” (Location 10212)
Our habits are not solely determined by our personalities, but there is no doubt that our genes nudge us in a certain direction. Our deeply rooted preferences make certain behaviors easier for some people than for others.
We tend to adopt habits that are praised and approved of by our culture because we have a strong desire to fit in and belong to the tribe.
The secret of the mountains is that the mountains simply exist, as I do myself: the mountains exist simply, which I do not. The mountains have no “meaning”, they are meaning; the mountains are.
declared that too much “possibility” led to the madhouse.
And if you’re still breathing, that means you’ve still got some fight left in you. So get up, dust off, reload, recalibrate, re-engage, and go out on the attack. And that, right there, is about as good as it gets. (Location 10329)
the way you do anything is the way you do everything.” (Location 7911)
The joy of the book is in the pages that you haven't yet read. The glory of life is in the chapters to come. Place a comma in the present and move on. Save your future from the clutches of your past.
“American plantations in places such as Virginia, Haiti and Brazil were plagued by malaria and yellow fever, which had originated in Africa. Africans had acquired over the generations a partial genetic immunity to these diseases, whereas Europeans were totally defenceless and died in droves. It was consequently wiser for a plantation owner to invest his money in an African slave than in a European slave or indentured labourer. Paradoxically, genetic superiority (in terms of immunity) translated into social inferiority: precisely because Africans were fitter in tropical climates than Europeans, they ended up as the slaves of European masters!”
each individual stick to their area of special competence, and be very reluctant to stray. For when we stray too far, we get into areas where we don’t even know what we don’t know. We may not even know the questions we need to ask.
“However, if you’re a top executive earning $250,000 a year and you win $1 million in the lottery, or your company board suddenly decides to double your salary, your surge is likely to last only a few weeks”
Improvement is not just about learning habits, it’s also about finetuning
“Today, a single affluent family generally has more timepieces at home than an entire medieval country. You can tell the time by looking at your wristwatch, glancing at your Android, peering at the alarm clock by your bed, gazing at the clock on the kitchen wall, staring at the microwave, catching a glimpse of the TV or DVD, or taking in the taskbar on your computer out of the corner of your eye. You need to make a conscious effort not to know what time it is”
Aworker is asked: “Why did you do it this way?” The answer, “Because that’s the way we’ve always done things.” The answer frustrates every good boss and sets the mouth of every entrepreneur watering. (Location 301)
The most practical way to change who you are is to change what you do.
You need to have existing long-term clients that you can count on for future business and you need a steady stream of new clients coming in the door. (Location 1637)
The more attractive an opportunity is, the more likely it is to become habitforming.
Awaken; return to yourself. Now, no longer asleep, knowing they were only dreams, clear-headed again, treat everything around you as a dream.
“People who are diagnosed with chronic illness such as diabetes are usually depressed for a while, but if the illness does not get worse they adjust to their new condition and rate their happiness as highly as healthy people do”
The greatest threat to success is not failure but boredom. We get bored with habits because they stop delighting us. The outcome becomes expected. And as our habits become ordinary, we start derailing our progress to seek novelty.
“When the amount of people and property in a particular society crossed a critical threshold, it became necessary to store and process large amounts of mathematical data. Since the human brain could not do it, the system collapsed. For thousands of years after the Agricultural Revolution, human social networks remained relatively small and simple”
Already, our confidence had grown because we were briefing what we truly knew and understood and what we knew our platoon members also completely understood. (Location 2877)
Our habits are not solely determined by our personalities, but there is no doubt that our genes nudge us in a certain direction. Our deeply rooted preferences make certain behaviors easier for some people than for others. You don’t have to apologize for these differences or feel guilty
Establishing an effective and repeatable planning process is critical to the success of any team.” (Location 2795)
Reflection and review enables the longterm improvement of all habits because it makes you aware of your mistakes and helps you consider possible paths for improvement. Without reflection, we can make excuses, create rationalizations, and lie to ourselves. We have no process for determining whether we are performing better or worse compared to yesterday.
One of the most satisfying feelings is the feeling of making progress.
you should always read standard authors; and when you crave a change, fall back upon those whom you read before.
When it comes down to it, you have to do what you have to do, but always try to put yourself in positions where you have the upper hand or are at least on equal footing, whenever possible. (Location 1470)
shall never forget how I was roused one night by the groans of a fellow prisoner, who threw himself about in his sleep, obviously having a horrible nightmare. Since I had always been especially sorry for people who suffered from fearful dreams or deliria, I wanted to wake the poor man. Suddenly I drew back the hand which was ready to shake him, frightened at the thing I was about to do. At that moment I became intensely conscious of the fact that no dream, no matter how horrible, could be as bad as the reality of the camp which surrounded us, and to which I was about to recall him.
“Take a deep breath, making a point of expanding your lungs as you inhale deeply and slowly. Don’t hold your breath. Allow yourself to exhale naturally. Some people feel a reduction in anxiety almost immediately when they do this for several minutes. Merely altering your breathing and adopting a slow rhythm of deep breathing can be soothing and relieve stress.”
But if we look at ourselves in a mirror, we can see that this "I" has changed over time.
Irrespective of what happened to you yesterday, irrespective of what you did to the world or what the world did to you, you have to wake up every morning and trust this world all over again.
“Somebody born with an average of level five happiness would never dance wildly in the streets. But a good marriage should enable her to enjoy level seven from time to time, and to avoid the despondency of level three.”
‘Our team made a mistake and it’s my fault. It’s my fault because I obviously wasn’t as clear as I should have been in explaining why we have these procedures in place and how not following them can cost the company hundreds of thousands of dollars. You are an extremely skilled and knowledgeable superintendent. You know more about this business than I ever will. It was up to me to make sure you know the parameters we have to work within and why some decisions have got to be run through me. Now, I need to fix this so it doesn’t happen again.’” (Location 1466)
There are no Control-Zs in life. Nothing can be undone.
The Cardinal Rule of Behavior Change: What is immediately rewarded is repeated. What is immediately punished is avoided.
Teams must be careful to avoid target fixation on a single issue. They cannot fail to recognize when the highest priority task shifts to something else. (Location 2199)
“The problem, according to Buddhism, is that our feelings are no more than fleeting vibrations, changing every moment, like the ocean waves. If five minutes ago I felt joyful and purposeful, now these feelings are gone, and I might well feel sad and dejected. So if I want to experience pleasant feelings, I have to constantly chase them, while driving away the unpleasant feelings. Even if I succeed, I immediately have to start all over again, without ever getting any lasting reward for my troubles”
What I realized that day was people are starving for something authentic. (Location 8964)
Imagine you're a treasure hunter. One day you discover a chunk of metal in the ground. You dig a hole, pull out the metal, take it home, and start to clean it. At first, one comer· of the nugget reveals itself,
When you talk about a relationship with a good past and not so good present, control the investment of time and communication in that relationship but continue to cherish the emotional memory of those relationships. Thus you no more suffer hurt in the present but still cherish the golden times of the past.
“It’s very interesting to observe who the top competitors pick out when they’re five rounds into the sparring sessions and they’re completely gassed. The ones who are on the steepest growth curve look for the hardest guy there—the one who might beat them up—while others look for someone they can take a break on.” (Location 9377)
The best you can do is just to get out of the way so it comes through. (Location 10234)
It is one of the most complex strategies to pull off correctly. As a leader, it takes strength to let go. It takes faith and trust in subordinate, frontline leaders and their abilities. (Location 2572)
“At the time of the Cognitive Revolution, the planet was home to about 200 genera of large terrestrial mammals weighing over fifty kilograms. At the time of the Agricultural Revolution, only about a hundred remained. Homo sapiens drove to extinction about half of the planet’s big beasts long before humans invented the wheel, writing, or iron tools”
Don't Go One-By-One With tne Boss.
The mission must explain the overall purpose and desired result, or “end state,” of the operation. The frontline troops tasked with executing the mission must understand the deeper purpose behind the mission. (Location 2717)
One massively successful private equity investor I know uses an Excel spreadsheet to display his own death countdown clock. Memento mori—remember that you’re going to die. It’s a great way to remember to live. (Location 7740)
‘Appreciate what’s good about this moment. Don’t always think that you’re on a permanent journey. Stop and enjoy the view.’ . . . (Location 8000)
Most positions in a company are three-quarters functional, meaning the set responsibilities and duties that came with it, and one-quarter personal style. The degree to which you can stretch this 25% is the degree by which you will stand out in your company.
“Well-meaning family members and friends, and sometimes even people struggling with anxiety, often think logic and reason should change the way the anxious person reacts. But, of course, the amygdala isn’t logical”
you’re having trouble changing your habits, the problem isn’t you. The problem is your system. Bad habits repeat themselves again and again not because you don’t want to change, but because you have the wrong system for change. You do not rise to the level of your goals. You fall to the level of your systems.
Everyone said handwashing was important, but few people made a habit out of it. The problem wasn’t knowledge. The problem was consistency.
“If you leave the situation, your amygdala will learn to escape the situation rather than learning that the situation is safe”
The Four Laws of Behavior Change are a simple set of rules we can use to build better habits. They are (1) make it obvious, (2) make it attractive, (3) make it easy, and (4) make it satisfying.
harp on this quite a bit, but most developers should have a blog. A blog is an excellent way to do inbound marketing, because you can publish articles on your blog that get people to go there and read your content. (Location 1658)
“I think you should try to slay dragons. I don’t care how big the opponent is. We read about and admire the people who did things that were basically considered to be impossible. That’s what makes the world a better place to live.” (Location 7962)
“Until you make the unconscious conscious, it will direct your life and you will call it fate.”
I can guarantee that if you manage to start a habit and keep sticking to it, there will be days when you feel like quitting. When you start a business, there will be days when you don’t feel like showing up. When you’re at the gym, there will be sets that you don’t feel like finishing. When it’s time to write, there will be days that you don’t feel like typing. But stepping up when it’s annoying or painful or draining to do so, that’s what makes the difference
We are more likely to repeat a behavior when the experience is satisfying. This is entirely logical. Feelings of pleasure—even minor ones like washing your hands with soap that smells nice and lathers well—are signals that tell the brain: “This feels good. Do this again, next time.” Pleasure teaches your brain that a behavior is worth remembering and repeating.
To unburden yourself of your past, first and foremost, embrace forgiveness. One of the most selfish things you can do in life is to forgive the other and thus liberate yourself from the clutches of hatred.
We try to concentrate while using a smartphone filled with distractions. It doesn’t have to be this way. We can remove the points of friction that hold us back.
You see how few things you have to do to live a satisfying and reverent life? If you can manage this, that's all even the gods can ask of you.
You don’t have to build the
The more energy required, the less likely it is to occur. If your goal is to do a hundred pushups per day, that’s a lot of energy! In the beginning, when you’re motivated and excited, you can muster the strength to get started. But after a few days, such a massive effort feels exhausting. Meanwhile, sticking to the habit of doing one pushup per day requires almost no energy to get started. And the less energy a habit requires, the more likely it is to occur.
The human mind knows how to get along with others. It wants to get along with others. This is our natural mode. You can override it—you can choose to ignore the group or to stop caring what other people think—but it takes work. Running against the grain of your culture requires extra effort.
His searching questions at meetings.A kind of singlemindedness, almost, never content with first impressions, or breaking off the discussion prematurely.
Leverage your attendance at meetings and your appointments to committees.
Habit formation is the process by which a behavior becomes progressively more automatic through repetition. The more you repeat an activity, the more the structure of your brain changes to become efficient at that activity. Neuroscientists call this longterm potentiation, which refers to the strengthening of connections between neurons in the brain based on recent patterns of activity. With each repetition, celltocell signaling improves and the neural connections tighten.
The quickest way to make a lasting negative impression is to waste someone's time: use it cavalierly, or take up more of it than you need.
“Find something active you can do, even if it’s just calling someone on the phone. In fact, social activities that involve enjoyable interactions with others, or simple pleasurable activities that distract you from your worries, can keep your amygdala from creating responses characterized by freezing, avoidance, and immobilization.”
.bright·and shining. Gradually, as you wash away the accumulated dirt and mud, the whole chunk is revealed as gold. So let me ask: Which is more valuable-the chunk of gold buried in mud, or the one you cleaned? Actually, the value is equal. Any difference between the dirty nugget and the clean is superficial.
If you're an employee you must figure out a way to let the true decisionmakers know how good you really are, without making enemies of the people in between.
Don’t ask your leader what you should do, tell them what you are going to do. (Location 3177)
“What you choose to work on, and who you choose to work with, are far more important than how hard you work.” (Location 8924)
Starting in the 1970s, scientists began to ask: what are the first principles of meat? The answers generally include taste, texture, smell, and use in cooking. Do you know what is not a first principle of meat? Once being a part of an animal. Perhaps most important to consumers is the taste. Less important is whether it was actually once part of a cow.
Simply put, a professional is someone who takes their responsibilities and career seriously and is willing to make the tough choices that have to be made—often at their own expense—for the purpose of doing what they know is right. (Location 1407)
“For everyone: How to Win Friends and Influence People by Dale Carnegie. For females: West with the Night by Beryl Markham. For males: The Right Stuff by Tom Wolfe. That’s a good start for a journey.” (Location 8178)
“Free education is abundant, all over the Internet. It’s the desire to learn that’s scarce.” (Location 8925)
“What is the most valuable use of my time right now?”
If you can embrace this without fear or expectation-can find fulfillment in what you're doing now, as Nature intended, and in superhuman truthfulness (every word, every utterance)-then your life will be happy. No one can prevent that.
Above point same are a bunch of Hindus getting together and fighting other religion together. Today a bunch of Indians fight against Pakistan. The "imagined community" which was Religion earlier, not it is Nations! This is a way of a bunch of people ruling over other. Group them together and give them a sense of community..
“So, for example, if you’re trying to get over a fear of elevators, the most effective approach is to ride a variety of elevators in different settings.”
This is where simplicity is key. If the plan is simple enough, everyone understands it, which means each person can rapidly adjust and modify what he or she is doing. If the plan is too complex, the team can’t make rapid adjustments to it, because there is no baseline understanding of (Location 1978)
making sure that the power within stays safe and free from assault, superior to pleasure and pain, doing nothing randomly or dishonestly and with imposture, not dependent on anyone else's doing something or not doing it. And making sure that it what happens and what it is dealt as coming from the same accepts place it came from. And above all, that it accepts death in a cheerful spirit.
“As a leader, it is up to you to explain the bigger picture to him—and to all your front line leaders. That is a critical component of leadership,” I replied. (Location 1457)
“it is critical that the troops grasp how what they do connects to the bigger picture. Your superintendent may not have really understood how his failure to follow procedure and get approval for these changes would result in hundreds of thousands of dollars lost. Do you think that is possible?” (Location 1452)
The further we are from the results of our decisions, the easier it is to keep our current views rather than update them. When you put your hand on a hot stove, you quickly learn the natural consequence. You pay the price for your mistakes. Since you are a pain-avoiding creature, you update your view
“Science is a very expensive affair. A biologist seeking to understand the human immune system requires laboratories, test tubes, chemicals and electron microscopes, not to mention lab assistants, electricians, plumbers and cleaners. An economist seeking to model credit markets must buy computers, set up giant databanks and develop complicated data-processing programs. An archaeologist who wishes to understand the behaviour of archaic hunter-gatherers must travel to distant lands, excavate ancient ruins and date fossilised bones and artefacts. All of this costs money. Hence government had to consciously decide where it has to invest. ”
A piece of wood held too close to the eye would cover the entire sun. Hold it at a distance, and it is just an insignificant piece of wood. Any issue, if taken to the heart, is sure to hurt.
WHAT MAKES A GOOD COMMANDER? “The immediate answer that comes to mind is ‘humility.’ Because you’ve got to be humble, and you’ve got to be coachable. . . . (Location 6901)
The ultimate purpose of habits is to solve the problems of life with as little energy and effort as possible.
And if for some reason you cannot rest your mind, you can simply observe whatever thoughts, feelings, or sensations come up, hang out for a couple of seconds, and then disappear, and acknowledge, "Oh, that's what's going on in my mind right now.
“the best thing fire did was cook. Foods that humans cannot digest in their natural forms – such as wheat, rice and potatoes – became staples of our diet thanks to cooking. Fire not only changed food’s chemistry, it changed its biology as well. Cooking killed germs and parasites that infested food. Humans also had a far easier time chewing and digesting old favourites such as fruits, nuts, insects and carrion if they were cooked. Whereas chimpanzees spend five hours a day chewing raw food, a single hour suffices for people eating cooked food. The advent of cooking enabled humans to eat more kinds of food, to devote less time to eating, and to make do with smaller teeth and shorter intestines. Some scholars believe there is a direct link between the advent of cooking, the shortening of the human intestinal track, and the growth of the human brain. Since long intestines and large brains are both massive energy consumers, it’s hard to have both. By shortening the intestines and decreasing their energy consumption, cooking inadvertently opened the way to the jumbo brains of Neanderthals and Sapiens” Excerpt From Sapiens: A Brief History of Humankind Yuval Noah Harari This material may be protected by copyright.
If you have to eat a live frog at all, it doesn’t pay to sit and look at it for very long.
When you have repeated a story to yourself for years, it is easy to slide into these mental grooves and accept them as a fact. In time, you begin to resist certain actions because “that’s not who I am.” There is internal pressure to maintain your selfimage and behave in a way that is consistent with your beliefs. You find whatever way you can to avoid contradicting yourself.
objectively scientific perspective, the practices actually work: that feelings of limitation, anxiety, fear, and so on are just so much neu- ronal gossip. They are, in essence, habits. And h~bits can be un: learned.
If you don't try to stop whatever is going on in your mind, but merely observe it, eventually you'll begin to feel a tremendous sense of relaxation, a vast sense of openness within your mind- which is in fact your natural mind, the naturally unperturbed back- ground against which various thoughts come and go. At the same time, you'll be awakening new neuronal pathways, which, as they grow
“On one level, wisdom is nothing more than the ability to take your own advice. It’s actually very easy to give people good advice. It’s very hard to follow the advice that you know is good. . . . If someone came to me with my list of problems, I would be able to sort that person out very easily.” (Location 7452)
The partner you pick will directly or indirectly decide your free time, work, finances and most importantly, your happiness.
Frankl would have argued that we are never left with nothing as long as we retain the freedom to choose how we will respond.
If you want to make a habit a big part of your life, make the cue a big part of your environment. The most persistent behaviors usually have multiple cues.
when you’re frustrated in pursuit of your own goals, don’t sit there and complain that you don’t have what you want or that this obstacle won’t budge. If you haven’t even tried yet, then of course you will still be in the exact same place. You haven’t actually pursued anything.
With my leaders running their teams and handling the tactical decisions, it made my job much easier by enabling me to focus on the bigger picture. (Location 2364)
The road less traveled is the road of delayed gratification. If you’re willing to wait for the rewards, you’ll face less competition and often get a bigger payoff. As the saying goes, the last mile is always the least crowded.
That even though I was often upset with Rusticus I never did anything I would have regretted later.
Khaled Hosseini wrote The Kite Runner in the early mornings before working as a full-time doctor. Paul Levesque (page 128) often works out at midnight. If it’s truly important, schedule it. As Paul might ask you, “Is that a dream or a goal?” If it isn’t on the calendar, it isn’t real. (Location 9870)
The only way to use the inspiration of other artists is if you submerge yourself in the greatest works of all time. . . . (Location 8258)
“There’s a freedom [in] limitations. It’s almost more freeing to know I’ve got to use only these items: (Location 10127)
It is a peculiarity of man that he can only live by looking to the future—sub
I want all of them to not have enough money, not enough time, so that we’re forced to be more creative. (Location 10146)
Specialization is a powerful way to overcome the “accident” of bad genetics. The more you master a specific skill, the harder it becomes for others to compete with you. Many
If you have to eat two frogs, eat the ugliest one first.
Just because the conditions aren’t exactly to your liking, or you don’t feel ready yet, doesn’t mean you get a pass. If you want momentum, you’ll have to create it yourself, right now, by getting up and getting started.
“although we don’t consciously control our rate of breathing most of the time, we can deliberately modify it if we choose to do so. A variety of techniques have been developed for activating the parasympathetic nervous system (PNS), which reverses many of the effects the central nucleus creates by activating the SNS. As mentioned in chapter 1, whereas activation of the SNS creates the fight, flight, or freeze response, the action of the PNS is often referred to as “rest and digest.” It slows heart rate and increases secretion of gastric juices and insulin as well as activity of the intestines.”
“One of history’s few iron laws is that luxuries tend to become necessities and to spawn new obligations. Once people get used to a certain luxury, they take it for granted. Then they begin to count on it. Finally they reach a point where they can’t live without it.”
Second-order thinking is thinking farther ahead and thinking holistically. It requires us to not only consider our actions and their immediate consequences, but the subsequent effects of those actions as well. Failing to consider the second- and third-order effects can unleash disaster.
“fix” someone’s problem, you very often just need to empathically listen to them. (Location 6714)
“In the middle of [a meditation session], the idea for Chef hit me, and I let myself stop, which I don’t usually do, and I took out a pad. I scribbled down like eight pages of ideas and thoughts, [and then I] left it alone. (Location 9544)
Even today, a critical threshold in human organisations falls somewhere around this magic number. Below this threshold, communities, businesses, social networks and military units can maintain themselves based mainly on intimate acquaintance and rumour-mongering. There is no need for formal ranks, titles and law books to keep order”
The way to become a generalist is to not label yourself with a specific role or technology. We can become typecast in our careers in many ways.
The largest portion of your success as a blogger will depend on one thing and one thing only: consistency. I’ve talked to many successful bloggers and they’ve all had one thing in common: they blog a lot. (Location 2449)
“The new capitalist elite is made up not of dukes and marquises, but of board chairmen, stock traders and industrialists. These magnates are far richer than the medieval nobility, but they are far less interested in extravagant consumption, and they spend a much smaller part of their profits on non-productive activities.”
command. I should have given greater ownership of plans to the troops—especially those who were negative and weren’t fully committed to the mission. (Location 3036)
The people who get ahead have a need, are driven to perform a task well, no matter what the task is or how mundane it may actually be. They bring to any job an attitude which actually transforms the job into something greater.
This Decentralized Command structure allowed me, as the commander, to maintain focus on the bigger picture: (Location 2286)
“Frame your thoughts like this—you are an old person, you won’t let yourself be enslaved by this any longer, no longer pulled like a puppet by every impulse, and you’ll stop complaining about your present fortune or dreading the future.” (Location 493)
and the onions seem much heavier than, in their onion nature, they have any right to
What injures the hive injures the bee.
Be prepared for criticism, but don’t be afraid of it. (Location 2876)
When jarred, unavoidably, by circumstances, revert at once to yourself, and don't lose the rhythm more than you can help. You'll have a better grasp of the harmony within yourself.
I think authenticity is one of the most lacking things out there these days.” (Location 2962)
Pointing-and-calling is a safety system designed to reduce mistakes. It is so effective because it raises the level of awareness from a nonconscious habit to a more conscious level. My wife does something similar. Whenever we are walking out of door, she verbally call out the most essential items in her packing list. "I have got my keys, I have got my wallet, I have got my glasses"
“Repeated exposure to a seemingly threatening situation without anything negative occurring can teach the amygdala that the situation doesn’t require a fearful response. You can overcome fears if you give your amygdala experiences that teach it to feel safe in related situations. This is the power of exposure”
Similarly, one study found that the higher your best friend’s IQ at age eleven or twelve, the higher your IQ would be at age fifteen, even after controlling for natural levels of intelligence. We soak up the qualities and practices of those around us.
“Of course, whenever we try to change our thougmodify the cortex in some way. Our thoughts are not simply a result of neurological and chemical processes in the brain; they are the neurological and chemical processes in the brain. In cognitive restructuring, the thoughts you think are used to rewire your brain.”
“We know that people are not equal biologically! But if we believe that we are all equal in essence, it will enable us to create a stable and prosperous society.’ I have no argument with that. This is exactly what I mean by ‘imagined order’. We believe in a particular order not because it is objectively true, but because believing in it enables us to cooperate effectively and forge a better society. Imagined orders are not evil conspiracies or useless mirages. Rather, they are the only way large numbers of humans can cooperate effectively.”
Something happens to you. Good. It was meant for you by nature, woven into the pattern from the beginning.
Other people's certainty that what he said was what he thought, and what he did was done without malice.
you should have a running list of three people that you’re always watching: someone senior to you that you want to emulate, a peer who you think is better at the job than you are and who you respect, and someone subordinate who’s doing the job you did—one, two, or three years ago—better than you did it. If (Location 7211)
The human soul degrades itself: ii. When it turns its back on another person or sets out to do it harm, as the souls of the angry do. iii. When it is overpowered by pleasure or pain. iv. When it puts on a mask and does or says something artificial or false. v. When it allows its action and impulse to be without a purpose, to be random and disconnected: even the smallest things ought to be directed toward a goal.
If and when you finally land the big promotion you’ve been dreaming about, you’ll quickly grow tired and realize that it’s not this job you were meant for—it’s the next one. The cycle begins again
ending the work day with very high quality, which for one thing means you’re internalizing quality overnight.” (Location 9341)
Think continually of different ways that you can save, schedule, and consolidate large chunks of time. Use these times to work on important tasks with the most significant long-term consequences.
‘The secrets to life are hidden behind the word “cliché.”’ So any time you hear something that you think is a cliché, my tip to you is to perk your ears up and listen more carefully.” (Location 7290)
For example, children who were regularly humiliated and criticized by
I long to let go, drift free of things, to accumulate less, depend on less, to move more simply.
“It almost always happens that when the immediate consequence is favorable,
“Cease to hope,” he says, “and you will cease to fear.”
Without trust there is no peace.
“Whatever you devote a great deal of time to thinking about or think about in great detail is more likely to be strengthened in your cortex. The circuits in the brain operate on the principle of “survival of the busiest” (Schwartz and Begley 2003, 17), and whatever circuitry you use repetitively is likely to be very easily activated in the future.”
Chris maintained discipline and stayed vigilant. (Location 3251)
If I observed every thought, feeling, and sensation that passed through my mind, the illusion of a limited self would dissolve, to be replaced by a sense of awareness that is much more calm, spacious, and serene.
“For example, you might have a mild dislike of a certain type of food that was associated with a negative experience, such as egg salad that you ate during a stressful family picnic. On the other hand, if you once ate pancakes when you had an illness that later caused you to throw up, you might find that, even years later, just the smell of pancakes makes you nauseous.”
Those who are not willing to heal themselves. Those who do not want to know their deeper parts.Those who are not okay and do nothing to change it.Those who do not want to have difficult conversations with themselves.
When it comes to habits, the key takeaway is this: dopamine is released not only when you experience pleasure, but also when you anticipate it.
the more you say no to the things that don’t matter, the more you can say yes to the things that do. (Location 168)
The Century of the Self has been recommended to me by several podcast guests. (Location 9079)
It is not the mistake itself but how a mistake is handled that forms the lasting impression.
My advice in this situation is to go ahead and do what you need to do to get by, but never let yourself get in this kind of situation again. It’s easy to get trapped into situations where you need a job, but when you get trapped in those situations you limit your own options and allow people to exercise great power over you. (Location 1465)
The people with the best selfcontrol are typically the ones who need to use it the least. It’s easier to practice selfrestraint when you don’t have to use it very often. So, yes, perseverance, grit, and willpower are essential to success, but the way to improve these qualities is not by wishing you were a more disciplined person, but by creating a more disciplined environment. This counterintuitive idea makes even more sense once you understand what happens when a habit is formed in the brain. A habit that has been encoded in the mind is ready to be used whenever the relevant situation arises. When Patty Olwell, a therapist from Austin, Texas, started smoking, she would often light up while riding horses with a friend. Eventually, she quit smoking and avoided it for years. She had also stopped riding. Decades later, she hopped on a horse again and found herself craving a cigarette for the first time in forever. The cues were still internalized; she just hadn’t been exposed to them in a long time. Once a habit has been encoded, the urge to act follows whenever the environmental cues reappear. This is one reason behavior change techniques can backfire. Shaming obese people with weightloss presentations can make them feel stressed, and as a result many people return to their favorite coping strategy: overeating. Showing pictures of blackened lungs to smokers leads to higher levels of anxiety, which drives many people to reach for a cigarette. If you’re not careful about cues, you can cause the very behavior you want to stop.
focusing on something very small in a field (whether chess, martial arts, or elsewhere) to internalize extremely powerful macro principles that apply everywhere. (Location 9310)
Surround yourself with people who have the habits you want to have yourself.
Nearly any larger life goal can be transformed into a twominute behavior. I want to live a healthy and long life > I need to stay in shape > I need to exercise > I need to change into my workout clothes.
Time, communication and emotions are the three investments that are needed to groom a relationship.
“You must experience fear or anxiety in order to conquer it. There’s more than cowboy wisdom in the old adage “You gotta get back on the horse that threw you.”
plan—you’ve got a problem and you develop a way to solve that problem—you fall in love with it. You start to dismiss the shortcomings of it, simply because, I think, that’s the way the mind works. . . . (Location 7185)
To improve something, we need to understand why it is successful or not. Otherwise, we are just copying thoughts or behaviors without understanding why they worked. First principles thinking helps us avoid the problem of relying on someone else’s tactics without understanding the rationale behind them. Even incremental improvement is harder to achieve if we can’t identify the first principles.
Environment is the invisible hand that shapes human behavior. Despite our unique personalities, certain behaviors tend to arise again and again under certain environmental conditions. In church, people tend to talk in whispers. On a dark street, people act wary and guarded. In this way, the most common form of change is not internal, but external: we are changed by the world around us. Every habit is context dependent.
In the concentration camps, for example, in this living laboratory and on this testing ground, we watched and witnessed some of our comrades behave like swine while others behaved like saints. Man has both potentialities within himself; which one is actualized depends on decisions but not on conditions.
How do I deal with setbacks, failures, delays, defeat, or other disasters? I actually have a fairly simple way of dealing with these situations. There is one word to deal with all those situations, and that is: “good.” (Location 10306)
Early on, it’s all sacrifice. You’ve gone to the gym a few times, but you’re not stronger or fitter or faster—at least, not in any noticeable sense. It’s only months later, once you shed a few pounds or your arms gain some definition, that it becomes easier to exercise for its own sake. In the beginning, you need a reason to stay on track. This is why immediate rewards are essential. They keep you excited while the delayed rewards accumulate in the background.
Never expect gratitude. Never forget what the world has done for you. Never fail to express gratitude.
“Go to all the meetings you can, even if you’re not invited to them, and figure out how to be helpful. (Location 2914)
“The specific circuitry in your brain develops based on the experiences you have. Perhaps your brain came to associate horses with stables, grandfathers with cigars, the smell of popcorn with baseball, and so on. Although two people may share similar associations, each of us has uniquely formed brain circuits based on our own experiences. While one person may have circuitry that associates cows with cheese and Wisconsin, another person may have circuitry that associates cows with barns and milking machines.”
Even when you know you should start small, it’s easy to start too big. When you dream about making a change, excitement inevitably takes over and you end up trying to do too much too soon. The most effective way I know to counteract this tendency is to use the TwoMinute Rule, which states, “When you start a new habit, it should take less than two minutes to do.”
survival requires a certain amount of physical nurturing.1 We need to. be
“I strongly encourage writers not to think about writing every time they do something. Forget notebooks. Forget taking notes. Let what is important remain. What’s not important goes away. (Location 8362)
When making choices, considering consequences can help us avoid future problems. We must ask ourselves the critical question: And then what?
they can’t get that first thing they saw out of their heads, (Location 10197)
Habit stacking works best when the cue is highly specific and immediately actionable. Many people select cues that are too vague. I made this mistake myself. When I wanted to start a pushup habit, my habit stack was “When I take a break for lunch, I will do ten pushups.” At first glance, this sounded reasonable. But soon, I realized the trigger was unclear. Would I do my pushups before I ate lunch? After I ate lunch? Where would I do them? After a few inconsistent days, I changed my habit stack to: “When I close my laptop for lunch, I will do ten pushups next to my desk.”
“The castle rarely contained private rooms for children (or anyone else, for that matter). The teenage son of a medieval baron did not have a private room on the castle’s second floor, with posters of Richard the Lionheart and King Arthur on the walls and a locked door that his parents were not allowed to open. He slept alongside many other youths in a large hall. He was always on display and always had to take into account what others saw and said. Someone growing up in such conditions naturally concluded that a man’s true worth was determined by his place in the social hierarchy and by what other people said of him.8”
In the final analysis, nothing will help you more in your career than for you to get the reputation for being the kind of person who gets important work done quickly and well. This reputation will make you one of the most
If your goal is to do a hundred pushups per day, that’s a lot of energy! In the beginning, when you’re motivated and excited, you can muster the strength to get started. But after a few days, such a massive effort feels exhausting. Meanwhile, sticking to the habit of doing one pushup per day requires almost no energy to get started. And the less energy a habit requires, the more likely it is to occur.
Most software developers who work from home never anticipate that they’ll actually become lonely from the lack of social interaction—after all, as a group we can tend to be kind of reclusive. But just trust me on this one: after about a year or so, if you haven’t figured out a way to get some kind of social interaction in your life, you’re probably going to feel like you’re going nuts. (Location 1964)
The essence of Buddhist prac- tice is not so much an effort at changing your thoughts or your behav- ior so that you can become a better person, but in realizing that no matter what you might think about the circumst~nces that define your life, you're already good, whole, and complete. It's about recognizing
“At some point it comes down to who can handle the boredom of training every day, doing the same lifts over and over and over.”
“Never take your position for granted and never let any favors you receive go to your head.”
The best way to get a client is through someone you already know. (Location 1640)
“As you can see, the Anxiety-Provoking Situations Worksheet is extremely useful for identifying the situations you’d like to target for change. Identifying your triggers in these situations will help you know what you need to teach your amygdala. It isn’t necessary to change your reactions to all your triggers. Rather, choose to target triggers in those situations in which your anxiety stands in the way of your personal goals and dreams, those that result in the greatest distress, or those you encounter most frequently.”
Wanting to maintain a distance from someone you do not relate to any more doesn’t mean you don’t care about them.It just means you care about the relationship you have with yourself more than the one you have with them.
“The ideal modern house is divided into many small rooms so that each child can have a private space, hidden from view, providing for maximum autonomy. This private room almost invariably has a door, and in many households it is accepted practice for the child to close, and perhaps lock, the door”
Turning pro is a mindset. If we are struggling with fear, self-sabotage, procrastination, self-doubt, etc., the problem is, we’re thinking like amateurs. Amateurs don’t show up. Amateurs crap out. Amateurs let adversity defeat them. The pro thinks differently. He shows up, he does his work, he keeps on truckin’, no matter what. (Location 1398)
But both courses are to be avoided; you should not copy the bad simply because they are many, nor should you hate the many because they are unlike you. Withdraw into yourself, as far as you can. Associate with those who will make a better man of you. Welcome those whom you yourself can improve.
I tell you, nothing concentrates your time like knowing how many days you have left. (Location 7734)
In a warm sun children play, and women roll clothes on rocks at the village fountain and pound grain in stone mortars, and from all sides come reassuring dung smells and chicken clatter and wafts of fire smoke from the low hearths.
You use those gifts, because nothing ever goes according to plan. (Location 10139)
I am not here to seek the “crazy wisdom”; if I am, I shall never find it. I am here to be here, like these rocks and sky and snow, like this hail that is falling down out of the sun.
2. You can form effective argument, if you have considered all the secondary effects due to the decision you are taking
To welcome with affection what is sent by fate. Not to stain or disturb the spirit within him with a mess of false beliefs. Instead, to preserve it faithfully, by calmly obeying God-saying nothing untrue, doing nothing unjust. And if the others don't acknowledge it-this life lived with simplicity, humility, cheerfulness-he doesn't resent them for it.
Finally, seal it all in cement by teaching what you’ve learned to someone else. (Location 2950)
Whatever your identity is right now, you only believe it because you have proof of it. If you go to church every Sunday for twenty years, you have evidence that you are religious. If you study biology for one hour every night, you have evidence that you are studious. If you go to the gym even when it’s snowing, you have evidence that you are committed to fitness. The more evidence you have for a belief, the more strongly you will believe it.
No. It's fortunate that this has happened and I've remained unharmed by it-not shattered by the present or frightened of the future.So remember this principle when something threatens to cause you pain: the thing itself was no misfortune at all; to endure it and prevail is great good fortune.
I could not allow myself to be overwhelmed. I had to relax, look around, and make a call. That was what Prioritize and Execute was all about. (Location 2140)
Time will progressively de-intensify the pain of losing... memories will remain, but the feelings will subsidise.
“If you practice relaxation techniques routinely, eventually they will become second nature and help decrease your general anxiety level.”
Only about 2 percent of people can work entirely without supervision. We call these people “leaders.” This is the kind of person you are meant to be and that you can be, it you decide to be.
The inner world drives the outer. Period.
The key is to tie your desired behavior into something you already do each day. Once you have mastered this basic structure, you can begin to create larger stacks by chaining small habits together.
coach was saying that really successful people feel the same lack of motivation as everyone else. The difference is that they still find a way to show up despite the feelings of boredom.
someone is expecting toughness, it is amazing what a simple, self-effacing remark will do. If someone anticipates a hard line, making an immediate insignificant concession is a good way to egin. The more someone thinks I want something from him, the more I will go out of my way to appear that I don't.
“Let’s do this,” was the consensus. Everybody knew we would likely get in a gunfight. But we wanted that gunfight to be on our terms, not the enemy’s. (Location 1618)
Step two: Write it down.
You always have three options. You can change it, you can accept it, or you can leave it. (Location 8856)
Motion makes you feel like you’re getting things done. But really, you’re just preparing to get something done. When preparation becomes a form of procrastination, you need to change something. You don’t
Every day, there are a handful of moments that deliver an outsized impact. I refer to these little choices as decisive moments. The moment you decide between ordering takeout or cooking dinner. The moment you choose between driving your car or riding your bike. The moment you decide between starting your homework or grabbing the video game controller. These choices are a fork in the road.
What you crave is not the habit itself but the change in state it delivers. You do not crave smoking a cigarette, you crave the feeling of relief it provides. You are not motivated by brushing your teeth but rather by the feeling of a clean mouth. You do not want to turn on the television, you want to be entertained.
The best and brightest spend their time learning how to use it.
You can also invert this principle and prime the environment to make bad behaviors difficult. If you find yourself watching too much television, for example, then unplug it after each use. Only plug it back in if you can say out loud the name of the show you want to watch.
There is this difference between ourselves and the other school: our ideal wise man feels his troubles, but overcomes them; their wise man does not even feel them.
Looking back is a poor choice. Looking ahead is the higher choice. Just let go and move on...
As long as there is no split between the 'Knower' and 'Doer' within you, you are on the right track. If there is a split then you are on the wrong track.
When one is busy and absorbed in one’s work, the very absorption affords great delight;
So you were born to feel "nice"? Instead of doing things and experiencing them? Don't you see the plants, the birds, the ants and spiders and bees going about their individual tasks, putting the world in order, as best they can? And you're not willing to do your job as a human being? Why aren't you running to do what your nature demands?
Nothing is more pathetic than people who run around in circles, "delving into the things that lie beneath" and conducting investigations into the souls of the people around them, never realizing that all have to do is to be attentive to the power inside you you and worship it sincerely. To worship it is to keep it from being muddied with turmoil and becoming aimless and dissatisfied with nature-divine and human.
“These guys are cancers. Their destructive attitudes will metastasize within the team and spread to others. The quicker you cut them out, the less damage they will do, the less negativity they will spread, and, most important, the fewer people they will pull away with them.” (Location 3470)
“Only emotion endures.” (Location 9158)
We defeat emotions with logic.
Being wise includes knowing how to defend yourself or disappear when needed. Step one is becoming aware of the threats. (Location 7038)
When friendship is settled, you must trust; before friendship is formed, you must pass judgment.
Focusing on the present allows you to enjoy the small victories of daily work life: the feeling of a job well done, the feeling of being pulled in as an expert on a critical business problem, the feeling of being an integral member of a team that gels. These are what you’ll miss if you’re always walking around with your head in the clouds.
PRINCIPLE In order to convince and inspire others to follow and accomplish a mission, a leader must be a true believer in the mission. Even when others doubt and question the amount of risk, asking, “Is it worth it?” the leader must believe in the greater cause. (Location 1087)
Research has shown that once a person believes in a particular aspect of their identity, they are more likely to act in alignment with that belief.
Even the best in the world struggle. I need to relearn this lesson often. (Location 8351)
“He who has a why to live for can bear with almost any how,”
In life and business, the person with the fewest blind spots wins. Removing blind spots means we see, interact with, and move closer to understanding reality. We think better. And thinking better is about finding simple processes that help us work through problems from multiple dimensions and perspectives, allowing us to better choose solutions that fit what matters to us.
“What is it that they can’t afford to say or think?” (Location 8503)
The Goldilocks Rule states that humans experience peak motivation when working on tasks that are right on the edge of their current abilities. Not too hard. Not too easy. Just right.
But I think most of the power of the visit is just visiting, just being together and sharing this awkward body.” (Location 6712)
Habits are like the entrance ramp to a highway. They lead you down a path and, before you know it, you’re speeding toward the next behavior. It seems to be easier to continue what you are already doing than to start doing something different. You sit through a bad movie for two hours.
“One of the most common uses of early stone tools was to crack open bones in order to get to the marrow. Some researchers believe this was our original niche. Just as woodpeckers specialise in extracting insects from the trunks of trees, the first humans specialised in extracting marrow from bones. Why marrow? Well, suppose you observe a pride of lions take down and devour a giraffe. You wait patiently until they’re done. But it’s still not your turn because first the hyenas and jackals – and you don’t dare interfere with them scavenge the leftovers. Only then would you and your band dare approach the carcass, look cautiously left and right – and dig into the edible tissue that remained.
Here in the secrets of the mountains, in the river roar, I touch my skin to see if I am real;
“People who are hyperventilating are often instructed to deliberately slow their breathing or breathe into a paper bag. The bag captures carbon dioxide when they exhale; therefore, breathing in from the bag increases the amount of carbon dioxide inhaled and replaced in the bloodstream. It’s a very effective method of reversing light-headedness and other anxiety symptoms”
to school, grew up, moved away from home, got a job, and so on.
The best way to break a bad habit is to make it impractical to do. Increase the friction until you don’t even have the option to act.
“‘Passion’ is an overstated word. I think passion develops. . . . I threw myself into food, and although I was passionate about it, it wasn’t a life passion until I combined food and nourishment with health, (Location 9056)
With our bad habits, the immediate outcome usually feels good, but the ultimate outcome feels bad. With good habits, it is the reverse: the immediate outcome is unenjoyable, but the ultimate outcome feels good.
The secret to maximizing your odds of success is to choose the right field of competition.
“When I see an anxious person, I ask myself, what do they want? For if a person wasn’t wanting something outside of their own control, why would they be stricken by anxiety?” (Location 504)
“The gossip theory might sound like a joke, but numerous studies support it. Even today the vast majority of human communication – whether in the form of emails, phone calls or newspaper columns – is gossip. It comes so naturally to us that it seems as if our language evolved for this very purpose. Do you think that history professors chat about the reasons for World War One when they meet for lunch, or that nuclear physicists spend their coffee breaks at scientific conferences talking about quarks? Sometimes. But more often, they gossip about the professor who caught her husband cheating, or the quarrel between the head of the department and the dean, or the rumours that a colleague used his research funds to buy a Lexus. Gossip usually focuses on wrongdoings. Rumour-mongers are the original fourth estate, journalists who inform society about and thus protect it from cheats and freeloaders.”
We don’t need in-person mentors as often as we think. Every day, using people from this book, I will ask myself questions like “What would Matt Mullenweg do?” or “What would Jocko say?” (Location 8418)
People who are better at delaying gratification have higher SAT scores, lower levels of substance abuse, lower likelihood of obesity, better responses to stress, and superior social skills. We’ve
sassination of President Kennedy.
Think about the last time you shopped for something on Amazon. Did you read the reviews and look for products that were highly recommended? That’s the primary way I shop online now—and I know the same is true for many others. (Location 2654)
having endorsements on your LinkedIn profile can make a huge difference in how you’re perceived. (Location 2653)
Remember, people will be more interested in you if you show an interest in them. (Location 2592)
“Writing was born as the maidservant of human consciousness, but is increasingly becoming its master. Our computers have trouble understanding how Homo sapiens talks, feels and dreams. So we are teaching Homo sapiens to talk, feel and dream in the language of numbers, which can be understood by computers.”
“Many, many people are working very hard, trying to save their money to retire so they can travel. Well, I decided to flip it around and travel when I was really young, when I had zero money. And I had experiences that, basically, even a billion dollars couldn’t have bought.” (Location 7754)
“We’re so deeply conditioned to be lost in thought and to have this conversation with ourselves from the moment we wake up to the moment we fall asleep. It’s just chatter in the mind, and it’s so captivating that we’re not even aware of it. We are essentially in a dream state, and it’s through this veil of thought that we go about our day and perceive our environment. But we are just talking to ourselves nonstop, and until you can break that spell and begin to notice thoughts themselves as objects of consciousness, just arising and passing away, you can’t even pay attention to your breath, or to anything else, with any clarity.” (Location 7489)
“Ancient foragers also suffered less from infectious diseases. Most of the infectious diseases that have plagued agricultural and industrial societies (such as smallpox, measles and tuberculosis) originated in domesticated animals and were transferred to humans only after the Agricultural Revolution. Ancient foragers, who had domesticated only dogs, were free of these scourges. Moreover, most people in agricultural and industrial societies lived in dense, unhygienic permanent settlements – ideal hotbeds for disease. Foragers roamed the land in small bands that could not sustain epidemics”
In virtually every case, the SEAL troops and platoons that didn’t perform well had leaders who blamed everyone and everything else—their troops, their subordinate leaders, or the scenario. They blamed the SEAL training instructor staff; they blamed inadequate equipment or the experience level of their men. They refused to accept responsibility. Poor performance and mission failure were the result. (Location 575)
FRAGILITY IS OVERRATED “I hope no one gets injured, but injury is not as bad as people think. To not do something because you might get injured is a terrible reason not to do something. We can get injured in anything. Just getting into your car is very dangerous. I think we should just put that in its place. (Location 7596)
“If you’re suddenly in the midst of a panic attack, there are three amygdala-based coping strategies that will work to calm you down: deep breathing, muscle relaxation, and exercise. They can’t immediately shut down all of the activation that’s been created in your body, but they will reduce your discomfort and shorten the duration of the panic attack.”
leap free of gravity, as I do so often these days in my dreams—was that no more than pure relief at crossing the last high pass? If so, how sad it seems to celebrate the end of precious days at Crystal Mountain. Perhaps I left too soon; perhaps a great chance has been wasted; had I stayed at Shey until December, the snow leopard might have shown itself at last. These doubts fill me with despair. In worrying about the future, I despoil the present; in my escape, I leave a true freedom behind.
Their lifestyle is the result of prioritizing. They cultivate interests that are decidedly below their financial means, and as a result, any income would allow them freedom to pursue the things they most care about. (Location 410)
The leader must own everything in his or her world. There is no one else to blame. The leader must acknowledge mistakes and admit failures, take ownership of them, and develop a plan to win. (Location 474)
Those of you who often over-commit or feel too scattered may appreciate a new philosophy I’m trying: If I’m not saying “HELL YEAH!” about something, then I say no. Meaning: When deciding whether to commit to something, if I feel anything less than “Wow! That would be amazing! Absolutely! Hell yeah!”—then my answer is no. (Location 6411)
To pass through this brief life as nature demands. To give it without complaint.
In my entire life I’ve only seen about one in twenty engineers who really exemplify that artistic perfection. So it’s pretty rare to make your engineering an art, but that’s how it should
Even if I didn’t know what to do, I just had to begin. For a lot of people, that’s the part that keeps them back the most. They think, ‘Well, I don’t have an idea, so I can’t start.’ I know you’ll only get the idea once you start. (Location 10247)
COMMITMENT
The point is that there is a tender heart within each of us that needs attention. If the child within us is not given attention, we resort to childish behaviour (even as adults) to draw that attention. A hungry man needs food, not criticism. Seeking attention is a sort of psychological hunger... and very few are exempt from it.
A horse at the end of the race...A dog when the hunt is over..A bee with its honey stored...And a human being after helping others. They don't make a fuss about it. They just go on to something else, as the vine looks forward to bearing fruit again in season.We should be like that. Acting almost unconsciously.
Habit formation is incredibly useful because the conscious mind is the bottleneck of the brain. It can only pay attention to one problem at a time. As a result, your brain is always working to preserve your conscious attention for whatever task is most essential.
We all often find ourselves presented with challenges and obstacles we aren’t prepared for. What you do at those times, though, will be the primary factor in determining your success. (Location 1995)
could—they all had some ownership of the planning process in each operation. Even if they only controlled a small piece of the plan—the (Location 3030)
“The first rule of handling conflict is don’t hang around people who are constantly engaging in conflict. . . . All of the value in life, including in relationships, comes from compound interest. (Location 8852)
Temptation bundling is one way to make your habits more attractive. The strategy is to pair an action you want to do with an action you need to
Longevity is going to require that you are platform neutral in the workplace. We all have our preferences, but you’re going to have to leave your ideals at home. Master one, and get good at the other. Your skills should transcend technology platform. It’s just a tool. If we want a Windows person, we can hire them in the Philippines. If we want someone who really understands Windows and UNIX development and can help us integrate them together, we’re probably going to be looking onshore.
luckily, they were both eager to learn, eager to lead, and most important, humble yet confident to command. (Location 2280)
The process of building a habit can be divided into four simple steps: cue, craving, response, and reward.
“You also educate people thoroughly. From the moment they are born, you constantly remind them of the principles of the imagined order, which are incorporated into anything and everything. They are incorporated into fairy tales, dramas, paintings, songs, etiquette, political propaganda, architecture, recipes and fashions. For example, today people believe in equality, so it’s fashionable for rich kids to wear jeans, which were originally working-class attire. In the Middle Ages people believed in class divisions, so no young nobleman would have worn a peasant’s smock. Back then, to be addressed as ‘Sir’ or ‘Madam’ was a rare privilege reserved for the nobility, and often purchased with blood. Today all polite correspondence, regardless of the recipient, begins with ‘Dear Sir or Madam’.”
While your success depends on what you communicate with others, your happiness depends on what you communicate to yourself.
The best leaders checked their egos, accepted blame, sought out constructive criticism, and took detailed notes for improvement. They exhibited Extreme Ownership, (Location 580)
History is full of simple human beings who won over forces well beyond their control and emerged as champions.
and the lesson inherent in this exercise in non-m~ditation-is that if we allow ourselves to relax and take a mental step back, we can begin to rec- ognize that all these different thoughts are simply coming and going within the context of an unlimited mind, which, like space, remains fundamentally unperturbed by whatever occurs within it.
“Telling effective stories is not easy. The difficulty lies not in telling the story, but in convincing everyone else to believe it. Much of history revolves around this question: how does one convince millions of people to believe particular stories about gods, or nations, or limited liability companies? Yet when it succeeds, it gives Sapiens immense power, because it enables millions of strangers to cooperate and work towards common goals. Just try to imagine how difficult it would have been to create states, or churches, or legal systems if we could speak only about things that really exist, such as rivers, trees and lions”
Favorite documentary The Up series: This ongoing series is filmed in the UK, and revisits the same group of people every 7 years. It started with their 7th birthdays (Seven Up!) and continues up to present day, when they are in their 50s. (Location 7994)
“If you fear a specific object or situation, you may be able to recall an experience in which your amygdala learned that fear. Alternatively, it may be difficult to uncover how an amygdala-based fear developed, since your cortex isn’t able to retrieve a memory related to that situation, even though the amygdala clearly does. The fact that the cortex can be left out of the loop is why people are often confused by their emotional responses.”
We are drawn to behaviors that earn us respect, approval, admiration, and status. We want to be the one in the gym who can do muscleups or the musician who can play the hardest chord progressions or the parent with the most accomplished children because these things separate us from the crowd.
Any habit can be broken down into a feedback loop that involves four steps: cue, craving, response, and reward.
Our habits are not solely determined by our personalities, but there is no doubt that our genes nudge us in a certain direction. Our deeply rooted preferences make
“Boy, the good shit sticks.” This was what Cal recalled decades later, when he lost an entire box of research notes in his basement—they’d (Location 8169)
As soon as you walk in the door from work, you grab the video game controller. A choice that once required effort is now automatic. A habit has been created.
Habits are necessary, but not sufficient for mastery. What you need is a combination of automatic habits and deliberate practice.
“Compare a medieval French peasant to a modern Parisian banker. The peasant lived in an unheated mud hut overlooking the local pigsty, while the banker goes home to a splendid penthouse with all the latest technological gadgets and a view to the Champs-Elysées. Intuitively, we would expect the banker to be much happier than the peasant. However, mud huts, penthouses and the Champs-Elysées don’t really determine our mood. Serotonin does. When the medieval peasant completed the construction of his mud hut, his brain neurons secreted serotonin, bringing it up to level X. When in 2014 the banker made the last payment on his wonderful penthouse, brain neurons secreted a similar amount of serotonin, bringing it up to a similar level X. It makes no difference to the brain that the penthouse is far more comfortable than the mud hut. The only thing that matters is that at present the level of serotonin is X. Consequently the banker would not be one iota happier than his great-great-great-grandfather, the poor medieval peasant.”
The mind is, in a sense, the puppet master, while the body and the various forms of communication that constitute "speech" are merely its puppets.
Feelings have a short lifespan. Unlike memories, time will fade the feelings away. You have to go through this phase of legitimate pain of, there is no escaping it. But time will heal you.
Make it a game with yourself to start a little earlier, work a little harder, and stay a little later. Always look for ways to go the extra mile, to do more than you are paid
“Exercise doesn’t just reduce anxiety in the moment or for a few hours afterward. Research shows that following a regular exercise program for at least ten weeks can reduce people’s general level of anxiety”
The one who has hurt you in life has gone on with his/her life, but you continue to drown yourself in the memories of what has happened, ruining your todays, your peace of mind, your sleep, your happiness and above all, your precious health. Remember, between the hated and the hater, it is always the hater who suffers more.
‘From now on, when you wake up, I want you to go outside. As soon as you wake up, open the blinds, and go outside, naked if possible, and be in the sun for 20 minutes.’” (Location 8226)
Commitment devices increase the odds that you’ll do the right thing in the future by making bad habits difficult in the present. However, we can do even better. We can make good habits inevitable and bad habits impossible.
“The Agricultural Revolution certainly enlarged the sum total of food at the disposal of humankind, but the extra food did not translate into a better diet or more leisure. Rather, it translated into population explosions and pampered elites. The average farmer worked harder than the average forager, and got a worse diet in return. The Agricultural Revolution was history’s biggest fraud.2
“Even today, with all our advanced technologies, more than 90 per cent of the calories that feed humanity come from the handful of plants that our ancestors domesticated between 9500 and 3500 BC – wheat, rice, maize (called ‘corn’ in the US), potatoes, millet and barley. No noteworthy plant or animal has been domesticated in the last 2,000 years. If our minds are those of hunter-gatherers, our cuisine is that of ancient farmers”
It’s hard to explain, but there’s a personal connection you get when you attend a live event that you don’t get when listening to or watching a recording. (Location 2680)
We. remember being teenagers and going to school, and tend to feel that the "I" that we are now is the same "I" that went
Yet I feel calm, and ready to accept whatever comes, and therefore happy.
‘Hey, man, I want to work with you. This is why I’m in Arizona,’ and he said, ‘Great. What have you been doing?’” (Location 9128)
People with high selfcontrol tend to spend less time in tempting situations. It’s easier to avoid temptation than resist it.
Our point is, if you try to approach every problem with your moral compass, first and foremost, you’re going to make a lot of mistakes. You’re going to exclude a lot of possible good solutions. You’re going to assume you know a lot of things, when in fact you don’t, and you’re not going to be a good partner in reaching a solution with other people who don’t happen to see the world the way you do.” (Location 9282)
father has zero intellectual insecurities. . . . It has never crossed his mind to be concerned that the world thinks he’s an idiot. He’s not in that game. So if he doesn’t understand something, he just asks you. He doesn’t care if he sounds foolish. He will ask the most obvious question without any sort of concern about it. . . . So he asks lots and lots of ‘dumb,’ in the best sense of that word, questions. He’ll say to someone, ‘I don’t understand. Explain that to me.’ (Location 9246)
“Always make those above you feel comfortably superior. In your desire to please and impress them, do not go too far in displaying your talents or you might accomplish the oppositeinspire fear and insecurity. Make your masters appear more brilliant than they are and you will attain the heights of power”
90 percent of the value that you contribute to your company is contained in those three tasks, whatever they are.
Upgrading your skills is one of the most important personal productivity principles of all. Learn what you need to learn so that you can do your work in an excellent fashion. The better you become at eating a particular
read books “as though the author was on trial for his life.” (Location 395)
Either they’d make those criticisms about themselves, or they’d ask, ‘What did I do wrong?’ And when you told them, they’d nod their head, pull out their notebook, and take notes. That right there, that’s a guy who’s going to make it, who’s going to get it right. (Location 6910)
“Even plants and animals were mechanised. Around the time that Homo sapiens was elevated to divine status by humanist religions, farm animals stopped being viewed as living creatures that could feel pain and distress, and instead came to be treated as machines. Today these animals are often mass-produced in factory-like facilities, their bodies shaped in accordance with industrial needs. They pass their entire lives as cogs in a giant production line, and the length and quality of their existence is determined by the profits and losses of business corporations. Even when the industry takes care to keep them alive, reasonably healthy and well fed, it has no intrinsic interest in the animals’ social and psychological needs (except when these have a direct impact on production).”
In a world of distraction, single-tasking is a superpower. (Location 7731)
I can guarantee that if you manage to start a habit and keep sticking to it, there will be days when you feel like quitting. When you start a business, there will be days when you don’t feel like showing up. When you’re at the gym, there will be sets that you don’t feel like finishing. When it’s time to write, there will be days that you don’t feel like typing. But stepping up when it’s annoying or painful or draining to do so, that’s what makes the difference between a professional and an amateur.
When I first shook hands with Arnold Palmer, I told him I could make only two guarantees. First, that if I didn't know something, I would tell him. Second, that when I didn't know something, I would find someone who did.
“Cooperation’ sounds very altruistic, but is not always voluntary and seldom egalitarian. Most human cooperation networks have been geared towards oppression and exploitation. The peasants paid for the burgeoning cooperation networks with their precious food surpluses, despairing when the tax collector wiped out an entire year of hard labour with a single stroke of his imperial pen”
“The power of such a mountain is so great and yet so subtle that, without compulsion, people are drawn to it from near and far, as if by the force of some invisible magnet; and they will undergo untold hardships and privations in their inexplicable urge to approach and to worship the centre of this sacred power. . . . This worshipful or religious attitude is not impressed by scientific facts, like figures of altitude, which are foremost in the mind of modern man. Nor is it motivated by the urge to ‘conquer’ the mountain. . . .”2
Getting upset is like continuing the dream while you’re awake. The thing that provoked you wasn’t real—but your reaction was. And so from the fake comes real consequences. (Location 638)
“The more you’re limited by your anxiety, the more frequently you’ll need to practice exposure in order to regain control of your life. Also, make sure you plan in advance. If you don’t schedule your exposures and plan to repeat them, you won’t rewire your brain and reduce your anxiety.”
“Even if killing death seems a distant goal, we have already achieved things that were inconceivable a few centuries ago. In 1199, King Richard the Lionheart was struck by an arrow in his left shoulder. Today we’d say he incurred a minor injury. But in 1199, in the absence of antibiotics and effective sterilisation methods, this minor flesh wound turned infected and gangrene set in. The only way to stop the spread of gangrene in twelfth-century Europe was to cut off the infected limb, impossible when the infection was in a shoulder. The gangrene spread through the Lionheart’s body and no one could help the king. He died in great agony two weeks later.”
“Level one chaos is chaos that does not react to predictions about it. The weather, for example, is a level one chaotic system. Though it is influenced by myriad factors, we can build computer models that take more and more of them into consideration, and produce better and better weather forecasts”
Let’s look at two areas where second-order thinking can be used to great benefit:
“free life” as described by a mountaineer: “The mountains had been a natural field of activity where, playing on the frontiers of life and death, we had found the freedom for which we were blindly groping and which was as necessary to us as breath.”
I then read Tara’s first book, Radical Acceptance, after it was recommended to me by a neuroscience PhD who worked with Adam Gazzaley (page 135). I digested 10 pages each night in the tub, and it immediately had a huge impact. So much so that I initially stopped reading after 20% to test-drive the lessons in real life. There was a lot to work with. (Location 8992)
If frontline troops are unclear about the plan and yet are too intimidated to ask questions, the team’s ability to effectively execute the plan radically decreases. (Location 2735)
The best revenge is not to be like that.
Habits are easier when they align with your natural abilities. Choose the habits that best suit you.
The Dichotomy of Leadership (Location 3668)
Given that we are more dependent on vision than on any other sense, it should come as no surprise that visual cues are the greatest catalyst of our behavior. For this reason, a small change in what you see can lead to a big shift in what you do.
Cheerfulness. Without requiring other people's help. Or serenity supplied by others.
my wife and I always try and come up with a trick question that throws them off. (Location 9183)
“Most millionaires sincerely believe in the existence of money and limited liability companies. Most human-rights activists sincerely believe in the existence of human rights. No one was lying when, in 2011, the UN demanded that the Libyan government respect the human rights of its citizens, even though the UN, Libya and human rights are all figments of our fertile imaginations.
Today, however, we live in a calorierich environment. Food is abundant, but your brain continues to crave it like it is scarce.
benefits of even 30 minutes a week of scribbling can transfer to everything else that you do. (Location 8386)
Second-order effects occur even with something simple like adding traction on tires: it seems like such a great idea because the more you have the less likely you are to slide, the faster you can stop, and thus the safer you are. However, the second-order effects are that your engine has to work harder to propel the car, you get worse gas mileage
What is rewarded is repeated. What is punished is avoided. You learn what to do in the future based on what you were rewarded for doing (or punished for doing) in the past. Positive emotions cultivate habits. Negative emotions destroy them.
For a young SEAL shooter with a very limited role in the planning process who was out working on his weapons and gear, conducting maintenance on our vehicles, or building demolition charges for the breacher, he walked into our mission briefs wondering: What are we doing next? He had no context for why we were doing the operation or how the next tactical mission fit into the bigger picture of stabilizing and securing Ramadi. (Location 3018)
It is not about whether the world is good or not, whether the world is trustworthy or not, but it is about whether you want to be peaceful or not. There is only one way to peace T.R.U.S.T.
Forces beyond your control can take away everything you possess except one thing, your freedom to choose how you will respond to the situation. You cannot control what happens to you in life, but you can always control what you will feel and do about what happens to you.
What are those problems? That’s right: you don’t know. Neither do I. What I do know is that those problems are as diverse as deployment issues, critical design flaws that need to be solved and quickly reimplemented, heterogeneous system integration, and ad hoc report generation.
But how is it even possible to define "the present"? A year is made
I know a writer who uses his computer only for writing, his tablet only for reading, and his phone only for social media and texting. Every habit should have a home.
“Although the preceding tips may be helpful for preventing panic attacks, the efficacy of cortex-based approaches is limited once a true panic attack begins. In a full-blown panic attack, you’re likely to be too anxious to think clearly because the amygdala is taking charge and shutting out the influence of your cortex. At such times, the only solution is to breathe slowly, try to relax, and distract yourself as you wait for the attack to pass”
“That might be one of the issues: in your mind you are doing everything right. So when things go wrong, instead of looking at yourself, you blame others. But no one is infallible. With Extreme Ownership, you must remove individual ego and personal agenda. It’s all about the mission. How can you best get your team to most effectively execute the plan in order to accomplish the mission?” I continued. “That is the question you have to ask yourself. That is what Extreme Ownership is all about.” (Location 556)
Know what our principles—not our interests—are today. And as the world goes over the cliff, I’m not going to change my principles. Treating human beings, whether they’re like me or not like me, whether they’re the same religion or a different religion, with love and respect.” (Location 8971)
“Another singular human trait is that we walk upright on two legs. Standing up, it’s easier to scan the savannah for game or enemies, and arms that are unnecessary for locomotion are freed for other purposes, like throwing stones or signalling. The more things these hands could do, the more successful their owners were. Humankind paid for its lofty vision and industrious hands with backaches and stiff necks. Women paid extra. An upright gait required narrower hips, constricting the birth canal – and this just when babies’ heads were getting bigger and bigger. Death in childbirth became a major hazard for human females. Women who gave birth earlier, when the infants brain and head were still relatively small and supple, fared better and lived to have more children. Natural selection consequently favoured earlier births. And, indeed, compared to other animals, humans are born prematurely, when many of their vital systems are still under-developed. A colt can trot shortly after birth; a kitten leaves its mother to forage on its own when it is just a few weeks old. Human babies are helpless, dependent for many years on their elders for sustenance, protection and education. This fact has contributed greatly both to humankind’s extraordinary social abilities and to its unique social problems. Lone mothers could hardly forage enough food for their offspring and themselves with needy children in tow. Raising children required constant help from other family members and neighbours. It takes a tribe to raise a human. Evolution thus favoured those capable of forming strong social ties. In addition, since humans are born underdeveloped, they can be educated and socialised to a far greater extent than any other animal"
“The quick reaction that results from the amygdala pathway is typically called the fight-or-flight response”
“Over the last 500 years the idea of progress convinced people to put more and more trust in the future. This trust created credit; credit brought real economic growth; and growth strengthened the trust in the future and opened the way for even more credit. It didn’t happen overnight – the economy behaved more like a roller coaster than a balloon. But over the long run, with the bumps evened out, the general direction was unmistakable. Today, there is so much credit in the world that governments, business corporations and private individuals easily obtain large, long-term and low-interest loans that far exceed current income.”
Seneca has said, “Without a ruler to do it against, you can’t make crooked straight.” That is the role of wise people in our lives—to serve as model and inspiration. To bounce our ideas off and test our presumptions. (Location 442)
Making eye contact with the young SEAL leader in the patrol, I gave him an approving nod that, without words, said: Well done; you kept your composure and you made clear calls. You got the help you needed and kept the rest of your team alive. The SEAL leader nodded back: he understood. (Location 1883)
The idea is to make your habits as easy as possible to start. Anyone can meditate for one minute, read one page, or put one item of clothing away. And, as we have just discussed, this is a powerful strategy because once you’ve started doing the right thing, it is much easier to continue doing it.
There is more freedom to be gained from practicing poverty than chasing wealth. Suffer a little regularly and you often cease to suffer. (Location 7818)
Within the company, you are also more likely to be 'found out. Your real self is likely to emerge, and your weaknesses as well as your strengths are likely to be discovered. As a result, you must realize that 'you get along by getting along.
If you think it’s simply enough to take advantage of the opportunities that arise in your life, you will fall short of greatness. Anyone sentient can do that. What you must do is learn how to press forward precisely when everyone around you sees disaster.
If someone is yelling at us, for example, we rarely take the time to distinguish be- tween the bare recognition "Oh, this person is raising his voice and saying such and such words" and the emotional response "This person is a jerk." Instead, we tend to combine bare perception and our emo- tional response into a single package: 'This person is screaming at me because he's a jerk."
What is immediately rewarded is repeated. What is immediately punished is avoided.
craving is just a specific manifestation of a deeper underlying motive. Your brain did not evolve with a desire to smoke cigarettes or to check Instagram or to play video games. At a deep level, you simply want to reduce uncertainty and relieve anxiety, to win social acceptance and approval, or to achieve status.
Beautiful things of any kind are beautiful in themselves and sufficient to themselves. Praise is extraneous. The object of praise remains what it was-no better and no worse.
Continually ask yourself these key questions:“What am I really good at? What do I enjoy the most about my work?
Ordinary people shy away from negative situations, just as they do with failure. They do their best to avoid trouble. What great people do is the opposite. They are their best in these situations. They turn personal tragedy or misfortune—really anything, everything—to their advantage.
I understand much better now Einstein’s remark that the only real time is that of the observer, who carries with him his own time and space.
We would then conduct quick battlefield questioning on military-age males, (Location 3498)
“Better to have, and not need, than to need, and not have.” (Location 6850)
Instead of trying to engineer a perfect habit from the start, do the easy thing on a more consistent basis. You have to standardize before you can optimize.
“The fool’s life is empty of gratitude and full of fears; its course lies wholly toward the future.”
Finally, I remove my watch, as the time it tells is losing all significance.
“Listening is about being present, not just being quiet.” (Location 8164)
“As the cortex processes this information, it can interpret perfectly safe sensations as threatening. It then sends a message along to the amygdala that can produce anxiety. In this case, the cortex turns a rather neutral experience that wouldn’t naturally activate the amygdala into a threat, causing the amygdala to react by creating an anxiety response”
“Historians can speculate, but not provide any definitive answer”
Reasoning from first principles allows us to step outside of history and conventional wisdom and see what is possible. When you really understand the principles at work, you can decide if the existing methods make sense. Often they don’t.
“If happiness is determined by expectations, then two pillars of our society – mass media and the advertising industry – may unwittingly be depleting the globe’s reservoirs of contentment. If you were an eighteen-year-old youth in a small village 5,000 years ago you’d probably think you were good-looking because there were only fifty other men in your village and most of them were either old, scarred and wrinkled, or still little kids. But if you are a teenager today you are a lot more likely to feel inadequate. Even if the other guys at school are an ugly lot, you don’t measure yourself against them but against the movie stars, athletes and supermodels you see all day on television, Facebook and giant billboards.”
You may have heard of the Six-P Formula. It says, “Proper Prior Planning Prevents Poor Performance.”
advised many officers that the right amount of involvement—the proper position for them—was somewhere in the middle, generally with the bulk of their force: not so far forward that they get sucked into every room clearance, but not so far back that they don’t know what is going on up front. (Location 2498)
His attitude to the gods: no superstitiousness.
You can also invert this principle and prime the environment to make bad behaviors difficult. If you find yourself watching too much television, for example, then unplug it after each use. Only plug it back in if you can say
Step one: Decide exactly what you want.
With Extreme Ownership, you must remove individual ego and personal agenda. It’s all about the mission. (Location 557)
If we limited "good" and "bad" to our own actions, we'd have no call to challenge God, or to treat other people as enemies.
Next time you feel disturbed, instead of asking 'who or what is disturbing me', examine who or what you are resisting (not accepting) that is causing the disturbance in you. Replace resistance (non-acceptance)
#6—“Trying to get everyone to like you is a sign of mediocrity. You’ll avoid the tough decisions, and you’ll avoid confronting the people who need to be confronted.”—Colin Powell (Location 8718)
“WERE, SAY, A SPANISH PEASANT TO HAVE fallen asleep in AD 1000 and woken up 500 years later, to the din of Columbus’ sailors boarding the Niña, Pinta and Santa Maria, the world would have seemed to him quite familiar. Despite many changes in technology, manners and political boundaries, this medieval Rip Van Winkle would have felt at home. But had one of Columbus’ sailors fallen into a similar slumber and woken up to the ringtone of a twenty-first-century iPhone, he would have found himself in a world strange beyond comprehension. ‘Is this heaven?’ he might well have asked himself. ‘Or perhaps – hell?”
As a general rule, the closer we are to someone, the more likely we are to imitate some of their habits. One groundbreaking study tracked twelve thousand people for thirtytwo years and found that “a person’s chances of becoming obese increased by 57 percent if he or she had a friend who became obese.”
“In medieval Europe, aristocrats spent their money carelessly on extravagant luxuries, whereas peasants lived frugally, minding every penny. Today, the tables have turned. The rich take great care managing their assets and investments, while the less well heeled go into debt buying cars and televisions they don’t really need.”
Successful people have a clear future orientation. They think five, ten, and twenty years out into the future.
And that his friends never had to speculate about his attitude to anything: it was always clear.
“FOLLOW YOUR PASSION” IS TERRIBLE ADVICE “I think it misconstrues the nature of finding a satisfying career and satisfying job, where the biggest predictor of job satisfaction is mentally engaging work. It’s the nature of the job itself. (Location 7364)
“Those who are offended easily should be offended more often”—Mae West. (Location 8749)
When preparation becomes a form of procrastination, you need to change something. You don’t want to merely be planning. You want to be practicing. If you want to master a habit, the key is to start with repetition, not perfection. You don’t need to map out every feature of a new habit. You just need to practice it. This is the first takeaway of the 3rd Law: you just need to get your reps in.
Everywhere means nowhere.
The implementation intention formula is: I will [BEHAVIOR] at [TIME] in [LOCATION].
Think about how old you are right now and think about being a 10-year-older version of yourself. Then think, ‘What would I probably tell myself as an older version of myself?’ (Location 7306)
'“Myths, it transpired, are stronger than anyone could have imagined. When the Agricultural Revolution opened opportunities for the creation of crowded cities and mighty empires, people invented stories about great gods, motherlands and joint stock companies to provide the needed social links. While human evolution was crawling at its usual snail’s pace, the human imagination was building astounding networks of mass cooperation, unlike any other ever seen on earth.”
We have an executive who insists on being the 'Lone Arranger'. He won't bring in a deal, or involve & anyone else in it, until he has it totally wrapped up, because he is afraid he won't get all the credit. On several occasions both he and the company would have been far better off if he had asked for help and used some of the talent available to him,
“Consider Beth, who was sexually assaulted while a specific Rolling Stones song was playing. After the assault, whenever Beth heard the song she felt intense anxiety. Obviously, the Rolling Stones song had nothing to do with the sexual assault; it was just a coincidence that it was playing when the assault occurred. Nonetheless, Beth’s amygdala responded to the association between the song and the assault, an extremely negative event. In this way, the amygdala transforms a neutral object or situation into something that creates an emotional reaction.”
The quickest way to lose credibility is to rage about minor offences because of a build-up over major ones.
Be aware of all the subtle opportunities you have every day for impressing positively and all the not-so-subtle opportunities you have for impressing negatively. Creating the right impression can be as simple as treating people the way they want to be treated. Or e as difficult as treating them that way even when they beg not to be.
There is clarity (and joy) in seeing what others can’t see, in finding grace and harmony in places others overlook. Isn’t that far better than seeing the world as some dark place? (Location 329)
Perhaps most importantly, a professional is consistent—stable. (Location 1416)
While overpaid CEOs take long vacations and hide behind e-mail autoresponders, some programmer is working eighteen-hour days coding the start-up that will destroy that CEO’s business
Habits are the compound interest of selfimprovement. The same way that money multiplies through compound interest, the effects of your habits multiply as you repeat them. They seem to make little difference on any given day and yet the impact they deliver over the months and years can be enormous. It is only when looking back two, five, or perhaps ten years later that the value of good habits and the cost of bad ones becomes strikingly apparent.
They start. Anywhere. Anyhow. They don’t care if the conditions are perfect or if they’re being slighted. Because they know that once they get started, if they can just get some momentum, they can make it work.
Let the spirit in you represent a man, an adult, a citizen., a Roman, a ruler. Taking up his post like a soldier and patiently awaiting his recall from life. Needing no oath or witness.
stories ignore the pollution produced as a side effect and the wear and tear it put on the engine. It ignores what happens when that initial anger runs out—and how now more and more must be generated to keep the machine going (until, eventually, the only source left is anger at oneself). (Location 581)
the basis of your experience is the same in dreams and in waking life: thoughts, feelings, and sensations that vary accord- ing to changing conditions. If you bear this comparison in mind, what- ever you experience in waking life begins to lose its power to affect you. Thoughts are just thoughts. Feelings are just feelings. Sensations are just sensations. They come and go in waking life as quickly and easily as they do in dreams.
I wanted to create a product with a massive platform, and try to make a difference in the world, and I couldn’t do it without becoming a 40-year-old intern, learning everything I needed, and rebooting my career.” (Location 8789)
“It’s important to remember that when anxiety begins in the amygdala, cortex-based interventions, such as logic and reasoning, don’t always help reduce anxiety.”
Interacting in this way can build large amounts of trust quickly and can help you create fans who will promote your message for you. (Location 2685)
If you win the battle you're probably going to lose the war. And the more right you are, the more damage it will probably do in the long run.
Who was responsible? Neither kings, nor priests, nor merchants. The culprits were a handful of plant species, including wheat, rice and potatoes. These plants domesticated Homo sapiens, rather than vice versa.
It is easy to get bogged down trying to find the optimal plan for change: the fastest way to lose weight, the best program to build muscle, the perfect idea for a side hustle. We are so focused on figuring out the best approach that we never get around to taking action. As Voltaire once wrote, “The best is the enemy of the good.”
If you are just a coder or a tester or a designer or an architect, you’re going to find yourself sitting idle or doing busywork during the ebbs of your business’s project flow. If you are just a J2EE programmer or a .NET programmer or a UNIX systems programmer, you’re not going to have much to contribute when the focus of a project or a company shifts, even temporarily, out of your focus area. It’s not about where you sit on the perceived value chain of project work (where the architect holds the highest spot of royalty). It’s about how generally useful you make yourself.
Habit can help carry you through motivation dips. There are many times I feel too tired to brush my teeth in the evening, but habit compels me to do it anyway. (Location 1947)
of losing it, and the more brutal our pain if we do lose it.
“One of my absolute favorite books of all time, because it changed my life, is a book called Dropping Ashes on the Buddha. It’s by Zen Master Seung Sahn, who was a Korean Zen monk. (Location 8469)
SEAL leaders on the battlefield are expected to figure out what needs to be done and do it—to tell higher authority what they plan to do, rather than ask, “What do you want me to do?” Junior leaders must be proactive rather than reactive. (Location 2475)
Create a separate space for work, study, exercise, entertainment, and cooking. The mantra I find useful is “One space, one use.”
What we truly want to have are friends who are never jealous of what we have achieved, rather celebrate us for that!
Learn at least the basics of the realm you’re operating in, while acknowledging that you’re a Stranger, not a Lifer. However, keep in mind that basic information is easy to obtain and often gives the acquirer an unwarranted confidence.
“The amygdala is the source of many of our emotional reactions, both positive and negative. When someone violates your personal space or gets in your face, it’s the amygdala that produces the rage you feel. On the other hand, when you meet someone who looks like your grandmother and you experience a warm feeling of affection for this lady you don’t even know, that’s also the amygdala, in this case accessing a pleasant emotional memory. The amygdala both forms and recalls emotional memories; and if you understand this, your emotional reactions will probably make much more sense to you”
professional needs to know when to say “No,” even to their own employers, because, as Bob Martin put it, professionals have certain lines they won’t cross. (Location 1455)
Your outcomes are a lagging measure of your habits. Your net worth is a lagging measure of your financial habits. Your weight is a lagging measure of your eating habits. Your knowledge is a lagging measure of your learning habits. Your clutter is a lagging measure of your cleaning habits. You get what you repeat.
Google Reverse Image Search is a surprisingly useful tool if you’re ever trying to perform reconnaissance, or just learn where an image came from or where else it might be used on the Internet. Simply browse to Google Images and drag and drop the image onto the page. (Location 7154)
Whether in the ranks of military units or companies and corporations, the frontline troops never have as clear an understanding of the strategic picture as senior leaders might anticipate. It is critical that those senior leaders impart a general understanding of that strategic knowledge—the why—to their troops. (Location 1104)
“When you’re told that something is impossible, is that the end of the conversation, or does that start a second dialogue in your mind, how to get around whoever it is that’s just told you that you can’t do something? (Location 8531)
“What do you got?” I asked. “Two wounded. Need CASEVAC. And fire support,” he responded. Just as he had been taught: simple, clear, concise information—exactly what was needed. (Location 1854)
ATTENTION TO DETAIL
It was a realization for him that even when a leader thinks his troops understand the bigger picture, they very often have difficulty connecting the dots between the tactical mission they are immersed in with the greater overarching goal. (Location 3025)
Remember how long you've been putting this off, how many extensions the gods gave you, and you didn't use them. At some point you have to recognize what world it is that you belong to; what power rules it and from what source you spring; that there is limit to the time assigned you, and if a you don't use it to free yourself it will be gone and will never return.
The solution is simple: To all the people who matter to you and to whom you matter, take the initiative to give them enough attention, preferably, to their positive qualities. Be demonstrative. Be vocal. Develop expressiveness. Invest quality time. Shower them with lavish praise. Give them a lot of encouragement. Make your presence in the relationship adequately felt.
“Desire is a contract you make with yourself to be unhappy until you get what you want.” I don’t think most of us realize that’s what it is. I think we go about desiring things all day long, and then wondering why we’re unhappy. So, I like to stay aware of that because then I can choose my desires very carefully. I try not to have more than one big desire in my life at any given time, and I also recognize that as the axis of my suffering. I realize that that’s where I’ve chosen to be unhappy. I think that is an important one.” (Location 8903)
But I could have done a far better job as a leader to understand for myself the strategic impact of our operations and passed this insight to my troops. (Location 3022)
“An analogy may help you remember how important it is to activate the circuitry of anxiety, even though this is an uncomfortable experience. When you’re making a cup of tea, you’ll have better results if the water is hot. Putting tea leaves or a tea bag in a cup of cold water won’t be as effective in allowing the flavor of the tea to be infused into the water. In a similar way, your neural circuits need to be activated (or hot) to make new connections. When it comes to anxiety, you need to be exposed to the heat if you want to rewire your neural circuitry.”
a habit needs to be enjoyable for it to last. Simple bits of reinforcement—like soap that smells great or toothpaste that has a refreshing mint flavor or seeing $50 hit your savings account—can offer the immediate pleasure you need to enjoy a habit. And change is easy when it is enjoyable.
Love the discipline you know, and let it support you.
“Don’t break the chain” is a powerful mantra. Don’t break the chain of sales calls and you’ll build a successful book of business. Don’t break the chain of workouts and you’ll get fit faster than you’d expect. Don’t break the chain of creating every day and you will end up with an impressive portfolio. Habit tracking is powerful because it leverages multiple Laws of Behavior Change. It simultaneously makes a behavior obvious, attractive, and satisfying.
“These ideas” = having a “secret” as described in Peter Thiel’s Zero to One: knowing or believing something that the rest of the world thinks is nonsense.] (Location 8566)
And another day, she asked me shyly what would happen if she should have a miraculous recovery—would we love each other still, and stay together, or would the old problems rise again to spoil things as before? I didn’t know, and that is what I said. We had tried to be honest, and anyway, D would not have been fooled. I shrugged unhappily, she winced, then we both laughed. In that moment, at least, we really understood that it didn’t matter, not because she was going to die but because all truth that mattered was here now.
Show people in other departments that you want to work with them
“when thoughts or images in the cortex have initiated the anxiety response, changing those thoughts or images can definitely ease or prevent anxiety”
“The more you know what you really want, and where you’re really going, the more what everybody else is doing starts to diminish. (Location 7980)
Schedule and routine is very important to rely on for those times when you aren’t feeling all that motivated. We’ve already covered that, so I won’t go over it again, but make sure you do set up some sort of a schedule or routine. (Location 1944)
Have you ever seen a business executive, discovering there is a problem with an airline reservation, start to yell and scream at the ticket clerk? Here is the one guy left with the power to get him on that plane, and he goes out of his way to alienate him.
radiates that inner quiet which is often associated with spiritual attainment,
“The first step is to recognize when the cortex is producing thoughts or images that may lead to anxiety. When you become aware of these thoughts and their anxiety-inducing effects, you can begin to recognize the thoughts, identify when they occur, and take steps to change them.”
“How many young college graduates have taken demanding jobs in high-powered firms, vowing that they will work hard to earn money that will enable them to retire and pursue their real interests when they are thirty-five? But by the time they reach that age, they have large mortgages, children to school, houses in the suburbs that necessitate at least two cars per family, and a sense that life is not worth living without really good wine and expensive holidays abroad. What are they supposed to do, go back to digging up roots? No, they double their efforts and keep slaving away”
“That is another critical component of leadership,” I quickly replied. “Dealing with people’s egos. And you can do so by using one of the main principles we have taught you during our course: Extreme Ownership.” (Location 1460)
It is easier to build new habits in a new environment because you are not fighting against old cues.
The SEALs with little or no ownership were somewhat in the dark. As a result, they had a harder time understanding why we were taking the risks (Location 3034)
“Most people claim that their social hierarchy is natural and just, while those of other societies are based on false and ridiculous criteria. Modern Westerners are taught to scoff at the idea of racial hierarchy. They are shocked by laws prohibiting blacks to live in white neighbourhoods, or to study in white schools, or to be treated in white hospitals. But the hierarchy of rich and poor – which mandates that rich people live in separate and more luxurious neighbourhoods, study in separate and more prestigious schools, and receive medical treatment in separate and better-equipped facilities – seems perfectly sensible to many Americans and Europeans. Yet it’s a proven fact that most rich people are rich for the simple reason that they were born into a rich family, while most poor people will remain poor throughout their lives simply because they were born into a poor family” Excerpt From Sapiens: A Brief History of Humankind Yuval Noah Harari This material may be protected by copyright.
Nor can I feel angry at my relative, or hate him. We were born to work together like feet, hands, and eyes, like the two rows of teeth, upper and lower. To obstruct each other is unnatural. To feel anger at someone, to turn your back on him: these are obstructions.
during those early years of formal training, I actually found myself growing more distracted than before. All sorts of things annoyed me: physical discomfort, back-
“Habits are, simply, reliable solutions to recurring problems in our environment.”
Emotions born but not expressed do not get buried dead, but get buried alive. All suppressed emotions keep burning from within.
when we remove the points of friction that sap our time and energy, we can achieve more with less effort.
the consequences of bad habits are delayed while the rewards are immediate. Smoking might kill you in ten years, but it reduces stress and eases your nicotine cravings now. Overeating is harmful in the long run but appetizing in the moment. Sex—safe or not—provides pleasure right away.
Join a culture where (1) your desired behavior is the normal behavior and (2) you already have something in common with the group.
When neurons connec~,.they form a bond very much like old friendships. They get into a habit of passing the same sorts of mes- sages back and forth, the way old friends tend to reinforce each other's judgments about people, events, and experiences. This bonding is the biological basis for many of what ~e call mental habits,
“The dairy industry has its own ways of forcing animals to do its will. Cows, goats and sheep produce milk only after giving birth to calves, kids and lambs, and only as long as the youngsters are suckling. To continue a supply of animal milk, a farmer needs to have calves, kids or lambs for suckling, but must prevent them from monopolising the milk. One common method throughout history was to simply slaughter the calves and kids shortly after birth, milk the mother for all she was worth, and then get her pregnant again. This is still a very widespread technique. In many modern dairy farms a milk cow usually lives for about five years before being slaughtered. During these five years she is almost constantly pregnant, and is fertilised within 60 to 120 days after giving birth in order to preserve maximum milk production. Her calves are separated from her shortly after birth. The females are reared to become the next generation of dairy cows, whereas the males are handed over to the care of the meat industry”
He also deliberately and regularly exposes himself to the stories of those who have been subjected to horror, misfortune, and darkness. If (Location 6859)
Is the goal of enlightenment to see and love this world exactly as it is, or to see through it, to something beyond?
When understanding is separated from reality, we lose our powers. Understanding must constantly be tested against reality and updated accordingly. This isn’t a box we can tick, a task with a definite beginning and end, but a continuous process.
It’s at the seemingly bad moments, when people least expect it, that we can act swiftly and unexpectedly to pull off a big victory. While others are arrested by discouragement, we are not. We see the moment differently, and act accordingly.
Plan your daily workload in advance. Single out the relatively few small jobs that absolutely must be done immediately in the morning. Then go directly to the big tasks and pursue them to completion.
MONKEYS ON A SPINNING ROCK (Location 8933)
if someone says, about?" you can respond at once (and truthfully) that you are thinking this or thinking that. And it would be obvious at once from , “What are you thinking your answer that your thoughts were straightforward and considerate ones-the thoughts of an unselfish person, one unconcerned with pleasure and with sensual indulgence generally, with squabbling, with slander and envy, or anything else you'd be ashamed to be caught thinking.
before going to the semifinals. He’s napping on a bleacher. (Location 9349)
Risk and failure are a state of mind.There should never be any fear.And no regret.
“In Aldous Huxley’s dystopian novel Brave New World, published in 1932 at the height of the Great Depression, happiness is the supreme value and psychiatric drugs replace the police and the ballot as the foundation of politics. Each day, each person takes a dose of ‘soma’, a synthetic drug which makes people happy without harming their productivity and efficiency. The World State that governs the entire globe is never threatened by wars, revolutions, strikes or demonstrations, because all people are supremely content with their current conditions, whatever they may be. Huxley’s vision of the future is far more troubling than George Orwell’s Nineteen Eighty-Four. Huxley’s world seems monstrous to most readers, but it is hard to explain why. Everybody is happy all the time – what could be wrong with that?”
There is a 'Knower' in each of us. That's the value-based self.
So I had to explain why. (Location 3545)
Clarity of vision allows us to have this belief. That’s not to say we’re always going to be 100 percent certain of everything, or that we even should be. Rather, it’s that we can rest assured we’re heading generally in the right direction—that we don’t need to constantly compare ourselves with other people or change our mind every three seconds based on new information. (Location 292)
Days and months are the travellers of eternity. So are the years that pass by. . . . I myself have been tempted for a long time by the cloud-moving wind—filled with a strong desire to wander. . . . I walked through mists and clouds, breathing the thin air of high altitudes and stepping on slippery ice and snow, till at last through a gateway of clouds, as it seemed, to the very paths of the sun and moon, I reached the summit, completely out of breath and nearly frozen to death. Presently the sun went down and the moon rose glistening in the sky.
“The future is already here—it’s just unevenly distributed.”—William Gibson (Location 7062)
We verbalize this principle with this direction: “Relax, look around, make a call.” (Location 2179)
“Engage with them,” directed Jocko. “Build a personal relationship with them. Explain to them what you need from them and why, and ask them what you can do to help them get you what you need. Make them a part of your team, not an excuse for your team. (Location 1717)
Experience follows intention. Wherever we are, whatever we do, all we need to do is recognize our thoughts, feelings, and perceptions as something natural. Neither rejecting nor accepting, we· simpli ac- knowledge the experience and let it pass. If we keep this up, we'll eventually find ourselves becoming able to manage situations we once found painful, scary, or sad. We'll discoyer a sense of confidence that
“In the first half of this chapter, you assessed your tendency to experience cortex-based anxiety and determined whether specific thought processes are contributing to your anxiety. In the second half of the chapter, you assessed whether you’re prone to experiences of amygdala-based anxiety: unexplained anxiety, rapid physiological responding, unplanned aggressive feelings or behavior, inability to think clearly, and extreme responses.”
Strength is the ability to maintain a hold of oneself. It’s being the person who never gets mad, who cannot be rattled, because they are in control of their passions—rather than controlled by their passions. (Location 490)
The big question I ask is, ‘When I had the opportunity, did I choose courage over comfort?’” TF: This is a great question for daily review as part of a 5-Minute Journal or other evening journaling (Location 9451)
“Remember, courage is not the absence of fear; courage is acting despite fear. The more you experience anxiety and stay in the situation long enough for your fear to diminish, the stronger the new circuitry will become.”
leader must be attentive to details but not obsessed by them. A good leader does not get bogged down in the minutia of a tactical problem at the expense of strategic success. He or she must monitor and check the team’s progress in the most critical tasks. But that leader cannot get sucked into the details and lose track of the bigger picture. (Location 3645)
The Cardinal Rule of Behavior Change: What is immediately rewarded is repeated.
Numbers are a form of partial script as you can’t write poetry or a novel out of it
"Everything is just an impression."
"If you seek tranquillity, do less." Or (more accurately) do what's essential.
“Our language evolved as a way of gossiping. According to this theory Homo sapiens is primarily a social animal. Social cooperation is our key for survival and reproduction. It is not enough for individual men and women to know the whereabouts of lions and bison. It’s much more important for them to know who in their band hates whom, who is sleeping with whom, who is honest, and who is a cheat.”
habits can be easier to change in a new environment. It helps to escape the subtle triggers and cues that nudge you toward your current habits. Go to a new place—a different coffee shop, a bench in the park, a corner of your room you seldom use—and create a new routine there.
The impression you've made is what allows you to be less than perfect. If you can take advantage of all the little opportunities to create an overall ongoing impression of competence, effectiveness, maturity and fair-minded toughness - the kind of person people want to do business with - they will overlook the occasional transgression. People will forgive all sorts of 'out-of-character' behavour in you if their overall lasting impression is a favourable one.
“For the first time in human history, supply began to outstrip demand. And an entirely new problem was born: who is going to buy all this stuff?”
If I miss one day, I try to get back into it as quickly as possible. Missing one workout happens, but I’m not going to miss two in a row. Maybe I’ll eat an entire pizza, but I’ll follow it up with a healthy meal. I can’t be perfect, but I can avoid a second lapse. As soon as one streak ends, I get started on the next one.
“Second, an entire tradition might be ignorant of unimportant things. By definition, whatever the great gods or the wise people of the past did not bother to tell us was unimportant. For example, if our Yorkshire peasant wanted to know how spiders weave their webs, it was pointless to ask the priest, because there was no answer to this question in any of the Christian Scriptures. That did not mean, however, that Christianity was deficient. Rather, it meant that understanding how spiders weave their webs was unimportant. After all, God knew perfectly well how spiders do it. If this were a vital piece of information, necessary for human prosperity and salvation, God would have included a comprehensive explanation in the Bible.”
Take action on your plan immediately. Do something. Do anything.
“In reality, you need not take every thought or emotion you have seriously. You can allow many thoughts and emotions to simply pass without undue attention or analysis.”
“The fact is we are not doing the best job. Evidentiary standards are increasing. We have to do a better. This method gives us a good standard operating procedure to utilize. With discipline and training, we will be much more effective in our search procedures than we have been. So we are going to try this method. Let’s give it some test runs and see how it works.” (Location 3549)
If they were there, he took advantage of them. If not, he didn't miss them.
My ego took no offense to my subordinate leaders on the frontlines calling the shots. (Location 2363)
the beginning of your career, you spend time to earn money. Once you hit your stride in any capacity, you should spend money to earn time, as the latter is nonrenewable. (Location 9699)
When you bingeeat or light up or browse social media, what you really want is not a potato chip or a cigarette or a bunch of likes. What you really want is to feel different.
leaders who exhibit Extreme Ownership will empower key leaders within their teams to figure out a way to win. Some of the boldest, most successful plans in history have not come from the senior ranks but from frontline leaders. (Location 3810)
“They tried to bury us. They didn’t know we were seeds.” (Location 9919)
“What if I could only subtract to solve problems?” (Location 9648)
“But ultimately, they must directly experience the situation, usually repeatedly. Obviously, this is a challenging form of treatment, but research shows that it’s exactly the approach needed to rewire the amygdala”
As mentioned before, more than 80% of the world-class performers I’ve interviewed meditate in the mornings in some fashion. But what of the remaining 20%? Nearly all of them have meditation-like activities. One frequent pattern is listening to a single track or album on repeat, which can act as an external mantra for aiding focus and present-state awareness. (Location 8271)
I said that someone looks down on each of us in diffcult hours—a friend, a wife, somebody alive or dead, or a God—and he would not expect us to disappoint him. He would hope to find us suffering proudly—not miserably—knowing how to die.
completing a complicated· task.
‘Oh, everything feels terrible and awful. It’s all gone to shit.’ Then I’d [consider], ‘But if you think about it, the stars are really far away,’ then you try to imagine the world from the stars. Then you sort of zoom in and you’re like, ‘Oh, there’s this tiny little character there for a fragment of time worrying about X.’” (Location 8422)
As a leader employing Extreme Ownership, if your team isn’t doing what you need them to do, you first have to look at yourself. Rather than blame them for not seeing the strategic picture, you must figure out a way to better communicate it to them in terms that are simple, clear, and concise, so that they understand. This is what leading down the chain of command is all about. (Location 3058)
“As you can see, one clear distinction between the amygdala and the cortex is that they operate on different timetables. The amygdala can cause you to act on information sooner than your cortex can process it, orchestrating a bodily response before the cortex has even finished organizing the information for you to perceive it. While this is beneficial in some situations, the fact that we have little control over the amygdala’s rapid responses means that we experience our fear and anxiety responses, rather than consciously controlling them.”
They figure they can enjoy the nice day and get work done later that evening. This kind of thinking is a recipe for disaster, because when evening comes, there is always a new set of distractions or you end up too tired to sit in front of a computer. (Location 1927)
The best relationship doesn’t necessarily agree on everything.The best relationships have the best acceptance despite their differences.
if you don’t cultivate ‘turning it on’ as a way of life in the little moments—and there are hundreds of times more little moments than big—then there’s no chance in the big moments. . . . (Location 9361)
“When kings fail to do their jobs and regulate the markets properly, it leads to loss of trust, dwindling credit and economic depression. That was the lesson taught by the Mississippi Bubble of 1719, and anyone who forgot it was reminded by the US housing bubble of 2007, and the ensuing credit crunch and recession”
Making progress is satisfying, and visual measures—like moving paper clips or hairpins or marbles—provide clear evidence of your progress. As a result, they reinforce your behavior and add a little bit of immediate satisfaction to any activity.
“most people today successfully live up to the capitalist-consumerist ideal. The new ethic promises paradise on condition that the rich remain greedy and spend their time making more money, and that the masses give free rein to their cravings and passions”
A professional is someone you can count on to get a job done and do it right, but a professional also doesn’t just tell you what you want to hear. A professional will let you know when something isn’t possible or the path you want to proceed down is wrong. (Location 1413)
If you think about the biographies you read or the documentaries you watch about the greats in various fields, this same pattern of addictive, passionate behavior surfaces. Jazz saxophone great John Coltrane reportedly practiced so much that his lips would bleed.
“My focus and concentration goes up just by putting my headphones [on] while writing. I don’t even have to play any music.” Without realizing it, he was conditioning himself. In the beginning, he put his headphones on, played some music he enjoyed, and did focused work. After doing it five, ten, twenty times, putting his headphones on became a cue that he automatically associated with increased focus. The craving followed naturally.
Once you begin to watch these thoughts, emo- tions, and so on come and go with awareness, you'll start to recognize that they are all relative phenomena. They can only be defined by their relation to other experiences. A happy thought is distinguished by its difference from an unhappy thought, just as a tall person may be distinguished as "tall" only in relation to someone who is shorter. By himself, that person is neither tall nor short. Similarly, a thought or a feeling can't, in itself, be described as positive or negative except through comparison with other thoughts. Without this kind of comparison, a thought, a feeling, or a perception is just what it is. It has no inherent qualities or characteristics, and can't be defined in itself except through comparison.
getting up in front of an audience and talking directly to them is one of the most impactful things you can do. (Location 2667)
their parents or other adults may experience inappropriately strong feelings of fear, resentment, or other unpleasant emotions when deal- ing with authority figures in adult life. Thesetypes of distorted reac- tions often result from the loose method of association on which the amygdala relies to trigger a memory response
One technique that might help you think about what to write is to have a conversation, or even an argument, with someone about that topic. Often, I’ll find that I can write the best about something that I had previously discussed in a conversation. Call up a friend and start debating and you’ll find you have pages’ worth to write about a topic. (Location 2482)
“In the long history of humankind, those who learned to collaborate and improvise most effectively have prevailed.”
People who are better at delaying gratification have higher SAT scores, lower levels of substance abuse, lower likelihood of obesity, better responses to stress, and superior social skills.
“Egg-laying hens, for example, have a complex world of behavioural needs and drives. They feel strong urges to scout their environment, forage and peck around, determine social hierarchies, build nests and groom themselves. But the egg industry often locks the hens inside tiny coops, and it is not uncommon for it to squeeze four hens to a cage, each given a floor space of about twenty-five by twenty-two centimetres. The hens receive sufficient food, but they are unable to claim a territory, build a nest or engage in other natural activities. Indeed, the cage is so small that hens are often unable even to flap their wings or stand fully erect”
Emotion, which is suffering, ceases to be suffering as soon as we form a clear and precise picture of it.
A leader must be close with subordinates but not too close. The best leaders understand the motivations of their team members and know their people—their lives and their families. (Location 3654)
Before starting on anything, you should always ask yourself, “What are the potential consequences of doing or not doing this task?”
The fact that he could focus his mind so capably even in a claustrophobic environment suggests that his meditation training overrode his propensity for panic attacks
“Being deeply loved by someone gives you strength, while loving someone deeply gives you courage . . .” (Location 10007)
the essence of mind is untouched by unpleasant thoughts or conditions that might ordinarily be considered painful. It's naturally peaceful, like the mind of a young child accompanying his parents through a museum. While his parents are completely caught up in judging and evaluating the various works of art on display, the child merely sees. He doesn't wonder how much some piece of art might have cost, how old a statue is, or whether one painter's work is better than another's. His perspective is completely innocent, accept- iiig everything it beholds. This innocent perspective is known in Bud- dhist terms as "natural peace," a condition similar to the sensation of total relaxation a person experiences after, say, going to the gym or
Every tactical-level team leader must understand not just what to do but why they are doing it. If frontline leaders do not understand why, they must ask their boss to clarify the why. (Location 2470)
New identities require new evidence. If you keep casting the same votes you’ve always cast, you’re going to get the same results you’ve always had. If nothing changes, nothing is going to change.
you don’t understand or believe in the decisions coming down from your leadership, it is up to you to ask questions until you understand how and why those decisions are being made. Not knowing the why prohibits you from believing in the mission. When you are in a leadership position, that is a recipe for failure, and it is unacceptable. As a leader, you must believe.” (Location 1204)
“How exactly did Armand Peugeot, the man, create Peugeot, the company? In much the same way that priests and sorcerers have created gods and demons throughout history, and in which thousands of French curés were still creating Christ’s body every Sunday in the parish churches. It all revolved around telling stories, and convincing people to believe them”
“The average life expectancy jumped from around twenty-five to forty years, to around sixty-seven in the entire world, and to around eighty years in the developed world”
Making progress is satisfying, and visual measures—like moving paper clips or hairpins or marbles—provide clear evidence of your progress. As a result, they reinforce your behavior and add a little bit of immediate satisfaction to any activity. Visual
“The difference between the people you admire and everybody else [is that the former are] the people who read.” (Location 7946)
guidance down to their subordinate leadership.” “Couldn’t things get confused? Like in the old game of telephone, where you whisper a word around a circle of people and it comes back different from how it started?” asked the president. “That is why simplicity is so important,” (Location 2552)
Think for a moment about the Agricultural Revolution from the viewpoint of wheat. Ten thousand years ago wheat was just a wild grass, one of many, confined to a small range in the Middle East. Suddenly, within just a few short millennia, it was growing all over the world.”
Don't give anything in life that exalted status that it can disturb your peace. Put your peace above everything. If you leave petty things as petty, your life will be pretty.
the true question is: “Are you becoming the type of person you want to become?”
When something wasn’t completely clear, our SEAL operators asked for clarification, which enabled us to feel confident they understood and were taking ownership of their role. (Location 2883)
But a leader must be able to speak up when it matters. They must be able to stand up for the team and respectfully push back against a decision, order, or direction that could negatively impact overall mission success. (Location 3652)
so that you may have longer enjoyment of an improved mind, one that is at peace with itself.
Here is one of the greatest questions you will ever ask and answer: “What one skill, if I developed and did it in an excellent fashion, would have the greatest positive impact on my career?”
Researchers estimate that 40 to 50 percent of our actions on any given day are done out of habit. This is already a substantial percentage, but the true
Furthermore, when you need the advice of others, especially in higher stakes situations, ask questions to probe the limits of their circles. Then ask yourself how the situation might influence the information they choose to provide you.
“in many societies more people are in danger of dying from obesity than from starvation.”
One of the most powerful things you can do as a human being in our hyperconnected, 24/7 media world is say: “I don’t know.” Or, more provocatively: “I don’t care.” (Location 461)
they are friendly forces mistakenly shooting at us? The answers are almost never immediately obvious. In some cases, the answers to who attacked and how will never be known. Regardless, leaders cannot be paralyzed (Location 3371)
“Culture tends to argue that it forbids only that which is unnatural. But from a biological perspective, nothing is unnatural. Whatever is possible is by definition also natural. A truly unnatural behaviour, one that goes against the laws of nature, simply cannot exist, so it would need no prohibition. No culture has ever bothered to forbid men to photosynthesise, women to run faster than the speed of light, or negatively charged electrons to be attracted to each other.”
In one study, scientists instructed insomniacs to get into bed only when they were tired. If they couldn’t fall asleep, they were told to sit in a different room until they became sleepy. Over time, subjects began to associate the context of their bed with the action of sleeping, and it became easier to quickly fall asleep
What seems impossible at present becomes easier with practice. There's nothing you can't get used to. Just think about all the unpleasant things you've accepted as ordinary, like wading through traffic or dealing with a bad-tempered relative or coworker.
I often share exact under-the-hood details of how I’ve built the podcast, put together Kickstarter campaigns, etc. I do this because of two core beliefs. Belief #1—It’s rarely a zero-sum game (if someone wins, someone else must lose), and the more I help people with details, the more detailed help I receive. Belief #2—If it is competitive, I’m simply offering people the details of my game. My attention to detail will scare off half of the people who would have tried; 40% will try it and be worse than me; 10% will try it and be better than me, but . . . see Belief #1. That 10% will often reach out to teach me what they’ve learned, as they’re grateful for my own transparency. (Location 9327)
Whenever possible, avoid mixing the context of one habit with another. When you start mixing contexts, you’ll start mixing habits—and the easier ones will usually win out. This is one reason why the versatility of modern technology is both a strength and a weakness. You can use your phone for all sorts of tasks, which makes it a powerful device. But when you can use your phone to do nearly anything, it becomes hard to associate it with one task.
The standards you set for your own work and behavior should be higher than anyone else could set for you.
Improvement is not just about learning habits, it’s also about finetuning them. Reflection and review ensures that you spend your time on the right things and make course corrections whenever necessary—like
“When you’re experiencing the fight, flight, or freeze response, the amygdala is in the driver’s seat and you’re a passenger. That’s why, in emergency situations, you often feel as though you’re observing yourself responding rather than consciously controlling your response. There’s a reason why we don’t feel in control in these moments, or in control of our anxiety: the amygdala isn’t just faster—it also has the neurological capability to override other brain processes”
Whatever your identity is right now, you only believe it because you have proof of it. If you go to church every Sunday for twenty years, you have evidence that you are religious. If you study biology for one hour every night, you have evidence that you are studious. If you go to the gym even when it’s snowing, you have evidence that you are committed to fitness. The more evidence you have for a belief, the more strongly you will believe
Beasts avoid the dangers which they see, and when they have escaped them are free from care; but we men torment ourselves over that which is to come as well as over that which is past. Many of our blessings bring bane to us; for memory recalls the tortures of fear, while foresight anticipates them. The present alone can make no man wretched.
work on your business instead of in your business, (Location 9667)
During our training cycle, in the precious few hours we didn’t have a scheduled training evolution, we were in the gym physically pushing ourselves through punishing, high-intensity workouts. If there was no gym at our training location, we’d be out on the road for a hard run, in the parking lot dragging or flipping heavy tires, or on the mats in fierce grappling and jiu-jitsu contests—whatever we could do to stay strong and conditioned. Each (Location 938)
The first mistake is never the one that ruins you. It is the spiral of repeated mistakes that follows. Missing once is an accident. Missing twice is the start of a new habit.
The people with the best selfcontrol are typically the ones who need to use it the least. It’s easier to practice selfrestraint when you don’t have to use it very often. So, yes, perseverance, grit, and willpower are essential to success, but the way to improve these qualities is not by wishing you were a more disciplined person, but by creating a more disciplined environment.
welcoming wholeheartedly whatever comes-whatever we're assigned-not worrying too often, or with any selfish motive, about what other people say. Or do, or think.
“The true test for a good brief,” Jocko continued, “is not whether the senior officers are impressed. It’s whether or not the troops that are going to execute the operation actually understand it. Everything else is bullshit. (Location 2853)
This means that if you have a list of ten items to do, 20 Apply the 80/20 Rule to Everything 21 two of those items will turn out to be worth five or ten times or
“We highly recommend exercise as a strategy for reducing anxiety because, quite simply, it works. A variety of studies have demonstrated that aerobic exercise can ease anxiety (Conn 2010; DeBoer et al. 2012). Reductions in anxiety”
“There is nothing so certain in our fears that’s not yet more certain in the fact that most of what we dread comes to nothing.” (Location 634)
The way he handled the material comforts that fortune had supplied him in such abundance-without arrogance and without apology.
Desire is the engine that drives behavior. Every action is taken because of the anticipation that precedes it. It is the craving that leads to the response.
No man should judge unless he asks himself in absolute honesty whether in a similar situation he might not have done the same.
“The circuitry in your brain is shaped by the specific experiences you’ve had, and it can be changed as a result of your continuing experiences. For example, connections between particular neurons are strengthened when you use them. Some of us continue to use our memories of multiplication tables to calculate math equations, and those connections remain as strong as when we were in school. But some of us rely on calculators, so we don’t regularly use the brain circuits storing the multiplication tables, and our memory of these tables weakens.”
Successful, effective people are those who launch directly into their major tasks and then discipline themselves to work steadily and single-mindedly until those tasks are complete.
“You never want a serious crisis to go to waste. Things that we had postponed for too long, that were long-term, are now immediate and must be dealt with. [A] crisis provides the opportunity for us to do things that you could not do before.”
#7—“If you want to improve, be content to be thought foolish and stupid.”—Epictetus (Location 8720)
Life (and our job) is difficult enough. Let’s not make it harder by getting emotional about insignificant matters or digging in for battles we don’t actually care about. (Location 650)
‘Let me tell you something, brother. The notes are right underneath your fingers, baby. You just gotta take the time out to play the right notes. That’s life.” (Location 9779)
Gradually I began to recognize how feeble and transitory the thoughts and emotions that had troubled me for years actually were, and how fixating on small problems had turned them into big ones. Just by sitting quietly and observing how rapidly, and in many ways illogically, my thoughts and emotions came and went, I began to recognize in a direct way that they weren't nearly as solid or real as they appeared to be. And once I began to let go of my belief in the story they seemed to tell, I began to see the "author" beyond them-the infinitely vast, infinitely open awareness that is the nature of mind itself.
One of his tools for coming up with unbelievable (yet ultimately accurate) predictions is making a list of what everyone thinks is true or will be true, and asking “What if that weren’t true?” for each, brainstorming the ramifications. (Location 7751)
The forest fire we face today is the little spark we overlooked yesterday. Most of today's problems are yesterday's challenges overlooked.
One of the first strategies I’d recommend is to start commenting on other people’s blogs. Find other developers who are blogging about similar topics as you and write meaningful comments on their blog, and when you have the opportunity, link back to your blog. (Location 2488)
And why can it not happen? Because in such cases men know that they have all things in common, especially their troubles.
“How much pain have cost us the evils which have never happened!” (Location 633)
If you want to dunk a basketball, being seven feet tall is very useful. If you want to perform a gymnastics routine, being seven feet tall is a great hindrance. Our environment determines the suitability of our genes and the utility of our natural talents. When our environment changes, so do the qualities that determine success.
They are usually achievers and can show results, but this is because they are effective in selling their ideas and themselves inside the company as well as outside the company.
Look at whatever you’re afraid of and ask, “What is on the other side of fear, if I push through this?” The answer is generally nothing. There are few or no negative consequences, or they’re temporary. (Location 9743)
Looking back, it is clear that, despite what happened, the full ownership I took of the situation actually increased the trust my commanding officer and master chief had in me. If I had tried to pass the blame on to others, I suspect I would have been fired—deservedly (Location 450)
Every action you take is a vote for the type of person you wish to become. No single instance will transform your beliefs, but as the votes build up, so does the evidence of your new identity. This is one reason why meaningful change does not require radical change. Small habits can make a meaningful difference by providing evidence of a new identity. And if a change is meaningful, it actually is big. That’s the paradox of making small improvements.
“Confusing a thought with reality is a very seductive process due to the cortex’s tendency to believe it possesses the real meaning of every thought, emotion, or physical sensation. Actually, the cortex is surprisingly prone to misinterpretations and errors”
“As more effort was directed towards cereal cultivation, there was less time to gather and hunt wild species. The foragers became farmers.”
Snow mountains, more than sea or sky, serve as a mirror to one’s own true being, utterly still, utterly clear, a void, an Emptiness without life or sound that carries in Itself all life, all sound.
“And as you learned in chapter 6, relaxing your muscles can help ease anxiety. If you run or walk briskly when you feel anxious, you’ll make use of muscles that have been prepared for action. This will lower levels of adrenaline and use up glucose released into the bloodstream by the stress response. And after you exercise, you’ll experience substantial, long-lasting muscle relaxation”
It is also important to remember that no one can have a circle of competence that encompasses everything. There is only so much you can know with great depth of understanding. This is why being able to identify your circle, and knowing how to move around outside of it, is so important.
A habit tracker is a simple way to measure whether you did a habit. The most basic format is to get a calendar and cross off each day you stick with your routine.
Becoming the best version of yourself requires you to continuously edit your beliefs, and to upgrade and expand your identity.
with acceptance, and the negative emotion will turn into a positive one.
Your habits shape your identity, and your identity shapes your habits. It’s a twoway street.
Wonderfully, Jang-bu laughed aloud, as did Dawa and Phu-Tsering, although it meant wet clothes and a wet sleeping bag for the head sherpa. That happy-go-lucky spirit, that acceptance which is not fatalism but a deep trust in life, made me ashamed. October 27 IN THE STONE fall of this canyon, my tent is pitched at a sharp angle, with bedroll pinched among sharp rocks.
Prioritizing long-term interests over immediate gains
In modern society, many of the choices you make today will not benefit you immediately. If you do a good job at work, you’ll get a paycheck in a few weeks. If you exercise today, perhaps you won’t be overweight next year. If you save money now, maybe you’ll have enough for retirement decades from now. You live in what scientists call a delayedreturn environment because you can work for years before your actions deliver the intended payoff. The human brain did not evolve for life in a delayedreturn environment.
“A person who wishes to influence the decisions of governments, organisations and companies must therefore learn to speak in numbers. Experts do their best to translate even ideas such as ‘poverty’, ‘happiness’ and ‘honesty’ into numbers (‘the poverty line’, ‘subjective well-being levels’, ‘credit rating’). Entire fields of knowledge, such as physics and engineering, have already lost almost all touch with the spoken human language, and are maintained solely by mathematical script”
but back then I was also just as busy: always working on projects, engineering for work and then engineering at home. I don’t feel like I’ve changed much since then, and I guess this proves it, sort of.
the inherent potential of your mind.
as the Buddha proposed in the first teachings he gave upon attaining enlightenment, the essence of ordinary life is suffering, then one of the most effective antidotes is laughter-particularly laughter
We would never let another person jerk us around the way we let our impulses do. (Location 500)
“The willingness to admit ignorance has made modern science more dynamic, supple and inquisitive than any previous tradition of knowledge. This has hugely expanded our capacity to understand how the world works and our ability to invent new technologies. But it presents us with a serious problem that most of our ancestors did not have to cope with. Our current assumption that we do not know everything, and that even the knowledge we possess is tentative, extends to the shared myths that enable millions of strangers to cooperate effectively.”
“Many people believe that certain situations are the cause of their anxiety, but anxiety always begins in the brain, not with the situation. Anxiety is a human emotion, produced by the human brain, and emotions are caused by the brain’s reaction to situations, not the situations themselves. People have different reactions to the same event because of their differing interpretations”
For many, it’s journaling—just a few pages where they write down their thoughts, fears, hopes. In these cases, the point is not so much the activity itself as it is the ritualized reflection. The idea is to take some time to look inward and examine. (Location 357)
Don't be distracted. Keep walking. Follow your own nature.
I’m not trying to sound like Mr. Smiley Positive Guy. That guy ignores the hard truth. That guy thinks a positive attitude will solve problems. It won’t. But neither will dwelling on the problem. No. Accept reality, but focus on the solution. Take that issue, take that setback, take that problem, and turn it into something good. Go forward. And, if you are part of a team, that attitude will spread throughout. (Location 10325)
“Consequently, truth is a poor test for knowledge. The real test is utility”
start to see some traction. Create a list of running blog post topics. Every time you think of a new idea, add it to this list. Then when you need to write a post, you’ll have plenty of ideas handy. (Location 2518)
“I think that in order to truly experience the light and the bright, you have to see the darkness. I think if you shield yourself from the darkness, you’ll not appreciate—and fully understand—the beauty of life.” (Location 6853)
“Action may not always bring happiness, but there is no happiness without action.” (Location 7642)
For this reason, they must believe in the cause for which they are fighting. (Location 256)
Maintain the element of surprise; stealth is more important than speed as we approach this target. 2) After the breach, once we make entry, speed is most important. Let’s get this target cleared and secured in a hurry. 3) Good PID (positive identification) of any potential threats. Be wary not to injure the hostage. And be ready to render medical assistance. As ground force (Location 2636)
You should not die of other people's cancer.
Like most people, I brought so much judgment to my experience. I believed that thoughts of anger, anxiety, fear, and so on that came and went throughout the day were bad or counterproductive-or at the very least inconsistent.with natural peace! The teachings of the Buddha~
The inability of people to say 'I don't know', even in innocent social situations, can give you an insight into their business character. I really do enjoy watching these people squirm sometimes as they try to bluff their way through conversations.
Habits do not restrict freedom. They create it. In fact, the people who don’t have their habits handled are often the ones with the least amount of freedom. Without good financial habits, you will always be struggling for the next dollar. Without good health habits, you will always seem to be short on energy. Without good learning habits, you will always feel like you’re behind the curve. If you’re always being forced to make decisions about simple tasks—when should I work out, where do I go to write, when do I pay the bills—then you have less time for freedom.
It doesn’t matter if it’s been twentyone days or thirty days or three hundred days. What matters is the rate at which you perform the behavior. You could do something twice in thirty days, or two hundred times. It’s the frequency that makes the difference.
“Man is the matter of the cosmos, contemplating itself,”
The key is to be able to see ahead to how easy some task or situation will be in the future and act now as if it were then. (Location 2027)
The majority of the time, we don’t even perceive what conflicts with our beliefs. It’s much easier to go on thinking what we’ve already been thinking than go through the pain of updating our existing, false beliefs. When it comes to seeing what is—that is, understanding reality—we can follow Charles Darwin’s advice to notice things “which easily escape attention,” and ask why things happened.
If you anticipate it, it will throw you off less. (Location 8688)
“In fact, evidence suggests that amygdala-based memory is longer lasting than cortex-based memory (LeDoux 2000). In other words, the cortex is much more likely than the amygdala to forget information or have trouble retrieving it”
Not to support this side or that in chariot-racing, this fighter or that in the die games.To with discomfort and not make demands. To do put up ay Own work, mind my own business, and have no time for slanderers.
“Also try to notice times when you’re holding your breath, breathing shallowly, or hyperventilating, and then make a deliberate effort to adopt a better breathing pattern. Breathing is an essential bodily response that you can control, and in the process, you can reduce amygdala activation and its effects. With”
“In learning to speak a new language, to play on a musical instrument, or to perform unaccustomed movements, great difficulty is felt, because the channels through which each sensation has to pass have not become established; but no sooner has frequent repetition cut a pathway, than this difficulty vanishes; the actions become so automatic that they can be performed while the mind is otherwise engaged.” Both common sense and scientific evidence agree: repetition is a form of change.
“When you worry, ask yourself, ‘What am I choosing to not see right now?’ What important things are you missing because you chose worry over introspection, alertness or wisdom?”
Eagerly anticipating some future event, passionately imagining something you desire, looking forward to some happy scenario—as pleasurable as these activities might seem, they ruin your chance at happiness here and now. (Location 658)
“Lesson number one, when people ask me what [interviewing] tips would I give, is aim for the heart, not the head. Once you get the heart, you can go to the head. Once you get the heart and the head, then you’ll have a pathway to the soul.” (Location 8150)
A Bhotia family without animals descends the trail, nods shyly, and is gone.
The goal is to make the time and location so obvious that, with enough repetition, you get an urge to do the right thing at the right time, even if you can’t say why.
If you can hitch your wagon to a few of your company's brightest stars, you will climb right up the ladder with them.
If your goal is to be the last person standing amid rounds of layoffs and the shipment of jobs overseas, you better make yourself generally useful. If you’re afraid that your once-crowded development office will become home to an onshore skeleton crew, it would serve you well to realize that when the team has only a few slots, a “just-a-tester” or “just-a-coder” is not going to be in demand. Better, if you just want to stand out and be remarkable, wrapping your head around The Big Picture is where it’s at.
This was a striking realization: I was Charlie Platoon commander, second in seniority only to Jocko in Task Unit Bruiser. And yet, immersed in the details of the tactical operations, I had not fully appreciated or understood how those operations so directly contributed to the strategic mission with spectacular results beyond anyone’s wildest dreams. (Location 3010)
stronger and more deeply connected, enhance your capacity to toler- ate the cascade of thoughts rushing through your mind
A professional is someone who may not have all the answers, but thoroughly studies their craft and seeks to hone their skills. A professional will freely admit when they don’t know the answer, but you can count on a professional to find it. (Location 1414)
“The amygdala is located near the center of the brain (see figure 1). As previously stated, the brain actually has two amygdalas, one in the left hemisphere and one in the right; but it’s customary to refer to the amygdala as singular, so we’ll continue this practice”
To live with a saint is not difficult, for a saint makes no comparisons, but saintlike aspiration presents problems.
“Who then is invincible? The one who cannot be upset by anything outside their reasoned choice.” (Location 514)
The Cardinal Rule of Behavior Change: What is immediately rewarded
To stand up straight-not straightened.
But I learned that good leaders don’t make excuses. Instead, they figure out a way to get it done and win.” (Location 843)
“So, to change your amygdala’s fear response to, say, a mouse, you must be in the presence of a mouse in order activate the memory circuits related to mice. Only then can new connections be made. Because the amygdala learns on the basis of associations or pairings, it must experience a change in these pairings for the circuitry to change. Not surprisingly, when your mouse-memory circuits are activated, you’re going to feel some anxiety.
Anger is more a message to you than to the world. Anger tells you to look into some inadequacy that is there in you.
“A person’s success in life can usually be measured by the number of uncomfortable conversations he or she is willing to have.” (Location 9443)
The wildwood brings on mild nostalgia, not for home or place, but for lost innocence—the paradise lost that, as Proust said, is the only paradise.
Create an environment where doing the right thing is as easy as possible.
comes down, in many ways, to the inner strength and self-awareness of individuals—what they value, what desires they keep in check, whether their understanding of fairness and justice can counteract the temptations of unlimited wealth and deference. (Location 594)
You can fake it for a while, but a lack of passion will catch up with you and your work.
Jocko had always encouraged us to be aggressive in decision-making. But part of being decisive was knowing and understanding that some decisions, while immediately impactful, can be quickly reversed or altered; other decisions, like shooting another human being, cannot be undone. If we waited to take this shot we could later change course, while a decision to pull the trigger and engage this shadowy target would be final. (Location 3330)
The key is to tie your desired behavior into something you already do each day. Once you have mastered this basic structure, you can begin to create larger stacks by chaining small habits together. This allows you to take advantage of the natural momentum that comes from one behavior leading into the next—a positive version of the Diderot Effect.
The people at the top of any competitive field are not only well trained, they are also well suited to the task. And this is why, if you want to be truly great, selecting the right place to focus is crucial. In short: genes do not determine your destiny.
When you’re starting a new habit, it’s important to keep the behavior as easy as possible so you can stick with it even when conditions aren’t perfect.
Let us have security systems in place, let us have foolproof systems, let us raise above our vulnerabilities, let us lock the cars and tie the horses, but above all in the interest of our own peace, let us trust the world all over again.
“My focus and concentration goes up just by putting my headphones [on] while writing. I don’t even have to play any music.” Without realizing it, he was conditioning himself. In the beginning, he put his headphones on, played some music he enjoyed, and did focused work. After doing it five, ten, twenty times, putting his headphones on became a cue that he automatically associated with increased focus. The craving followed naturally. Athletes use similar strategies to
“A famous example is lightning. Many cultures believed that lightning was the hammer of an angry god, used to punish sinners.”
“At every moment keep a sturdy mind on the task at hand, as a Roman and human being, doing it with strict and simple dignity, affection, freedom, and justice—giving yourself a break from all other considerations. (Location 447)
The projects people take on which are not part of their day-to-day This is job description, which have not been assigned to them, are those ast maje projects for which people get the most credit and recognition.
The attempt to develop a sense of humor and to see things in a humorous light is some kind of a trick learned while mastering the art of living. Yet it is possible to practice the art of living even in a concentration camp, although suffering is omnipresent. To
all we have is our own mind. (Location 231)
Each evening, there is a tiny moment—usually around 5:15 p.m.—that shapes the rest of my night. My wife walks in the door from work and either we change into our workout clothes and head to the gym or we crash onto the couch, order Indian food, and watch The Office.
What’s the difference between systems and goals? It’s a distinction I first learned from Scott Adams, the cartoonist behind the Dilbert comic. Goals are about the results you want to achieve. Systems are about the processes that lead to those results.
In the SEAL Teams, we taught our leaders to act decisively amid chaos. Jocko had taught me that, as a leader, my default setting should be aggressive—proactive rather than reactive. (Location 3431)
O, how incomprehensible everything was, and actually sad, although it was so beautiful. One knew nothing. One lived and ran about the earth and rode through forests, and certain things looked so challenging and promising and nostalgic: a star in the evening, a blue harebell, a reed-green pond, the eye of a person or a cow. And sometimes it seemed that something never seen yet long desired was about to happen, that a veil would drop from it all; but then it passed, nothing happened, the riddle remained unsolved, the secret spell unbroken, and in the end one grew old and looked cunning . . . or wise . . . and still one knew nothing perhaps, was still waiting and listening.
The answer: leadership is the single greatest factor in any team’s performance. Whether a team succeeds or fails is all up to the leader. The leader’s attitude sets the tone for the entire team. The leader drives performance—or doesn’t. And this applies not just to the most senior leader of an overall team, but to the junior leaders of teams within the team. (Location 727)
I find that I am redefining my job all the time, taking on new tasks, or constantly creating new challenges for myself. If I reach some goal, either personally or corporately, that goal immediately becomes a step in the learning process towards another more ambitious goal.
“Doesn’t it take a lot of time to polish the script?” to which Evan responded with a smile: “You can always de-fuck the script later.” The important thing was to brainstorm freely and not self-edit. That came afterward. (Location 8643)
Quite the contrary. We need to comfort ourselves and wait for dissolution. And not get impatient in the meantime, but take refuge in these two things:i. Nothing can happen to me that isn't natural.ii. I can keep from doing anything that God and my own spirir don't approve. No one can force me to.
How people relate to in business is based on the conscious and unconscious statements you make about yourself. The way you dress, your phone manner, your efficiency, the way you phrase letter, the way you greet people, all affect the impression you make you on others - their 'reading' of you - making people perceive you in way that you want to be perceived.
“Lateral thinking or thematic thinking, the ability to take a lesson from one thing and transfer it to another, is one of the most important disciplines that any of us can cultivate. (Location 9364)
By not appreciating someone for their vulnerability and truth, all we do is encourage lying.
Doing your job without whining.
The best way to combat this problem is to brainstorm many different ideas ahead of time and keep a running list of possible blog topics so that you always have a pool to choose from. (Location 2478)
I write everything down, and since I put my notes where they will pop up again in the right place at the right time, once I have written something down I forget about it. The end result is that when I break from work, I break from work-related stress as well.
“To make things less confusing, scholars usually distinguish between ‘sex’, which is a biological category, and ‘gender’, a cultural category. Sex is divided between males and females, and the qualities of this division are objective and have remained constant throughout history. Gender is divided between men and women (and some cultures recognise other categories). So-called ‘masculine’ and ‘feminine’ qualities are inter-subjective and undergo constant changes.”
“If you aren’t winning,” I responded, “then you aren’t making the right decisions.” (Location 879)
“In addition, the amygdala quickly adds various flaming objects to its list of dangerous things to avoid, so the child may also fear lighters, sparklers, and campfires. The amygdala retains lasting memories that identify the object and similar objects as dangerous.”
For instance, if you’re meditating and anger comes up, maybe the memory of some personal slight, you might silently repeat “anger, anger” to yourself and acknowledge it, which allows you to quickly return to whatever your focus is. (Location 8997)
No one can keep you from living as your nature requires. Nothing can happen to you that is not required by Nature.
Often business teams claim there isn’t time for such analysis. But one must make time. (Location 2748)
“What is it in me that is holding me back?” They accept complete responsibility for their lives
I have never seen someone consistently stick to positive habits in a negative environment. A more reliable approach is to cut bad habits off at the source. One of the most practical ways to eliminate a bad habit is to reduce exposure to the cue that causes it.
That means that, somehow, we’re externally reliant on conditions being perfect in order to be able to go out and have a good time. So, Jack and I never missed a single storm, rain or snow, to go outside and romp in it. Maybe we missed one when he was sick. We’ve developed this language around how beautiful it is. (Location 9383)
Habits are attractive when we associate them with positive feelings and unattractive when we associate them with negative feelings. Create a motivation ritual by doing something you enjoy immediately before a difficult habit.
The habit stacking formula is: After [CURRENT HABIT], I will [NEW HABIT].
Want to improve your diet? Chop up a ton of fruits and vegetables on weekends and pack them in containers, so you have easy access to healthy,
It is well known that humor, more than anything else in the human make-up, can afford an aloofness and an ability to rise above any situation, even if only for a few seconds. I
The process of behavior change always starts with awareness. You need to be aware of your habits before you can change them.
As a leader, it doesn’t matter how well you feel you have presented the information or communicated an order, plan, tactic, or strategy. If your team doesn’t get it, you have not kept things simple and you have failed. You must brief to ensure the lowest common denominator on the team understands. (Location 1897)
“The whole principle came from the idea that if you broke down everything you could think of that goes into riding a bike, and then improve it by 1 percent, you will get a significant increase when you put them all together.”
Childhood is full of mystery and promise, and perhaps the life fear comes when all the mysteries are laid open, when what we thought we wanted is attained. It is just at the moment of seeming fulfilment that we sense irrevocable betrayal, like a great wave rising silently behind us,
“the cortex can’t produce an anxiety response; the amygdala and other parts of the brain are needed to accomplish that”
Run away from those who never run towards themselves.
“As far as we can tell, from a purely scientific viewpoint, human life has absolutely no meaning. Humans are the outcome of blind evolutionary processes that operate without goal or purpose. Our actions are not part of some divine cosmic plan, and if planet Earth were to blow up tomorrow morning, the universe would probably keep going about its business as usual. As far as we can tell at this point, human subjectivity would not be missed. Hence any meaning that people ascribe to their lives is just a delusion”
In the real world you will either understand and adapt to find success or you will fail.
“You’ve learned that one of the main functions of the amygdala is to protect you, and that the amygdala creates memories that you may not be aware of but experience instead as emotional reactions”
A colleague of Ray Cave, Patricia Ryan, the managing editor of People magazine, once told me that if she is having a business lunch in which she anticipates being intimidated or not being taken seriously enough she will order a Scotch and water. She rarely drinks, but just ordering a Scotch instead of a Perrier creates a subtle, almost imperceptibly different I-mean-business impression.
Don’t be afraid to send out follow-up emails every so often to keep letting people know about your services. Over time this diligence will pay off. (Location 1646)
“If Darwin had never been born, for example, we’d today attribute the theory of evolution to Alfred Russel Wallace, who came up with the idea of evolution via natural selection independently of Darwin and just a few years later. But if the European powers had not financed geographical, zoological and botanical research around the world, neither Darwin nor Wallace would have had the necessary empirical data to develop the theory of evolution. It is likely that they would not even have tried.”
Just as we are more likely to repeat an experience when the ending is satisfying, we are also more likely to avoid an experience when the ending is painful. Pain is an effective teacher. If a failure is painful, it gets fixed. If a failure is relatively painless, it gets ignored. The more immediate and more costly a mistake is, the faster you will learn from it.
The only difference between medita- tion and ordinary social interaction is that the friend you're gradually coming to know is yourself.
Your identity emerges out of your habits. You are not born with preset beliefs. Every belief, including those about yourself, is learned and conditioned through experience.
‘People-pleasing is a form of assholery,’ which I just loved, because you’re not pleasing anybody. You’re just making them resentful because you’re being disingenuous, and you’re also not giving them the dignity of their own experience and [assuming] they can’t handle the truth. It’s patronizing.” (Location 7850)
If you're bored it's your fault. You just aren't working hard enough at making your job interesting. It is also probably the reason you haven't been offered anything better.
We must be open to other perspectives if we truly want to understand the results of our actions. Despite feeling that we’ve got all the information, if we’re on the ship, the fish in the ocean has more he can share.
I remembered where I sat, where my companion sat, what she ate, what she wore, what I ate, and what the waitress did right and wrong that night. All of that just came rushing back from one smell.” (Location 9112)
“The king of England might enrich himself, but only by robbing the king of France. You could cut the pie in many different ways, but it never got any bigger. Earlier. ”
And if I've failed, it's no one's fault but mine. Because I didn't attention to what they told me-to what they taught me, pay practically, step by step.
“When nothing seems to help, I go and look at a stonecutter hammering away at his rock, perhaps a hundred times without as much as a crack showing in it. Yet at the hundred and first blow it will split in two, and I know it was not that last blow that did it—but all that had gone before.”
The more widely I traveled, the clearer it became to me that people living in societies characterized by technological and material achieve- ments were just as likely to feel pain, anxiety, loneliness, isolation, and despair as people who lived in comparatively less-developed areas
To shrug it all off and wipe it clean-every annoyance and distraction-and reach utter stillness.
Being aware of second-order consequences and using them to guide your decision-making may mean the short term is less spectacular, but the payoffs for the long term can be enormous. By delaying gratification now, you will save time in the future. You won’t have to clean up the mess you made on account of not thinking through the effects of your short-term desires
can do without friends, not that he desires to do without them. When I say “can,” I mean this: he endures the loss of a friend with equanimity.
And the answer—like it is for astronauts, for soldiers, for doctors, and for so many other professionals—must be: No, because I practiced for this situation and I can control myself. Or, No, because I caught myself and I’m able to realize that that doesn’t add anything constructive.
a.m.—and there, alone in the early morning, I would quickly read over engineering magazines and chip manuals.
“The tragedy of industrial agriculture is that it takes great care of the objective needs of animals, while neglecting their subjective needs.”
My platoon commanders didn’t just tell me what the situation was, but what they were going to do to fix it. That sort of Extreme Ownership and leadership from my subordinate leaders not only allowed them to lead confidently, but also allowed me to focus on the bigger picture—in (Location 2455)
The 1st Law of Behavior Change is make it obvious.
Whenever he takes a shower, he wipes down the toilet while the shower is warming up. (As he notes, the “perfect time to clean the toilet is right before you wash yourself in the shower anyway.”) The purpose of resetting each room is not simply to clean up after the last action, but to prepare for the next action.
Carpenters who become contractors at one time had a need to drive a nail straighter and truer than else.
Kevin described a rare heart-to-heart conversation with his dad, who was critical of Kevin becoming an actor. By this point, Kevin was an adult and had succeeded. His dad was sitting in the bathtub: “He looked at me and he says, ‘You know, I never took a chance in my life.’ I was almost in my own Field of Dreams moment. There were some tears coming down. He says, ‘I came out of that goddamn fucking Dust Bowl, and when I got a job, Kevin, I didn’t want to lose it. I was going to hold on to that, because I knew there would always be food on the table.’ And I said, ‘There was. There was.’ (Location 7446)
Waiters who end up owning restaurants were at one learn will learn anyone time very good waiters.
“Did I spend today chasing mice or hunting antelope?” (Location 9682)
And to have learned how to accept favors from friends without losing your self-respect or appearing ungrateful.
But as our company grows—as we enter new markets—we need a standardized process for planning, a repeatable checklist others with less experience can follow.” (Location 2780)
“As a leader, if you are down in the weeds planning the details with your guys,” said Jocko, “you will have the same perspective as them, which adds little value. But if you let them plan the details, it allows them to own their piece of the plan. And it allows you to stand back and see everything with a different perspective, which adds tremendous value. You can then see the plan from a greater distance, a higher altitude, and you will see more. As a result, you will catch mistakes and discover aspects of the plan that need to be tightened up, which enables you to look like a tactical genius, just because you have a broader view.” (Location 2869)
my subordinates also knew that if they wanted to complain about the hard work and relentless push to accomplish the mission I expected of them, they best take those thoughts elsewhere. (Location 3633)
The purpose of meditation practice is not enlightenment; it is to pay attention even at unextraordinary times, to be of the present, nothing-but-the-present, to bear this mindfulness of now into each event of ordinary life. To be anywhere else is “to paint eyeballs on chaos”.20 When I watch blue sheep, I must watch blue sheep, not be thinking about sex, danger, or the present, for this present—even while I think of it—is gone.
“Of course, whenever we try to change our thoughts, we’re trying to modify the cortex in some way. Our thoughts are not simply a result of neurological and chemical processes in the brain; they are the neurological and chemical processes in the brain. In cognitive restructuring, the thoughts you think are used to rewire your brain.”
The upside of habits is that we can do things without thinking. The downside of habits is that you get used to doing things a certain way and stop paying attention to little errors.
resume my role as ground force commander, dispense (Location 135)
While the senior leader supervises the entire planning process by team members, he or she must be careful not to get bogged down in the details. By maintaining a perspective above the microterrain of the plan, the senior leader can better ensure compliance with strategic objectives. Doing so enables senior leaders to “stand back and be the tactical genius”—to identify weaknesses (Location 2728)
My rules might be simplistic, but they’ve provided a good ROI and the ability to sleep. Every time I’ve tried to get “sophisticated,” the universe has kicked me in the nuts. (Location 6379)
“national communities have been increasingly eclipsed by tribes of customers who do not know one another intimately but share the same consumption habits and interests, and therefore feel part of the same consumer tribe – and define themselves as such. This sounds very strange, but we are surrounded by examples. Madonna fans, for example, constitute a consumer tribe. They define themselves largely by shopping. They buy Madonna concert tickets, CDs, posters, shirts and ring tones, and thereby define who they are. Manchester United fans, vegetarians and environmentalists are other examples. They, too, are defined above all by what they consume. It is the keystone of their identity. A German vegetarian might well prefer to marry a French vegetarian than a German carnivore.”
Those unable to afford the new miracle treatments – the vast majority of people – will be beside themselves with rage. Throughout history, the poor and oppressed comforted themselves with the thought that at least death is even-handed – that the rich and powerful will also die. The poor will not be comfortable with the thought that they have to die, while the rich will remain young and beautiful for ever.”
If you don’t have the patience to read something, don’t have the hubris to comment on it.” (Location 6786)
Whenever possible, I leave my phone in a different room until lunch. When it’s right next to me, I’ll check it all morning for no reason at all. But when it is in another room, I rarely think about it. And the friction is high enough that I won’t go get it without a reason. As a result, I get three to four hours each morning when I can work without interruption.
Life's challenges aren't there to stifle you. In fact, they serve you and help you discover who you are. Challenges actually oblige you, for, when conquered, they help you chase greater challenges and in turn provide you greater growth.
When we've achieved some condition that makes us feel whole and complete, we want everything to stay exactly as it is. The deeper our attachment to what- ever provides us with this sense of completeness, the greater our fear
Ever since the Cognitive Revolution, Sapiens has thus been living in a dual reality. On the one hand, the objective reality of rivers, trees and lions; and on the other hand, the imagined reality of gods, nations and corporations. As time went by, the imagined reality became ever more powerful, so that today the very survival of rivers, trees and lions depends on the grace of imagined entities such as gods, nations and corporations.”
the experience of natural mind.
this book Heraclitean Fire by Erwin Chargaff, who effectively shorted Watson and Crick. He told Watson and Crick that he didn’t think that they were very good or very smart, and that they didn’t know their chemistry. (Location 8548)
Specialization is a powerful way to overcome the “accident” of
“If you are more intelligent than your master, for example, seem the opposite: Make him appear more intelligent than you. Act naive. Make it seem that you need his expertise. Commit harmless mistakes that will not hurt you in the long run but will give you die chance to ask for his help. Masters adore such requests. A”
“As you’ve seen in this chapter, when it comes to reducing anxiety, exercise and sleep can benefit both the cortex and the amygdala”
“When Kurt Vonnegut wrote ‘Write to please just one person,’ what he was really saying was write for yourself. (Location 6801)
PointingandCalling raises your level of awareness from a nonconscious habit to a more conscious level by verbalizing your actions.
But the reminder here is that no matter what happens, no matter how disappointing our behavior has been in the past, the principles themselves remain unchanged. We can return and embrace them at any moment. What happened yesterday—what happened five minutes ago—is the past. We can reignite and restart whenever we like. (Location 348)
Anytime something really cool happens in a day, something that made me excited or joyful, doctor’s orders are to write it down on a slip of paper and put it in this mason jar. (Location 9210)
A lion is fully capable of capturing, killing, and eating a field mouse. But it turns out that the energy required to do so exceeds the caloric content of the mouse itself. So a lion that spent its day hunting and eating field mice would slowly starve to death. A lion can’t live on field mice. A lion needs antelope. Antelope are big animals. They take more speed and strength to capture and kill, and once killed, they provide a feast for the lion and her pride. A lion can live a long and happy life on a diet of antelope. The distinction is important. Are (Location 9676)
The truth, however, is that many of the actions we take each day are shaped not by purposeful drive and choice but by the most obvious option.
“Today, even a thirty-year-old can honestly tell disbelieving teenagers, ‘When I was young, the world was completely different.’ The Internet, for example, came into wide usage only in the early 1990s, hardly twenty years ago. Today we cannot imagine the world without it.”
Sleep with Me: Mike falls asleep to this podcast. (Location 9176)
cannot boast that I waste nothing, but I can at least tell you what I am wasting, and the cause and manner of the loss;
not so long ago I could say truthfully that I had not shed a tear in twenty years.
“An analogy I use is, if you’re going out for dinner, it’s going to take you a couple of hours. You spend 5 minutes working out where to go for dinner. It seems reasonable to spend 5% of your time on how to spend the remaining 95%. If you did that with your career, that would be 4,000 hours, or 2 working years. And actually, I think that’s a pretty legitimate thing to do—spending that length of time trying to work out how should you be spending the rest of your life.” (Location 7379)
The 1st law (Cue): Make it obvious. The 2nd law (Craving): Make it attractive. The 3rd law (Response): Make it easy. The 4th law (Reward): Make it satisfying.
Situations will sometimes require that the boss walk away from a problem and let junior leaders solve it, even if the boss knows he might solve it more efficiently. It is more important that the junior leaders are allowed to make decisions—and backed up even if they don’t make them correctly. (Location 2576)
There is no scientific answer to this question. There are only political, economic and religious answers. In today’s world, it is obvious that Slughorn has a better chance of getting the money. Not because udder diseases are scientifically more interesting than bovine mentality, but because the dairy industry, which stands to benefit from the research, has more political and economic clout than the animal-rights lobby.”
I learned to read carefully and not be satisfied with a rough understanding of the whole, and not to agree too quickly with those who have a lot to say about something.” (Location 388)
“Have you ever dipped your toes into a pool or lake and winced at the cool temperature of the water? As you wade further in, you’re aware of the coolness of the water as it gradually reaches your stomach and chest. After a period of time, however, your body adjusts, and you find yourself comfortable in the water. You smile at others who are in just up to their knees and complaining that it’s cold.”
A true experience of prajna corresponds to “enlightenment” or liberation—not change, but transformation—a profound vision of his identity with universal life, past, present, and future, that keeps man from doing harm to others and sets him free from fear of birth-and-death.
“Hierarchies serve an important function. They enable complete strangers to know how to treat one another without wasting the time and energy needed to become personally acquainted” “A modern Eliza working at a florist’s needs to know how much effort to put into selling roses and gladioli to the dozens of people who enter the shop each day. She can’t make a detailed enquiry into the tastes and wallets of each individual. Instead, she uses social cues – the way the person is dressed, his or her age, and if she’s not politically correct his skin colour. That is how she immediately distinguishes between the accounting-firm partner who’s likely to place a large order for expensive roses, and a messenger boy who can only afford a bunch of daisies.” Excerpt From Sapiens: A Brief History of Humankind Yuval Noah Harari This material may be protected by copyright.
Surround yourself with people who have the habits you want to have yourself. You’ll rise together.
All you need to do is to advance; you will thus understand that some things are less to be dreaded, precisely because they inspire us with great fear.
Heroes never panic. They’re always the people who can have a nuclear bomb dropped on their city or crash in an airplane and manage to organize a group, help the survivors, outsmart the enemy, or at least just not break down in tears.
The most effective form of motivation is progress. When we get a signal that we are moving forward, we become more motivated to continue down that path. In this way, habit tracking can have an addictive effect on motivation. Each small win feeds your desire.
We are drawn to behaviors that earn us respect, approval, admiration, and status. We want to be the one in the gym who can do muscleups or the musician who can play the hardest chord progressions or the parent with the most accomplished children because these things separate us from the crowd. Once we fit in, we start looking for ways to stand out. This is one reason
Refuse to complain about your problems. Keep them to yourself. As speaker-humorist Ed Foreman says, “You should never share your problems with others because 80 percent of people don’t care about them anyway, and the other 20 percent are kind of glad that you’ve got
Ultimately, this is clarity. Whoever we are, wherever we are—what matters is our choices. (Location 339)
whenever possible, measurement should be automated. You’ll probably be surprised by how much you’re already tracking without knowing it. Your
Am I so inspired by what I learned during the day that I want to be talking about it at 1:00 in the morning? And do I have someone who will have that conversation with me and who will challenge me? That’s it. Everything else is nonsense.” (Location 9259)
Our habits are not solely determined by our personalities, but there is no doubt that our genes nudge us in a certain direction. Our deeply rooted preferences make certain
If you look through the ashes long enough, you’ll find something. (Location 10168)
Show me that, if you identify it, you’re working on it. I don’t care what you think about it. I just want to know that you’re aware of how other people view you.” (Location 7207)
Increase friction. Increase the number of steps between you and your bad habits.
“and organic growth. Most societies were unable to make precise time measurements, nor were they terribly interested in doing so. The world went about its business without clocks and timetables, subject only to the movements of the sun and the growth cycles of plants. There was no uniform working day, and all routines changed drastically from season to season. People knew where the sun was, and watched anxiously for portents of the rainy season and harvest time, but they did not know the hour and hardly cared about the year”
How much more time, energy, and pure brainpower would you have available if you drastically cut your media consumption? How much more rested and present would you feel if you were no longer excited and outraged by every scandal, breaking story, and potential crisis (many of which never come to pass anyway)? (Location 466)
My choices are my self-effort (Xaxis). The consequences are my destiny (Y-axis). My future is neither completely controlled by consequences nor is it independent of my choices, but it is a resultant diagonal in the XY graph. Life is not Self-Effort Vs Destiny, but it is Self-Effort plus Destiny.
This brief laid out the specific details of who, what, when, where, why, and how a combat operation would be conducted. (Location 2803)
Ego clouds and disrupts everything: the planning process, the ability to take good advice, and the ability to accept constructive criticism. It can even stifle someone’s sense of self-preservation. Often, the most difficult ego to deal with is your own. (Location 1407)
lack of resources is often one of the critical ingredients for greatness. Jack Ma, founder of China’s Alibaba Group, is worth an estimated $20 to $30 billion, and he explains the secret of his success this way: “There were three reasons why we survived: We had no money, we had no technology, and we had no plan. Every dollar, we used very carefully.” (Location 10130)
I would try this with other babies—these flying tours—and I found out that after about twenty minutes, I could do it with them, too. All babies were the same! All babies gave the same muscle signals. I loved that I had figured out a way to let Jesse choose what to explore, before he could even crawl or walk, without having to be totally dependent on someone else.
“Life is like being at the dentist. You always think that the worst is still to come, and yet it is over already.” Varying
Start with the end in mind and work backward.
A good candidate for a startup would be a new technology or way of doing something that can be patented or protected in some way. A bad candidate for a startup might be a restaurant or other service that isn’t unique in a way that can’t be copied. A good startup also has the potential to scale very big. Think Twitter, Dropbox, Facebook, and so on. (Location 1860)
“Deep breathing: One of the best things to do when you’re having a panic attack is to breathe slowly. Some of the symptoms of panic attacks, such as tingling or dizziness, are directly related to hyperventilation, or breathing too quickly. Taking slow, full, deep breaths that extend your chest and diaphragm outward is a good start. (The diaphragm is a muscle that extends across the torso beneath the lungs.) Slow breathing has been shown to decrease activation in the amygdala.”
“All this depends, however, on the rich using their profits to open new factories and hire new employees, rather than wasting them on non-productive activities. Smith therefore repeated like a mantra the maxim that ‘When profits increase, the landlord or weaver will employ more assistants’ and not ‘When profits increase, Scrooge will hoard his money in a chest and take it out only to count his coins.’ A crucial part of the modern capitalist economy was the emergence of a new ethic, according to which profits ought to be reinvested in production. This brings about more profits, which are again reinvested in production, which brings more profits, et cetera ad infinitum. Investments can be made in many ways: enlarging the factory, conducting scientific research, developing new products. Yet all these investments must somehow increase production and translate into larger profits. In the new capitalist creed, the first and most sacred commandment is: ‘The profits of production must be reinvested in increasing production.”
At the end of each day he would ask himself variations of the following questions: What bad habit did I curb today? How am I better? Were my actions just? How can I improve? (Location 368)
Researchers estimate that 40 to 50 percent of our actions on any given day are done out of habit.
While we are postponing, life speeds by. Nothing, Lucilius, is ours, except time.
The image of the Zen philosopher is the monk up in the green, quiet hills, or in a beautiful temple on some rocky cliff. The Stoics are the antithesis of this idea. Instead, they are the man in the marketplace, the senator in the Forum, the brave wife waiting for her soldier to return from battle, the sculptor busy in her studio. Still, the Stoic is equally at peace. (Location 248)
“Shame is ‘I am a bad person.’ Guilt is ‘I did something bad.’ . . . Shame is (Location 9462)
The Buddha often compared natural mind to water, which in its essence is always clear and clean. Mud, sediment, and other impuri- ties may temporarily darken or pollute the water, but we can filter away such impurities and restore its natural clarity
endurance, not only physically but mentally. He or she must maintain the ability to perform at the highest level and sustain that level for the long term. (Location 3648)
Too many people spend too much time fighting against the system.
Most of your emotions, positive or negative, are determined by how you talk to yourself on a minute-to-minute basis.
He will have many masters who makes his body his master, who is over-fearful in its behalf, who judges everything according to the body.
I was scared, but I showed up. And you know what? That decision changed everything. That night turned out to be one of the most important nights of my life.
“The hero and the coward both feel the same thing, but the hero uses his fear, projects it onto his opponent, while the coward runs. It’s the same thing—fear—but it’s what you do with it that matters.” (Location 9435)
There’s a world of cool opportunities out there for you, but let’s build within you a sense of not just work ethic, but also, a little kick in the ass about why you don’t wanna end up in one of those real jobs. . . .” (Location 2951)
He knew it was the right move and was now confident in the decision. (Location 3731)
The human brain is a prediction machine. It is continuously taking in your surroundings and analyzing the information it comes across. Whenever you experience something repeatedly—like a paramedic seeing the face of a heart attack patient or a military analyst seeing a missile on a radar screen—your brain begins noticing what is important, sorting through the details and highlighting the relevant cues, and cataloging that information for future use.
By developing a consistent powerdown habit, you make it easier to get to bed at a reasonable time each night. You may not be able to automate the whole process, but you can make the first action mindless. Make it easy to start and the rest will
“Since around 200 BC, most humans have lived in empires. It seems likely that in the future, too, most humans will live in one. But this time the empire will be truly global. The imperial vision of dominion over the entire world could be imminent”
“One difference between home cooks and pros is acidity level. When you think it’s ready, add another lemon. Pros bump up the acidity level. It’s one of the secrets. We add a little (Location 9045)
If you don't have something to say, don't set up a meeting just to make a contact. A contact who is really worth having will respond your 'I just wanted to meet you' by making sure you never meet to again.
“The key is to do it early. Do it while you’re still shooting. First impression is everything. (Location 10195)
“What might you do to accomplish your 10-year goals in the next 6 months, if you had a gun against your head?” (Location 333)
You're better off not giving the small things more time than they deserve.
think about all the upsetting things you don’t know about—stuff people might have said about you behind your back, mistakes you might have made that never came to your attention, things you dropped or lost without even realizing it. What’s your reaction? You don’t have one because you don’t know about it. (Location 566)
Do this the first few times deal with any new business associates and they will assume you conduct all business affairs that way. Moreover, they'll play along. You will find you will get the same on-time responses from them that they have come to anticipate from you.
In Vietnam, soldiers spent all day surrounded by cues triggering heroin use: it was easy to access, they were engulfed by the constant stress of war, they built friendships with fellow soldiers who were also heroin users, and they were thousands of miles from home. Once a soldier returned to the United States, though, he found himself in an environment devoid of those triggers. When the context changed, so did the habit.
it is crucial to make your habits so easy that you’ll do them even when you don’t feel like it. If you can make your good habits more convenient, you’ll be more likely to follow through on them.
The leader must explain not just what to do, but why. It is the responsibility of the subordinate leader to reach out and ask if they do not understand. Only when leaders at all levels understand and believe in the mission can they pass that understanding and belief to their teams so that they can persevere through challenges, execute and win. (Location 1111)
“When we feel pain in one time zone—meaning past, present, or future—we just switch to another time zone rather than change, because change brings so much uncertainty and so much instability and so much fear to people.” (Location 7399)
Leaders should never be satisfied. They must always strive to improve, and they must build that mind-set into the team. (Location 814)
But acting in a way that sacrifices corporate interest for self-interest limits your effectiveness and will be noted
It’s not because these men are cheap. It’s because the things that matter to them are cheap. (Location 409)
“Myths and fictions accustomed people, nearly from the moment of birth, to think in certain ways, to behave in accordance with certain standards, to want certain things, and to observe certain rules. They thereby created artificial instincts that enabled millions of strangers to cooperate effectively. This network of artificial instincts is called culture”
The picture is never complete. Leaders must be comfortable with this and be able to make decisions promptly, then be ready to adjust those decisions quickly based on evolving situations and new information. (Location 3376)
There are many ways to create a commitment device. You can reduce overeating by purchasing food in individual packages rather than in bulk size.
“Exercise: We encourage you to pace or exercise during a panic attack. This will burn off the excess adrenaline that’s in your system and should help shorten the panic attack. Remember, your body is prepared to fight or flee, so physical exertion is exactly what your body is ready to do.”
Part of the process is ensuring founders know who you are. If a single shirt can create seemingly unending media mentions and doesn’t hurt your reputation, it’s low-hanging fruit. (Location 2926)
By developing a consistent powerdown habit, you make it easier to get to bed at a reasonable time each night. You may not be able to automate the whole process, but you can make the first action mindless. Make it easy to start and the rest will follow.
“In the language of the amygdala, the pairing of a trigger with a negative event is very powerful. Thinking processes from the cortex, like logic and reasoning, are of little use when dealing with fear and anxiety in the amygdala.”
real man doesn’t give way to anger and discontent, and such a person has strength, courage, and endurance—unlike (Location 483)
“Most people wrongly identify themselves with their feelings, thoughts, likes and dislikes. When they feel anger, they think, ‘I am angry. This is my anger.’ They consequently spend their life avoiding some kinds of feelings and pursuing others. They never realise that they are not their feelings, and that the relentless pursuit of particular feelings just traps them in misery.”
“Every culture has its typical beliefs, norms and values, but these are in constant flux. The culture may transform itself in response to changes in its environment or through interaction with neighbouring cultures. But cultures also undergo transitions due to their own internal dynamics”
A leader must be aggressive but not overbearing. SEALs are known for their eagerness to take on tough challenges and accomplish some of the most difficult missions. Some may even accuse me of hyperaggression. But I did my utmost to ensure that everyone below me in the chain of command felt comfortable approaching me with concerns, ideas, thoughts, and even disagreements. (Location 3627)
While businesses can have their own planning process, it must be standardized so that other departments within the company and supporting assets outside the company (such as service contractors or subsidiary companies) can understand and use the same format and terminology. (Location 2755)
“The most important element of exposure therapy is practice, practice, practice. The only way the amygdala learns is through experience. At times it’s going to be upsetting, even daunting. But if you really want to overcome your anxiety, you need to do this difficult work. Remember, it’s a “no pain, no gain” proposition.”
“If you were focusing on specific thoughts or images, that suggests your anxiety began in the cortex. If, on the other hand, you feel that a specific object, location, or situation immediately elicited an anxiety response, the amygdala is more likely to be the starting point.”
Hard work. Persistence.
for if we could be satisfied with anything, we should have been satisfied long ago; nor do we reflect how pleasant it is to demand nothing,
“There are things which must cause you to lose your reason or you have none to lose.” An
We had to learn ourselves and, furthermore, we had to teach the despairing men, that it did not really matter what we expected from life, but rather what life expected from us.
“Chemists discovered aluminium only in the 1820s, but separating the metal from its ore was extremely difficult and costly. For decades, aluminium was much more expensive than gold. In the 1860S, Emperor Napoleon III of France commissioned aluminium cutlery to be laid out for his most distinguished guests. Less important visitors had to make do with the gold knives and forks.5 But at the end of the nineteenth century chemists discovered a way to extract immense amounts of cheap aluminium, and current global production stands at 30 million tons per year. Napoleon III would be surprised to hear that his subjects’ descendants use cheap disposable aluminium foil to wrap their sandwiches and put away their leftovers.”
As a general rule, the more immediate pleasure you get from an action, the more strongly you should question whether it aligns with your longterm goals.
“Today in the United States, only 2 per cent of the population makes a living from agriculture, yet this 2 per cent produces enough not only to feed the entire US population, but also to export surpluses to the rest of the world.9 Without the industrialisation of agriculture the urban Industrial Revolution could never have taken place – there would not have been enough hands and brains to staff factories and offices.”
What made Chris Kyle such a great sniper was not that he was the most exceptional marksman. His secret was that he practiced Extreme Ownership of his craft. Intimately involved in planning and scouting potential sniper overwatch positions, he put himself in the right place at the right time to maximize his effectiveness. (Location 3249)
My death wouldn’t just be about me. It would completely destroy the lives of those I cared about most. I imagine my mom, who had no part in creating my thesis mess, suffering until her dying day, blaming herself. (Location 9988)
“Although people may believe thinking processes like worry or rumination will lead to a solution, what actually happens is a strengthening of the circuitry in the cortex that produces anxiety. In addition, rumination has been shown to lead to depression”
Just like Malcolm Gladwell’s dad (see page 573) and Alex Blumberg (page 303), Chris is incredibly smart about asking the “dumb” questions hiding in plain sight. (Location 2937)
“The natural lifespan of wild chickens is about seven to twelve years, and of cattle about twenty to twenty-five years. In the wild, most chickens and cattle died long before that, but they still had a fair chance of living for a respectable number of years. In contrast, the vast majority of domesticated chickens and cattle are slaughtered at the age of between a few weeks and a few months, because this has always been the optimal slaughtering age from an economic perspective. (Why keep feeding a cock for three years if it has already reached its maximum weight after three months?)”
“Leadership doesn’t just flow down the chain of command, but up as well,” he said. “We have to own everything in our world. That’s what Extreme Ownership is all about.” (Location 3133)
But in all circumstances—adversity or advantage—we really have just one thing we need to do: focus on what is in our control as opposed to what is not. (Location 336)
You can always remind yourself: I am in control, not my emotions. I see what’s really going on here. I’m not going to get excited or upset.
“History cannot be explained deterministically and it cannot be predicted because it is chaotic”
I am myself, the child I was, the old man I will be.
There is this notepad by my side, and I take notes, but I take notes only to take them out from my head. They will be useless the next day. (Location 8348)
As Charlie Munger says, “The first rule of compounding: Never interrupt it unnecessarily.” This is why the “bad” workouts are often the most important ones. Sluggish days and bad workouts maintain the compound gains you accrued from previous good days. Simply doing something—ten squats, five sprints, a pushup, anything really—is huge. Don’t put up a zero. Don’t let losses eat into your compounding.
Not to be constantly correcting people, and in particular not to jump on them whenever they make an error of usage or a grammatical mistake or mispronounce something, but just answer their question or add another example, or debate the issue itself (not their phrasing), or make some other contribution to the discussion-and insert the right expression, unobtrusively.
Ona purely emotional level, aversion tends to manifest as anger and even hatred. Instead of recognizing that whatever unhappiness you feel is based on a mentally constructed image, you find it only "natu- ral" to blame other people, external objects, or situations for your pain. When people behave in a way that appears to prevent you from obtaining what you desire, you begin to think of them as untrustworthy or mean, and you'll go out of your way either to avoid them or strike back at them. In the grip of anger, you see everyone and everything as ene- mies. As a result, your inner and outer worlds become smaller and smaller. You lose faith in yourself, and reinforce specific neuronal pat- terns that generate feelings of fear and vulnerability.
“You could end up with that if you, as a leader, failed to give clear guidance and set distinct boundaries,” I explained. “With clear guidance and established boundaries for decision making that your subordinate leaders understand, they can then act independently toward your unified goal.” (Location 2560)
Make sure that you have an education plan that you can follow to expand your skills and learn new things that will help you do a better job. Don’t ever be happy with good enough—always strive to become a better version of yourself. (Location 1484)
The vital thing in getting a habit to stick is to feel successful—even if it’s in a small way. The feeling of success is a signal that your habit paid off and that the work was worth the effort.
Give vulnerability a shot. Give discomfort its due. Because I think he or she who is willing to be the most uncomfortable is not only the bravest, but rises the fastest.” (Location 9441)
As a general rule, the closer we are to someone, the more likely we are to imitate some of their habits.
If your boss isn’t making a decision in a timely manner or providing necessary support for you and your team, don’t blame the boss. First, blame yourself. Examine what you can do to better convey the critical information for decisions to be made and support allocated. (Location 3155)
Being a professional is all about showing up, doing your work, and not letting adversity defeat you. (Location 1401)
The two most common cues are time and location.
In my head, the guy who’d rather laugh than control things is going to be the one who has the happier life. That’s just my opinion. I figure happiness is the most important thing in life, just how much you laugh. The guy whose head kind of floats, he’s so happy. That’s who I am, who I want to be and have always wanted to be. And that’s why I never let stuff like
could afford to be happy and not just “successful.” (Location 9585)
It isn't the world, but the quality of your response to the world (acceptance or non-acceptance) that determines the quality of your emotions.
Make sure the best choice is the most obvious one. Making a better decision is easy and natural when the cues for good habits are right in front of you.
Instead of blaming others, instead of complaining about the boss’s questions, I had to take ownership of the problem and lead. This included the leaders above me in our chain of command. (Location 3136)
“Civilization advances by extending the number of operations we can perform without thinking about them.”
You might be thinking about ‘How can I do my coursework as well as possible?’ and micro optimization, but not really thinking about ‘What are actually my ultimate goals in life, and how can I optimize toward them?’ (Location 7377)
Identify your most important goal in life today. What is it? What one goal, if you achieved it, would have the greatest positive effect on your life? What one career accomplishment would have the greatest positive impact on your work life?
Only this: proper understanding; unselfish action; truthful speech. A resolve to accept whatever happens as necessary and familiar, flowing like water from that same source and spring.
“Yet from the viewpoint of the herd, rather than that of the shepherd, it’s hard to avoid the impression that for the vast majority of domesticated animals, the Agricultural Revolution was a terrible catastrophe. Their evolutionary ‘success’ is meaningless. A rare wild rhinoceros on the brink of extinction is probably more satisfied than a calf who spends its short life inside a tiny box, fattened to produce juicy steaks. The contented rhinoceros is no less content for being among the last of its kind. The numerical success of the calf’s species is little consolation for the suffering the individual endures.
Not to feel exasperated, or defeated, or despondent because your days aren't packed with wise and moral actions. But to get back up when you fail, to celebrate behaving like a humanhowever imperfectly-and fully embrace the pursuit that you’ve embarked on.
You know, my dad had always told me that your job is the most important thing you’ll ever have and the worst thing to lose. I still think that way. My thinking is that a company is like a family, a community, where we all take care of each other. I never agreed with the normal thinking, where a company is more competition driven, and the poorest, youngest or most recently hired workers are always the first to go.
“That means you will have to check your ego in order to have a constructive discussion with him and get this under control,” I responded. (Location 1447)
In the last one hundred years, we have seen the rise of the car, the airplane, the television, the personal computer, the internet, the smartphone, and Beyoncé. The world has changed much in recent years, but human nature has changed little.
“it’s the ability to transmit information about things that do not exist at all. As far as we know, only Sapiens can talk about entire kinds of entities that they have never seen, touched or smelled.
From what I've learned, most conflicts between people stem from a misunderstanding of one another's motives. We all have our reasons for doing what we do and saying what we say. The more we allow our- selves to be guided by compassion-to pause for a moment and try to see where another person is coming from-the less likely we are to en- gage in conflict. And even when problems do arise, if we take a deep breath arid listen with an open heart, we'll find ourselves able to han- dle the conflict more effectively-to calm the waters, so to speak, and resolve our·differences in such a manner that everyone is satisfied, and no one ends up as the "winner" or the "loser."
All the real benefits in life come from compound interest. (Location 8915)
“Biologists classify organisms into species. Animals are said to belong to the same species if they tend to mate with each other, giving birth to fertile offspring. Horses and donkeys have a recent common ancestor and share many physical traits. But they show little sexual interest in one another. They will mate if induced to do so – but their offspring, called mules, are sterile. Mutations in donkey DNA can therefore never cross over to horses, or vice versa. The two types of animals are consequently considered two distinct species, moving along separate evolutionary paths. By contrast, a bulldog and a spaniel may look very different, but they are members of the same species, sharing the same DNA pool. They will happily mate and their puppies will grow up to pair off with other dogs and produce more puppies”
“Was the late Neil Armstrong, whose footprint remains intact on the windless moon, happier than the nameless hunter-gatherer who 30,000 years ago left her handprint on a wall in Chauvet Cave? If not, what was the point of developing agriculture, cities, writing, coinage, empires, science and industry?”
“What you should have in your mind is a picture of controlled chaos. (Location 7466)
what we think of as our identity-"my mind," "my body," "my self'-is actually an illusion generated by the unceasing flow of thoughts, emotions, sensations, and perceptions.
“However, two centuries of slavery meant that most black families were far poorer and far less educated than most white families. A black person born in Alabama in 1865 thus had much less chance of getting a good education and a well-paid job than did his white neighbours. His children, born in the 1880S and 1890s, started life with the same disadvantage – they, too, were born to an uneducated, poor family”
“The Commodore would say: ‘Jocko, what do you need?’ and I would say, ‘We’re good, sir.’ The implication is obvious: If I have problems, I’m going to handle them. I’m going to take care of them, and I’m not going to complain. I took extreme ownership of my world. The way that worked was twofold. When I did need something, it was something significant, it was something real. And when I told the Commodore, ‘Hey, boss, we need this right here,’ I would get it almost instantaneously (Location 6877)
The mind, in many ways, is like the ocean. The "color" changes from day to day or moment to moment, reflecting the thoughts, emo- tions, and so on passing "overhead," so to speak. But the mind itself, like the ocean, never changes: It's always clean and clear, no matter
Nothing that goes on in anyone else's mind can harm you. Nor can the shifts and changes in the world around you.
“The kinds of things that people create through this network of stories are known in academic circles as ‘fictions’, ‘social constructs’, or ‘imagined realities’.”
When you wake up in the morning, tell yourself: The people I deal with today will be meddling, ungrateful, arrogant, dishonest, jealous, and surly. They are like this because they can't tell good from evil. But I have seen the beauty of good, and the ugliness of evil, and have recognized that the wrongdoer has a nature related to my own-not of the same blood or birth, but the same mind, and possessing a share of the divine.
The things you think about determine the quality of your mind. Your soul takes on the color of your thoughts.
“TWO IS ONE AND ONE IS NONE.” This is a common expression among SEALs. Jocko explains: “It just means, ‘Have a backup.’” (Location 6847)
“Two pathways can create anxiety. One pathway travels the detail-focused circuitry of the cortex and eventually sends information to the amygdala, which produces an anxiety response. The other pathway runs directly from the thalamus to the amygdala. Each pathway can cause the amygdala to create anxiety, but each is also constructed of circuitry, and certain aspects of that circuitry can be modified”
One of the most common questions I hear is, “How long does it take to build a new habit?” But what people really should be asking is, “How many does it take to form a new habit?” That is, how many repetitions are required to make a habit automatic?
“The career of electricity was more startling yet. Two centuries ago electricity played no role in the economy, and was used at most for arcane scientific experiments and cheap magic tricks. A series of inventions turned it into our universal genie in a lamp. We flick our fingers and it prints books and sews clothes, keeps our vegetables fresh and our ice cream frozen, cooks our dinners and executes our criminals, registers our thoughts and records our smiles, lights up our nights and entertains us with countless television shows. Few of us understand how electricity does all these things, but even fewer can imagine life without it”
our engineering manager, to take a vacation for a week. And meanwhile he did some research. He went around and talked to every engineer in the company and found out who was doing what and who was working and who wasn’t doing much of anything. Then he fired a whole bunch of people. That was called Bloody Monday. Or, at least, that’s what it ended up being called in the Apple history books. I thought that, pretty much, he fired all the right ones. The laggards, I mean. And then Mike Scott himself
So then, remember in life that your duties are the sum of individual acts. Pay attention to each of these as you do your duty . . . just methodically complete your task.” (Location 643)
Specialization is a powerful way to overcome the “accident” of bad genetics. The more you master a specific skill, the harder it becomes for others to compete with you.
so our brainstorming was: Let’s come up with as many ideas as possible, and then put them under scrutiny, and basically try to kill them off, and if they were unkillable, then we’d keep going with them.” (Location 9289)
Your past has left you a long time back; yet you continue to carry it in your head and continue to be affected by it.You can help a person caught in the jaws of a crocodile. But how can you help a person who thinks she is caught in the jaws of a crocodile?
So the best advice I learned by mistake, and that is: Be willing to fail or succeed on who you really are. Don’t ever try to be anything else. (Location 8966)
Habit tracking naturally builds a series of visual cues like the streak of X’s on your calendar or the list of meals in your food log. When you look at the calendar and see your streak, you’ll be reminded to act again. Research has shown that people who track their progress on goals like losing weight, quitting smoking, and lowering blood pressure are all more likely to improve than those who don’t.
The key is to regurgitate that information in your own words and organize the thoughts somewhere outside of your head. (Location 2953)
But they did have to understand why they were doing it so that they could believe in the mission. (Location 1042)
“Family and community seem to have more impact on our happiness than money and health. People with strong families who live in tight-knit and supportive communities are significantly happier than people whose families are dysfunctional and who have never found (or never sought) a community to be part of. Marriage is particularly important. Repeated studies have found that there is a very close correlation between good marriages and high subjective well-being, and between bad marriages and misery. This holds true irrespective of economic or even physical conditions”
“I don’t agree with those who plunge headlong into the middle of the flood and who, accepting a turbulent life, struggle daily in great spirit with difficult circumstances. The wise person will endure that, but won’t choose it—choosing to be at peace, rather than at war.” (Location 532)
Instead of saying, 'Look, they've offered me this. Either match it or top it or I'm out the door, find out how much more effective it is to use slightly different words: "Obviously, this is where my loyalties lie, and what can the company do so that I don't have to take the other job?"
While you’re sleeping, traveling, attending meetings, or messing around online, the same thing is happening to you. You’re going soft. You’re not aggressive enough. You’re not pressing ahead. You’ve got a million reasons why you can’t move at a faster pace. This all makes the obstacles in your life loom very large.
“four hours of sleep followed by an hour of wakefulness and then another four hours of sleep isn’t equal to eight hours of sleep. When you return to sleep after being awake for even just half an hour, the sleep cycles start over from the beginning, so it will take many more hours to get through an entire sleep period. It isn’t like returning to watching a movie where you left off. It’s like having to go through the whole movie again from the beginning.”
If our perceptions really are mental constructs conditioned by past experiences and present expectations, then what we focus on and how we focus become important factors in determining our experience. And the more deeply we believe something is true, the more likely it will become true in terms of our experience. So if we believe we're weak, stupid, or incompetent, then no matter what our real qualities are, and no matter how differently our friends and associates see us,
Ultimately, to be properly successful is to be at peace as well.” (Location 7979)
Step seven: Resolve to do something every single day that moves you toward your major goal.
“Whenever you find yourself on the side of the majority, it’s time to pause and reflect.” —Mark Twain. (Location 8509)
We are aware that when we constantly postpone the nurturing of the most important relationships in our life, problems of resentment or even estrangement will eventually arise.
“One might have expected that such a prodigious effort would have exhausted the energy sources and raw materials available for vehicle production, and that today we would be scraping the bottom of the barrel. Yet the opposite is the case. Whereas in 1700 the global vehicle industry relied overwhelmingly on wood and iron, today it has at its disposal a cornucopia of new-found materials such as plastic, rubber, aluminium and titanium, none of which our ancestors even knew about. Whereas in 1700 carts were built mainly by the muscle power of carpenters and smiths, today the machines in Toyota and Boeing factories are powered by petroleum combustion engines and nuclear power stations. A similar revolution has swept almost all other fields of industry. We call it the Industrial Revolution.”
Achieving a goal only changes your life for the moment. That’s the counterintuitive thing about improvement. We think we need to change our results, but the results are not the problem. What we really need to change are the systems that cause those results.
“Time and again people have created order in their societies by classifying the population into imagined categories, such as superiors, commoners and slaves; whites and blacks; patricians and plebeians; Brahmins and Shudras; or rich and poor. These categories have regulated relations between millions of humans by making some people legally, politically or socially superior to others.”
“The currency of evolution is neither hunger nor pain, but rather copies of DNA helixes. Just as the economic success of a company is measured only by the number of dollars in its bank account, not by the happiness of its employees, so the evolutionary success of a species is measured by the number of copies of its DNA. If no more DNA copies remain, the species is extinct, just as a company without money is bankrupt. If a species boasts many DNA copies, it is a success, and the species flourishes. From such a perspective, 1,000 copies are always better than a hundred copies”
“If credit is such a wonderful thing, why did nobody think of it earlier? Of course they did. Credit arrangements of one kind or another have existed in all known human cultures, going back at least to ancient Sumer. The problem in previous eras was not that no one had the idea or knew how to use it. It was that people seldom wanted to extend much credit because they didn’t trust that the future would be better than the present. They generally believed that times past had been better than their own times and that the future would be worse, or at best much the same. To put that in economic terms, they believed that the total amount of wealth was limited, if not dwindling.”
I execute a choice (I lead my life). Of course, the consequence  of my choice is not in my control (I am being led).
You can get 95% of the results you want by calmly putting one foot in front of the other. (Location 9707)
“The two most important examples for the rise of such imagined communities are the nation and the consumer tribe. The nation is the imagined community of the state. The consumer tribe is the imagined community of the market. Both are imagined communities because it is impossible for all customers in a market or for all members of a nation really to know one another the way villagers knew one another in the past.”
Meditation. After I pour my cup of coffee each morning, I will meditate for one minute.
Discipline starts every day when the first alarm clock goes off in the morning. (Location 3568)
“Do I really need to make money back the same way I’m losing it?” If you lose $1,000 at the blackjack table, should you try and recoup it there? Probably not. (Location 9641)
“modern industry cares little about the sun or the season. It sanctifies precision and uniformity. For example, in a medieval workshop each shoemaker made an entire shoe, from sole to buckle. If one shoemaker was late for work, it did not stall the others. However, in a modern footwear-factory assembly line, every worker mans a machine that produces just a small part of a shoe, which is then passed on to the next machine. If the worker who operates machine no. 5 has overslept, it stalls all the other machines.”
Chris was one of the best snipers anywhere. He had already single-handedly accounted for dozens of enemy killed and certainly didn’t need any urging from me to pull the trigger on bad guys he could PID. His level of caution signaled that I, as his SEAL platoon commander, needed to make the tough decision—the best decision I could—based on the information I had. (Location 3327)
“One interesting conclusion is that money does indeed bring happiness. But only up to a point, and beyond that point it has little significance. For people stuck at the bottom of the economic ladder, more money means greater happiness. If you are an American single mother earning $12,000 a year cleaning houses and you suddenly win $500,000 in the lottery, you will probably experience a significant and long-term surge in your subjective well-being.”
to these types of leaders working at your company? Let me ask you this: Are there any high-potential frontline personnel that could take their jobs? It may be time (Location 3459)
Nowhere you can go is more peaceful-more free of interruptions-than your own soul.
The board members will be impressed with what they see and hear, because most people are unable to do this. They will respect your Extreme Ownership. Take personal responsibility for the failures. You will come out the other side stronger than ever before,” (Location 604)
You cannot delay your well-being by waiting for someone to become good. Separate the hurt of the present from the hurt of the past. It is time to forgive and move on.
If you do have another job offer, but would like to remain with ie company you work for, stress the importance of your loyalty.
Sympathy: I feel sorry for you. Empathy: I can understand what you must be going through. Respect: I admire the way you are handling this. Respect >> Empathy >> Sympathy
when I would go back and review the journals and realize how many life-changing things happened within a weekend. (Location 10202)
know a writer who uses his computer only for writing, his tablet only for reading, and his phone only for social media and texting. Every habit should have a home.
Ask questions until you understand why so you can believe in what you are doing and you can pass that information down the chain to your team with confidence, so they can get out and execute the mission. That is leadership.” (Location 1220)
Reframing your habits to highlight their benefits rather than their drawbacks is a fast and lightweight way to reprogram your mind and make a habit seem more attractive.
It’s really how you look at it, and the way you look at it is so important. If you can have a positive attitude, look at it, and say, “Let me see, what I can learn from this?” . . . Why would you ever get upset about anything?’ (Location 10301)
Reduce the friction associated with good behaviors. When friction is low, habits are easy.
To get a habit to stick you need to feel immediately successful—even if it’s in a small way.
touched; we need to be spoken to; we need the simple fact of our exis- tence to be acknowledged.
the extremely valuable lesson that to whatever degree a person commits himself or herself to the welfare of others, he or she is repaid a thousandfold by opportunities for learning and advancement. Every kind word, every smile you offer someone who might be having a bad day, comes back to you in ways you'd never expect
But a leader must remain calm and make the best decisions possible. (Location 2178)
When leaders receive an order that they themselves question and do not understand, they must ask the question: why? Why are we being asked to do this? (Location 1099)
Phu-Tsering’s awestruck face, so like a child’s, reminds me of GS’s story of the time in eastern Nepal when our cook received a letter saying that his wife had left him for another man. Weeping, Phu-Tsering had got to his feet and read the letter aloud to all the Sherpa villagers where they were camped, and the people had all stood there and wept with him. As GS commented, “A Westerner would have slunk off and kicked stones; you have to admire the sherpas for being so open about everything”—so open, so without defence, therefore so free, true Bodhisattvas, accepting like the variable airs the large and small events of every day.
When you need something from another department, ask your self, 'What can I do to make it easier for them?'
One of the hardest things to do in life is to say “No.” To invitations, to requests, to obligations, to the stuff that everyone else is doing. (Location 162)
Praise specifically, criticize generally (Warren Buffett). (Location 8918)
Leaders must have a competitive spirit but also be gracious losers. They must drive competition and push themselves and their teams to perform at the highest level. (Location 3642)
The good news is that it’s pretty easy to remember what is inside our control. According to the Stoics, the circle of control contains just one thing: YOUR MIND. (Location 268)
When subordinates aren’t doing what they should, leaders that exercise Extreme Ownership cannot blame the subordinates. They must first look in the mirror at themselves. The leader bears full responsibility for explaining the strategic mission, developing the tactics, and securing the training and resources to enable the team to properly and successfully execute. (Location 479)
He can turn it off so deeply, and man, when he goes in the ring, you can’t turn it on with any more intensity than he can. His ability to turn it off is directly aligned with how intensely he can turn it on, so [I train] people to do this, to have stress and recovery undulation (Location 9351)
keeping your mind focused on the present will get you further toward your goals than keeping your mind focused on the goal itself.
If we think we are not worthy of love, we will subconsciously deny it.If we truly believe we are worthy of love, we will take the smallest compliments with grace and ease.
Boiling water will soften a potato but harden an egg. You can’t control whether you’re a potato or an egg, but you can decide to play a game where it’s better to be hard or soft.
But again, how I respond to these consequences is once again my choice and that is in my control.
And to see clearly, from his example, that a man can sino both strength and flexibility.
Any number of things can determine the nature of relative expe- rience without changing the absolute reality of who you are.
One needs no silver plate, encrusted and embossed in solid gold; but we should not believe the lack of silver and gold to be proof of the simple life.
just begin the work. The rest follows. (Location 318)
“the average forager had wider, deeper and more varied knowledge of her immediate surroundings than most of her modern descendants. Today, most people in industrial societies don’t need to know much about the natural world in order to survive. What do you really need to know in order to get by as a computer engineer, an insurance agent, a history teacher or a factory worker? You need to know a lot about your own tiny field of expertise, but for the vast majority of life’s necessities you rely blindly on the help of other experts, whose own knowledge is also limited to a tiny field of expertise. The human collective knows far more today than did the ancient bands. But at the individual level, ancient foragers were the most knowledgeable and skilful people in history”
Nirvana is a fundamentally objective state of mind: an acceptance of experience without judgments, which opens us to the potential for seeing solutions that may not b~ directly connected to our survival as individuals, but rather to the survival of all sentient beings.
So other people hurt me? That's their problem. Their character and actions are not mine.
Keeping a journal of your own performance is the easiest and most private way to give self-feedback. Journals allow you to step out of your automatic thinking and ask yourself: What went wrong? How could I do better? Monitoring your own performance allows you to see patterns that you simply couldn’t see before. This type of analysis is painful for the ego, which is also why it helps build a circle of competence. You can’t improve if you don’t know what you’re doing wrong.
The more a habit becomes part of your life, the less you need outside encouragement to follow through. Incentives can start a habit. Identity sustains a habit. That said,
“The other-worldly meanings medieval people found in their lives were no more deluded than the modern humanist, nationalist and capitalist meanings modern people find. The scientist who says her life is meaningful because she increases the store of human knowledge, the soldier who declares that his life is meaningful because he fights to defend his homeland, and the entrepreneur who finds meaning in building a new company are no less delusional than their medieval counterparts who found meaning in reading scriptures, going on a crusade or building a new cathedral.”
Using technology to automate your habits is the most reliable and effective way to guarantee the right behavior.
“Economics is a notoriously complicated subject. To make things easier, let’s imagine a simple example”
Constructing effective arguments
They’re able to do this not only because of training and experience, but because they understand that reacting emotionally will only make the situation worse. (Location 517)
You know the guy: you can’t sit with him for lunch without him bringing up who got what promotion. He always has some kind of office gossip to spread, and he seems to cling to corporate politics as if clinging to the story line of a soap opera
Happiness must happen, and the same holds for success: you have to let it happen by not caring about it. I want you to listen to what your conscience commands you to do and go on to carry it out to the best of your knowledge. Then you will live to see that in the long run—in the long run, I say!—success will follow you precisely because you had forgotten to think of
“You might think that people would gradually understand that these stigmas were myth rather than fact and that blacks would be able, over time, to prove themselves just as competent, law-abiding and clean as whites. In fact, the opposite happened – these prejudices became more and more entrenched as time went by. Since all the best jobs were held by whites, it became easier to believe that blacks really are inferior. ‘Look,’ said the average white citizen, ‘blacks have been free for generations, yet there are almost no black professors, lawyers, doctors or even bank tellers. Isn’t that proof that blacks are simply less intelligent and hard-working?’ Trapped in this vicious circle, blacks were”
Search for something positive in every person, either qualities or incidents, and hold that as your most dominant thought whenever you meet them or think of them. Thus, you script your own peace, always...independent of what they did for you or didn't do for you.
We need to make our habits attractive because it is the expectation of a rewarding experience that motivates us to act in the first place. This is where a strategy known as temptation bundling comes into play.
A habit is a behavior that has been repeated enough times to become automatic. The process of habit formation begins with trial and error. Whenever you encounter a new situation in life, your brain has to make a decision. How do I respond to this?
were confident and perhaps even a little cocky. But I tried to temper that confidence by instilling a culture within our task unit to never be satisfied; we pushed ourselves harder to continuously improve our performance. I reminded our troops that we couldn’t take the enemy for granted, that we could never get complacent. (Location 1281)
“You know that the cortex pathway produces worries, obsessions, and interpretations that create anxiety, and you know that the amygdala initiates bodily reactions that make up the fight, flight, or freeze response.”
“Discipline equals freedom.” (Location 6370)
on the one hand having the courage to enter into things that are unfamiliar, but also having the wisdom to stop exploring when you’ve found something worth sticking around for. (Location 7009)
“Moreover, the new agricultural tasks demanded so much time that people were forced to settle permanently next to their wheat fields. This completely changed their way of life. We did not domesticate wheat. It domesticated us.”
In combat as in life, the outcome is never certain, the picture never clear. There are no guarantees of success. But in order to succeed, leaders must be comfortable under pressure, and act on logic, not emotion. This is a critical component to victory. (Location 3363)
The master consented and the servant galloped off on the horse. On returning to his house the master himself met Death, and questioned him, “Why did you terrify and threaten my servant?” “I did not threaten him; I only showed surprise in still finding him here when I planned to meet him tonight in Teheran,” said Death.
“What progress, you ask, have I made? I have begun to be a friend to myself.” That was indeed a great benefit; such a person can never be alone. You may be sure that such a man is a friend to all mankind. Farewell.
“So much of the job is more emotion and ‘heart work’ than it is ‘head work.’ The head comes in after, to look at what the heart has presented and to organize it. But the initial inspiration comes from a different place, and it’s not the head, and it’s not an intellectual activity.” (Location 8254)
Selfcontrol is a shortterm strategy, not a longterm one. You may be able to resist temptation once or twice, but it’s unlikely you can muster the willpower to override your desires every time. Instead of summoning a new dose of willpower whenever you want to do the right thing, your energy would be better spent optimizing your environment.
We who lived in concentration camps can remember the men who walked through the huts comforting others, giving away their last piece of bread. They may have been few in number, but they offer suffcient proof that everything can be taken from a man but one thing: the last of the human freedoms—to choose one’s attitude in any given set of circumstances, to choose one’s own way.
At some point, success in nearly every field requires you to ignore an immediate reward in favor of a delayed reward.
“Whenever they decided to do a bit of extra work – say, to hoe the fields instead of scattering seeds on the surface – people thought, ‘Yes, we will have to work harder. But the harvest will be so bountiful! We won’t have to worry any more about lean years. Our children will never go to sleep hungry.’ It made sense. If you worked harder, you would have a better life. That was the plan.
your ideas about yourself-''I'm not good enough,"· ''I'm too fat," or "I made a horrible mistake yesterday"-are based on prior causes and conditions. Maybe you didn't sleep well the night be- fore. Maybe someone said something you didn't like earlier in the day. Or maybe you're just hungry and your body is crying out for vitamins
“In a completely free market, unsupervised by kings and priests, avaricious capitalists can establish monopolies or collude against their workforces. If there is a single corporation controlling all shoe factories in a country, or if all factory owners conspire to reduce wages simultaneously, then the labourers are no longer able to protect themselves by switching jobs.”
“It is true that married people are happier than singles and divorcees, but that does not necessarily mean that marriage produces happiness. It could be that happiness causes marriage. Or more correctly, that serotonin, dopamine and oxytocin bring about and maintain a marriage. People who are born with a cheerful biochemistry are generally happy and content. Such people are more attractive spouses, and consequently they have a greater chance of getting married. They are also less likely to divorce, because it is far easier to live with a happy and content spouse than with a depressed and dissatisfied one. Consequently, it’s true that married people are happier on average than singles, but a single woman prone to gloom because of her biochemistry would not necessarily become happier if she were to hook up with a husband”
Repeating a habit leads to clear physical changes in the brain. In musicians, the cerebellum—critical for physical movements like plucking a guitar string or pulling a violin bow—is larger than it is in nonmusicians. Mathematicians, meanwhile, have increased gray matter in the inferior parietal lobule, which plays a key role in computation and calculation. Its size is directly correlated with the amount of time spent in the field; the older and more experienced the mathematician, the greater the increase in gray matter.
The only thing we could absolutely rely upon had to do with Moore’s Law—the now-famous rule in electronics (named for Intel founder Gordon Moore) that says that every eighteen months you can pack twice the number of transistors on a chip.
It can ruin your life only if it ruins character. Otherwise it cannot harm you inside or out.
Many people feel out of place the first time they go to the gym or try to change their diet, but if you are already similar to the other members of the group in some way—say, your mutual love of Star Wars—change becomes more appealing because it feels like something people like you already do.
“but according to the Americans all people are equal, whereas according to the Babylonians people are decidedly unequal. The Americans would, of course, say that they are right, and that Hammurabi is wrong. Hammurabi, naturally, would retort that he is right, and that the Americans are wrong. In fact, they are both wrong. Hammurabi and the American Founding Fathers alike imagined a reality governed by universal and immutable principles of justice, such as equality or hierarchy. Yet the only place where such universal principles exist is in the fertile imagination of Sapiens, and in the myths they invent and tell one another. These principles have no objective validity.”eturn, it is not sharing.It is a transaction!
Wanting to maintain a distance from someone you do not relate to any more doesn’t mean you don’t care about them.It just means you care about the relationship you have with yourself more than the one you have with them.
The inner world drives the outer. Period.
We are not the average of the five people we spend the most time with.We are the average of the five thoughts we spend the most time with.And those thoughts needn’t come from people in our life. Our thoughts come from people we follow on social media, the books, podcasts, anything we consume.We aren’t with people any more.We are with ideas, thoughts and identities.Pick wisely.
Risk and failure are a state of mind.There should never be any fear.And no regret.
The individual instincts were hardwired into us by evolution. They are millions of years old. The social instincts are much younger and were learned over the last 70,000 years.
The pricing of large-capitalization stocks tends to be more efficient than that of small-capitalization stocks, distressed bonds, and other less-popular investment fare.
Our brain makes predictions incredibly quickly and about nearly everything in life. When our experiences don't match what our brain expects, we feel surprised.
We all see the world through the prism of our identity.
“Human beings owe a surprisingly large proportion of their cognitive and behavioral capacities to the existence of an automatic self, of which they have no conscious knowledge and over which they have little voluntary control.” -Jonathan Miller
When it comes to maintaining a sense of well-being, we are ultimate spin doctors of information. We will twist, confuse, contort, and ignore whatever information we need to maintain our sense of self. Daniel Gilbert refers to this as the psychological immune system, which fires up whenever we are trying to protect our psychological well-being.
The day of the dinner: arrive 30-60 minutes in advance. Especially important to select the best table if you haven’t been able to book the table in advance.
Anything that gives light must endure burning.
When you set a goal, most people ask, “What do I need to do to achieve your goal?” Instead, you should ask “Who do I need to become?”
Our frontal lobe is what allows us to be the only animal that experiences and envisions the future as we do.
“You will never be happy if you continue to search for what happiness consists of. You will never live if you are looking for the meaning of life.” -Albert Camus
You can't get very far in science by trying to explain one mystery with another mystery.
Europe has always been far more fragmented than China. Even at its peak, the Roman Empire never controlled more than half of Europe.
From a linear perspective of time, Bill Gates will live the same years as most other people do. From a nonlinear perspective, he is squeezing the same amount of life into seconds that most people experience in their entire lifetime.
The assets of a company are typically worth more as part of a going concern than in liquidation, so liquidation value is generally a worst-case assessment.
I can’t hand out any ready-made success to you. It would do you no good, and it would do the house harm. There is plenty of room at the top here, but there is no elevator in the building.
The Truth and Reconciliation Project in South Africa united people who had been on opposing sides during Apartheid. It was through connection of enemies, not revenge, that the country found healing.
Note: most people optimize for the finish line. Goals, outcomes, milestones, deadlines. Instead you should optimize for the starting line. Reducing friction, etc.
McClellan's research: the kinds of early childhood experiences that affect the nonconscious seem to have a cultural basis.
Later he told me when he was younger he learned the secret to performing under pressure: don’t do it for yourself. Do it for someone else. “I know your grandfather always tells us to think of nothing. But when I get scared I just think of someone I love.”
We often think there is a clear division between farmer and hunter gatherer lifestyles, but actually there can be a blending of the two. For example, some cultures plant crops, resume a hunter gatherer lifestyle while they grow, then return to harvest and eat.
The correct choice for investors is obvious but requires a level of commitment most are unwilling to make.
The patterns of behavior acquired in the family are often different from the patterns of behavior acquired with peers.
Sacks had an incredible book editor who once phoned him in Australia to ask how he felt about replacing a comma with a semicolon.
Just say “Thank You” to more comments rather than making a bigger fuss about things. We often have issues with accepting compliments.
Ideas are the strongest things of all in history. Even a gun was originally an idea.
How much happier is the man who owes nothing to anybody except the one he can most easily refuse, himself!
You have to be willing to give 100 percent in your relationships. Always take 100 percent responsibility for everything that happens to you.
How many decisions (including ones of great historical significance that impact millions of people) are made by men and women who are driven by personal motives rather than by a desire to do the right thing?
“Experience is unobservable to everyone except the person who it happens to.”
Growth is only half the equation. It is an important half, but still only half.
All investors must come to terms with the relentless continuity of the investment process. Although specific investments have a beginning and an end, portfolio management goes on forever.
Some of the traits we think are fixed like a quick temper or moody-ness or compassion are learned skills, not fixed characteristics.
We should ask if our behaviors are adaptive or maladaptive to the current environment we find ourselves in. Often, behaviors that are adaptive to our environment seem “rational” (economic terms) and behaviors that are maladaptive to our environment seem “irrational” (psychology terms).
Zander’s music professor to him when he struggled to learn a new piece quickly: “You mean, you’ve been playing for THREE MINUTES and you STILL haven’t mastered it?”
The alarm bells that ring when you try something new (fear, sweat, higher heart rate, discomfort) are signals of growth. It’s important not to ignore them for safety reasons, but you can also look at them as a sign of your improvement.
Success is like a garden. You must constantly tend to it and care for it.
Over a full career, most investors’ results will be determined more by how many losers they have, and how bad they are, than by the greatness of their winners.
Essentialists are people who make fewer decisions, but take the time to contemplate those decisions. By doing so they make fewer, better choices.
Pay close attention to what excites you and what drains you.
The two classical drives of human development have been thought to be nature and nurture, genes and environment.
“The less you can live on, the more chance your idea will succeed. This is true even after you've made it.”
He created “field trips” for his kids and their friends organized around different topics like grease (fast food), garbage (garbage men and recycling), luggage (luggage factory and airports). Sounds fun and cool and the kids loved it.
Zen concept of Beginners Mind. It's harder to concentrate as you advance in skill level.
How to handle an someone turning down your invite: “Under what circumstances would you say, “Yes.”?
The rise of agriculture in some areas before others has to do with the environment, not the intelligence of the people.
When you make an apology say, “I'm sorry. I'll try to do better.” And then shut up. Don't try to justify it.
The reality in almost all companies is that goal setting is not an “either-or” exercise. Balance is paramount. The central problem is that most companies are not balanced.
Who is on your personal board of advisors? Who are the 10-12 experts you get advice from?
Technology develops cumulatively rather than in isolated heroic acts. Even people we often associate with acts of genius like the Wright Brothers and Thomas Edison actually built upon the work of predecessors and had capable people who followed them and advanced ideas.
Never pretend you are not a knight or attempt to diminish yourself because you deem it will make others more comfortable. We show others the most respect by offering the best of ourselves.
Sacks calls himself a “physician, teacher and storyteller.” I like those descriptions.
Maybe school teaches us not to respond in a natural way, but to respond in a muted way. We unconsciously learn to copy our teachers. To act like we’ve been there before. To cross our arms, fold our legs, and lean back from the book or the film, rather than into it.
It is good for new ideas to be heard for the sake of the few that can be used. But it is also good for new ideas to be tested and questioned.
Vision evolved to discover and respond to objects: recognize them, eat them, catch them, or mate with them quickly and reliably.
The goal isn’t an infinite quantity of time, but the highest quality of time. This is where time slows down.
In reality, no one knows what the market will do; trying to predict it is a waste of time, and investing based upon that prediction is a speculative undertaking.
What is the one word which will best arouse the emotion with which I wish this particular advertisement to be charged?
The Dalai Lama has a theory on selfishness: We should strive to be wise selfish rather than foolish selfish. Foolish selfish is when you focus on self-centered and shallow activities. Wise selfish is when you show compassion and help others because it benefits you and makes you feel good. Compassion is in our own self-interest.
It could be useful to perform an exercise where you write down the concrete details of future tasks, events, goals, etc… This will force you to be clear about the specific action steps and fully imagine the details of the event rather than remaining in dream mode where the details are fuzzy or forgotten. Do this each week or month?
If it’s all invented, then you might as well invent a way of viewing life that benefits you. You might as well invent a frame of possibility.
Writers block is when you have nothing to say, but somehow think you should. Don't be so hard on yourself. Go out into the world, experience life, and write when you have something to say.
Start by saving 1 percent of your money each month. Then save 2 percent the next month. Continue until you are saving 10 percent of what you earn.
Presentism refers to judging historical events or people by modern day standards. It is largely useless and unfair because you can't expect historical figures to make the same decisions as we do now because they lived in a very different context. It's “sort of like arresting someone in the 1920s for not wearing a seatbelt.”
Not only is time the ultimate currency, but in actuality time is our only currency. Our time is the only thing that really belongs to us. Everything else belongs to the world and the universe. We can’t take our money or stuff with us when we die. Although we may “own” something, we don’t really own it. At most, we are stewards over our possessions, but they are ultimately the Earth’s. The only thing that is fundamentally ours is our time. To waste our time is to waste ourselves.
There seem to be some universal factors in the recognition of beauty. For example, tropical male birds developed remarkably beautiful feathers to attract females of their own species, but humans find them beautiful as well and use them in headdresses. Perhaps there is a fundamental “truth” of aesthetics that speaks to all creatures.
During the height of his fame, Martin would have people chase him down on the highway, drive their car with one hand while waving the other out the window and screaming, “I’m a wild and crazy guy!” in reference to his Saturday Night Life bit.
Your life is a result of your moment to moment choices.
Decoy options are another way to change behavior and nudge people toward a particular option.
Duchamp lived extremely simply and on very little money.
Humans can develop a mental model of what others think of them. This is known as a “theory of mind” and our ability to construct these scenarios in our head is unique to humans.
Buying something for less than its value. In my opinion, this is what it’s all about—the most dependable way to make money. Buying at a discount from intrinsic value and having the asset’s price move toward its value doesn’t require serendipity; it just requires that market participants wake up to reality. When the market’s functioning properly, value exerts a magnetic pull on price.
Accepting responsibility for our problems is the first step to solving them.
In our world with limitless options, limitless books to read, limitless clothes to wear, limitless paths to take, it is extremely important to be picky.
Every great artist has their own voice. You have to find yours. (Writing plus sketches?)
Pay day is always a month off for the spend-thrift, and he is never able to realize more than sixty cents on any dollar that comes to him. But a dollar is worth one hundred and six cents to a good business man, and he never spends the dollar. It’s the man who keeps saving up and expenses down that buys an interest in the concern.
A side effect of taking time to find yourself and goofing off: you gradually find that you are becoming ready to be mature, responsible, hard working, etc.
When your portfolio is completely in cash, there is no risk of loss. There is also, however, no possibility of earning a high return.
analyzing the cash flows of the underlying business is the best way to value a stock.
“All good science emerges from an imaginative conception of what might be true.” -Peter Medawar
Human nature is uncivilized. It is almost contra-civilization. It is only through culture and restraint and morality that we acquire civilized activities.
North America was populated by about 20 million Native Americans when Columbus landed in 1492. Within two centuries, 95 percent of the native population had died, most of them from infectious diseases.
The third method of valuation, stock market value, is an estimate of the price at which a company, or its subsidiaries considered separately, would trade in the stock market. Less reliable than the other two, this method is only occasionally useful as a yardstick of value.
Separate our conclusions about events from our descriptions of the events themselves.
Do not live beyond your means.
I decided to seek out the wisest man I could find and ask him to tell me how to live.
“Revenue is vanity, profit is sanity, and cash is king”?
Idea: we are the product of all of the previous events in history summed up and rolled into the present moment. However, even though everything is involved in what made us, there are a few forces that carry most of the weight. Those forces are genetics, culture, environment, and technology.
This doesn’t mean we don’t need a criminal justice system nor do we need to separate dangerous people from society.
People tend to be drawn to others like themselves. For example, it is likely your childhood friend will the same age, sex, race, and have similar values. It is worth noting that children and adults are very unlike each other in size, intelligence, power, freedom and more.
Step 3: put the problem completely out of your mind and go do something else that excites you and energizes you.
We seem to focus too much on “local” changes, not global ones. That is, we care too much about the latest change rather than the overall trend.
Youth often assumes, incorrectly, that the old and wise only have wisdom about days gone by.
“The best parts of Eckhart Tolle were a form of Buddhism.”
Ideas are just a multiplier of execution. The most brilliant idea is worthless with no execution.
Over the course of history, human behavior has changed, but not human nature.
The more unique your idea is, the harder it will be for people to give you good advice. Ignore everybody.
People who base their self-worth on being right about everything prevent themselves from learning from their mistakes.
“What the most productive people have in common is that they treat working time like a sprint (52 minutes on average) and then pairing it with a recharge session (17 minutes on average).”
Often we imagine that we will work hard until we arrive at some distant goal, and then we will be happy. This is a delusion. Happiness is the result of a life lived with purpose. Happiness is not an objective.
“There is no question that most, if not all, mental events are the product of physical events. The brain is a physical system entirely beholden to the laws of nature. And there is every reason to believe that changes in its functional state and material structure entirely dictate our thoughts and actions.”
“Profit is a condition of survival. It is the cost of the future, the cost of staying in business.”
The more you embrace being uncertain and not knowing, the more comfortable you will feel in knowing what you don’t know.
So much is within the control of professional tennis players that they really should go for winners. And they’d better, since if they serve up easy balls, their opponents will hit winners of their own and take points. In contrast, investment results are only partly within the investors’ control, and investors can make good money—and outlast their opponents—without trying tough shots.
It's not big choices, but ones that you think don't matter or count for much that derail us. You don't consciously think about it, but these small decisions can really change things.
SETH KLARMAN: Silos are a double-edged sword. A narrow focus leads to potentially superior knowledge. But concentration of effort within rigid boundaries leaves a strong possibility of mispricings outside those borders. Also, if others’ silos are similar to your own, competitive forces will likely drive down returns in spite of superior knowledge within such silos.
Accessibility of information actually has a neurological component. Information can be “energized” and has higher action potentials when it is easier to recall.
Hearing about the extensive writing and personal notetaking that Sacks did throughout his life makes me feel even stronger about the importance of writing. We need to observe and record the experiences that happen to us. The things we live through can teach us an incredible amount, but only if we are willing to investigate and learn lessons from them. Keeping a journal and writing about your life is a fantastic way to make sense of the world and leave lessons for others to build upon.
If I say ‘Make up a story', then most people are paralysed. If I say ‘describe a routine and then interrupt it', people see no problem. A film like The Last Detail is based on the routine of two sailors travelling across America with a prisoner whom they have to deliver to a prison. The routine is interrupted by their decision to give him a good time. The story I fantasised earlier about the bear who chased me was presumably an interruption of the routine ‘Walking through the forest'. Red Riding Hood presents an interruption of the routine ‘Taking a basket of goodies to Grandma'. Many people think of finding more interesting routines, which doesn't solve the problem. It may be interesting to have a vet rectally examining an elephant, or to show b-ain surgeons doing a particularly delicate operation, but these activities remain routines. If two lavatory attendants break a routine by starting a brain operation, or if a window cleaner begins to examine the elephant, then this is likely to generate a narrative. Conversely, two brain surgeons working as lavatory cleaners immediately sounds like part of a story. If I describe mountaineers climbing a mountain, then the routine says that they first climb it, and then they climb down, which isn't much of a story. A film of a mountain climb isn't necessarily anything more than a documentary.
I disagree with Epictetus’ point about “we are all actors and your job is to play the role you’ve been given.” I get that he is making an attempt at saying, “Don’t try to be someone you’re not,” but I think the language could have been better. His phrasing makes it sound like, “You have no control over your life. If you’re poor, you’re poor. Get over it, accept it, and be happy being poor.” In some ways, useful. In other ways, too much of a fixed mindset for my taste. I prefer a more empowering view of your life and the control you have over it.
There will always be causes for anxiety, whether due to prosperity or to wretchedness.
I want to say right here that the easiest way in the world to make enemies is to hire friends.
Assume that you will receive no recognition for the work you do. Assume that nobody will care. Then, create it anyway.
Imagination is as effortless as perception, unless we think it might be ‘wrong', which is what our education encourages us to believe. Then we experience ourselves as ‘imagining', as ‘thinking up an idea', but what we're really doing is faking up the sort of imagination we think we ought to have.
Be careful what you tell children. They can be easily hurt and we remember how we feel for a lifetime.
In investing it is never wrong to change your mind. It is only wrong to change your mind and do nothing about it.
The key to success is this: are you learning each day?
We must not be afraid of committing to our true desires at the expense of forgoing others.
Start with something simple.
By his late 20s, Martin had reached a point where he was a successful opening act and would appear on televisions shows (including The Tonight Show) on a routine basis, but he was never opening. He realized that the audience never came for the opening act. People only cared about the headliner. And so, he set a rule to only headline and never open. Within a year, he was completely broke.
For better sleep avoid light, excessive heat, and noise.
Evolutionary pressures influence our mind as well as our bodies.
What is most valuable to know is not where to look for a particular idea, but how to train the mind in the method by which all ideas are produced; and how to grasp the principles which are at the source of all ideas.
It's easy to fall into a default career path that is more about other people's expectations than your own interests.
Step 2: Meditation
The first condition of freedom is limitation. If freedom is absolute, then it dies in chaos. The prime task of government is to establish order.
Many people assume they must be paranoid and worry if they want to stay at the top of their game.
Neuroscience is currently at the stage chemistry was at in the 19th century. Grouping together the basic elements of the field and not yet attempting any grand, all-encompassing theories.
One persons subjective experience of happiness (and life) might be imperfect and subjective, but when we look at hundreds or thousands of people truths and patterns start to emerge. The individual imperfections cancel out.
Manson’s idea of “kill yourself” is similar to Paul Graham’s idea of “keep your identity small.” The central point is that if you don’t have an identity to protect, then change becomes much easier.
When you lose two weeks of work, you don't just lose the work you would have done. You also lose momentum and that is the bigger problem.
It is particularly advisable for people with limited financial means to use cash payments as a control mechanism.
It is fascinating how he slowly expanded his shoe length with each gig. His early jobs were short routines or magic tricks of a few minutes. Then he did a five minute skit or a ten minute show at a club. Then he took on a twenty minute gig and even added in three poems to read just to add enough length. It's an awesome example of taking on just manageable difficulties.
Notes: 1) Ha. How interesting that they tried to hide baldness back then too.
Loving yourself is like putting your oxygen mask on before helping the person next to you. Loving yourself softens your own ego. Fear hardens your ego. It’s easier to be helpful and kind when you love yourself.
Civilization itself is the most remarkable thing humankind has done.
The improviser has to realise that the more obvious he is, the more original he appears. I constantly point out how much the audience like someone who is direct, and how they always laugh with pleasure at a really ‘obvious' idea. Ordinary people asked to improvise will search for some ‘original' idea because they want to be thought clever.
“The average American spends over 15 hours per day sitting or sleeping.”
The biggest mistake most people make in life is not setting goals high enough.
“Good pricing has three prerequisites: create value, quantify value, and communicate value,” I said in summary. “That is when you get the price you deserve, the price you need for a profitable business. And, last but not least, avoid price wars.
Hedonic adaptation: the observed tendency of humans to quickly return to a relatively stable level of happiness despite major positive or negative events or life changes.
Masters love the practice and because they love it, they get better. And the better they get, the more they enjoy the practice. It’s an upward spiral.
Top achievers don't copy or compete. They dominate. They set the pace.
“Most of us know pretty much how we should behave. It is the execution that is the problem, not the absence of knowledge.”
Trust is the most important ingredient in any relationship for the simple reason that without trust the relationship doesn’t actually mean anything.
Clinging to the past: “Many people enjoy living in the past, especially if going back there lets them blame someone else for anything that's gone wrong in their lives. That's when clinging to the past becomes an interpersonal problem… When we make excuses, we are blaming someone or something beyond our control as the reason for our failure. Anyone but ourselves.” When we talk about the past it is NOT about change. It is about understanding. And often about blaming others.
There’s no easier way to cure foolishness than to give a man leave to be foolish. And the only way to show a fellow that he’s chosen the wrong business is to let him try it.
Money is plentiful for those who understand the simple laws of making money.
Buddhism is “advanced common sense.” It requires you to analyze simple fundamentals until a deeper understanding is achieved.
Last minute preparation is just a way to delay and be fearful. Focus on training better beforehand and when the resistance comes face it and take action.
The Law of Large Numbers: when a phenomenon arises from very large numbers of something, but not smaller versions of it. For example, billions of neurons lead to a conscious human brain, but two neurons are not a small version of consciousness.
No man respects himself if he does not repay his debts.
“There’s a big difference between probability and outcome. Probable things fail to happen—and improbable things happen—all the time.”
All living things rely on each other. If there were no earthworms, the soil would be depleted, grow no food, and we would die. Understanding that he relies on all that surrounds him, a knight is kind above all. He knows he will need many friends. Proper manners are not trivial. Being polite is part of our daily meditation on the equality of mankind.
After-Sale Profit: Drive profit with upsells, cross-sells, and supplemental products. Accessories, replacement parts, etc.
There are three distinct requirements for personal freedom: 1) a heart at peace, 2) healthy relationships, and 3) upright character.
My view is that an investor is better off knowing a lot about a few investments than knowing only a little about each of a great many holdings.
There’s no alarm clock for the sleepy man like an early rising manager; and there’s nothing breeds work in an office like a busy boss.
The third biological lesson of history is that life must breed.
“The principle on which to manage an army is to set up one standard of courage which all must reach.”
The adaptive nonconscious cannot think about the past or make plans for the future. It lives in the here and now.
A bargain should be inspected and re-inspected for possible flaws.
“What would I do if I wasn't afraid?”
We must indulge the mind and from time to time allow it the leisure which is its food and strength. We must go for walks out of doors, so that the mind can be strengthened and invigorated by a clear sky and plenty of fresh air. At times it will acquire fresh energy from a journey by carriage and a change of scene, or from socializing and drinking freely. Occasionally we should even come to the point of intoxication, sinking into drink but not being totally flooded by it; for it does wash away cares, and stirs the mind to its depths, and heals sorrow just as it heals certain diseases.
There are few things as risky as the widespread belief that there’s no risk.
Hedonic editing is a way of avoiding thinking about losses and mistakes by convincing ourselves they aren't that bad.
“People are not aware of the fact that their defenses are more likely to be triggered by intense than mild suffering. Thus, they mis-predict their own emotional reactions to misfortunes of different sizes.”
There is a big difference between being self employed and being a business owner. When you're self employed everything crumbles if you don't show up. You're not a business owner until you can leave for a year and your business is doing even better when you come back.
“When you squelch something you give it power. Ignorance is not bliss.” You should not run from your problems and pain. You should acknowledge them.
Regardless of your genetic potential, you have to work just as hard to fulfill it. Potential is just opportunity.
The word sin is relevant only in the sense of the individual violating the group.
Reason 2: the rate of diffusion of technological innovation due to the orientation of continents (east-west vs. north-south) and geographic barriers (mountains, deserts, etc.). The favorable geography of the Europe and Asia landmass resulted in much faster agricultural and technological expansion.
As you grow into maturity, do not concern yourself with aging. A rose is striking in full bloom only because it will never be so again, but a budding rose is also stunning, as are the dark petals of autumn.
Big transactions are a function of relationships.
What you learn in one context will not necessarily work in another.
Decisions to sell, like decisions to buy, must be based upon underlying business value.
Specifically, by finding securities whose prices depart appreciably from underlying value, investors can frequently achieve above-average returns while taking below-average risks.
Get the scent in your nostrils and keep your nose to the ground, and don’t worry too much about the end of the chase. The fun of the thing’s in the run and not in the finish.
Study of teenagers showed that those with a higher percentage of meaningful behaviors had lower levels of depression. 2014 study followed them for a full year and tested them in an fMRI scanner about hedonic acts vs meaningful acts.
While working with deaf students Sacks referred to them as “hearing impaired ” and one of the students signed back to say maybe he was “sign impaired.”
I’m anxious that you should be a good scholar, but I’m more anxious that you should be a good clean man.
The self consists of many components and the notion of one, unitary self may be an illusion.
Do not be an optimist or a pessimist. Instead, be a realist. Accept that life is composed of difficulties and delights. The difficulties are a natural price of existence. The delights are goodies you don’t necessarily deserve.
The simple joys are the great ones. Pleasure is not complicated.
Bias always affects our judgment.
It is easy for our mind to notice what is there (a dog barking) but very difficult to notice the absence of something (you rarely recognize a dog not barking as an event because it's just silence). The silences, misses, and absences of events are crucial in determining the real world implications of things, but we rarely pick up on them. We tend to remember what did happen, but not what didn't happen.
One good strategy: hold dinners around an event (like WDS) because 1) you catch people on the road, which means they are probably free that night and 2) like-minded people often hang out at the same events.
Giacomo Rizzolatti's study showed that monkeys had some ability to read another monkey’s mind, which means they had some mirror neurons.
You can express a goal in different ways. How can you express “make money” in terms that fit your business model?
Reason 4: continental differences in total population size. Europe and Asia had a huge landmass where there was constant and widespread competition.
If you'll stop reading for a moment and think of something you wouldn't want to happen to you, or to someone you love, then you'll have thought of something worth staging or filming.
Social animals have inbuilt rules which prevent them each other for food, mates, and so on. Such animals confront eachother, and sometimes fight, until a hierarchy is established, after which there is no fighting unless an attempt is being made to change the ‘pecking order'.
He became the biggest concert comedian in show business, ever.
Many of the discoveries by psychological researchers appeared to occur outside of the conscious thoughts of the people they studied.
At his peak, Martin’s tour schedule was insane. 60 cities in 63 days. 72 in 80 days. 85 cities in 90 days. 18,695 people attended one show in Ohio. 45,000 tickets sold for his show in New York.
Bubbles are capable of arising on their own and need not be preceded by crashes, whereas crashes are invariably preceded by bubbles.
Typically, genetic factors have been found to account for 20-50 percent of the variance in these personality traits.
Learning to judge whose lives could be saved, whose couldn’t be, and whose shouldn’t be requires an unattainable prognostic ability. I made mistakes. Rushing a patient to the OR to save only enough brain that his heart beats but he can never speak, he eats through a tube, and he is condemned to an existence he would never want… I came to see this as a more egregious failure than the patient dying.
There is a right time to argue that things will be better, and that’s when the market is on its backside and everyone else is selling things at giveaway prices.
Every religion should preach morality, not theology.
Your first idea is just one of an infinite number of options. Make plans for many different scenarios. There is no one path to success.
Perseverance is a great substitute for talent.
Do not be overconcerned with avoiding pain or seeking pleasure. If you are concentrating on the results of your actions, you are not dedicated to your task.
Locations along the same east-west axis share similar latitudes and thus have similar day lengths, seasons, climate, rainfalls, and biomes. All of which increase the speed of innovation relative to north-south axes.
Dark glasses raise status because we can't see the submission of the eyes.
Even when bad luck or random events strike there is always something you can do to be better prepared next time.
This has also been shown via evolutionary psychology: when you perform well in life, you get all “puffed up” in the way you carry yourself, the bounce in your step, etc. From an evolution standpoint this is great because it becomes easier to spot the most successful / desirable mate.
“We might call this the Language Squishing Hypothesis because it suggests that an impoverished experiential background causes language to be squished, as it were, so that the full range of verbal labels actually represents a very restricted range of experiences.” The danger of this theory is that we all have different experiences and that means nobody actually knows what happiness really is.
The area with the biggest amount of inventory is usually a sign of a bottleneck.
Most people who work indoors are deficient in Vitamin D.
Grace is the ability to accept change. Be open and supple; the brittle break.
If you love yourself truly and deeply, you’ll commit to the practice. You won’t get lazy when things are going well.
The more you try to become certain about a particular issue, the more uncertain and insecure you will feel.
Blockbuster Profit: Have a huge product launch. Think movies, books, and pharmaceutical product launches.
The 10X Rule is based on understanding the level of effort and the level of thinking required to succeed.
nonrecurring gains can boost earnings to unsustainable levels, and should be ignored by investors.
The stages I try to take students through involve the realisation (1) that we struggle against our imaginations, especially when we try to be imaginative; (2) that we are not responsible for the content of our imaginations; and (3) that we are not, as we are taught to think, our ‘personalities', but that the imagination is our true self.
Unclutter your life. If you're 90 percent sure you won't use it in the next 6-12 months, give it away.
Martin did stand up for 18 years. In his words, “10 years spent learning, 4 years spent refining, and 4 years spent in wild success.”
The cautious seldom err or write great poetry.
The Jewish physicist, Albert Einstein, centered light as the single constancy of the universe with his special relativity theory. Rather than time being the absolute and unchanging force as previous theorists assumed, Einstein rendered light-speed constancy as the unchanging backdrop to his theories. Light is the framework of the universe and the fundamental reality.
When getting feedback of any type, positive or negative, accept it from a neutral place and say, “Thank you.” If you don't reply with a judgmental comment, you can't get into an argument.
Quite often “high-quality” companies sell for high prices, making them poor investments.
Dean Ornish study found it was easier for people to ditch lots of bad habits at the same time.
Scientists can now study the day to day experiences of individuals often in minimally invasive ways. (Fitbit, etc.)
We are more blind than we think.
There may not be any situations in life where the nonconscious mind does not impact our behavior. If that is true, however, it is very hard to know it because our nonconscious mind is inaccessible to us directly.
“Maybe the single best thing about having money is that it makes money seem a great deal less important.”
There are two correlations that show up often enough that we can say they are true (although they may not be particularly strong). First, parents who do a good job of managing their lives and dealing with problems generally have children who do the same. Second, child who are shown love and affection are likely to grow up with cordial, well-adjusted relationships.
If you were really legit, people would come to you.  Stop driving and flying to everyone. Step up your game.
Because the brain mediates our experience of the world, any neurosurgical problem forces a patient and family, ideally with a doctor as a guide, to answer this question: What makes life meaningful enough to go on living?
The distinction between personality and the social environment is artificial because people’s personality often determines how they construe their environment.
“This is not a dress rehearsal. Today is the only guarantee you get.”
To move fast is to have all the time in world.
The system we live in is far too complex for any one person to understand. Even developing expertise in a particular area isn't as useful as you would expect because of the interrelatedness of things with my areas you know nothing about.
Judging your work is wasted energy that can't go into the work.
The man who believes he knows everything learns nothing.
Normally, men are judged by their ability to produce. Except in war, when they are ranked based on their ability to destroy.
Commit to doing a relationship review each weekend. Cover what went well in your marriage that week. Rank your relationship on a scale of 1-10 over the last week and then ask what could get it to a 10.
Idea: this is a disturbing thought, but once culture and shared thought evolved, we suddenly developed the capacity to perform large swathes of “natural selection” on those who disagree with us. Imagine a revolt within a country where one group commits genocide on another group. These mass killings are largely ideological. In a sense, we could say that these killings are a form of “survival of the fittest”, but in this case it is the ideas that the ruling group deems fit rather than physical fitness. Suddenly, ideology becomes a form of natural selection and because we are the ones with the ideas, we are now the force that selects them. If you take this line of thinking far enough, you get to some dangerous territory. Who decides which ideas are fit?
You are what you are because of your past.
Some men learn all they know from books; others from life; both kinds are narrow.
Everyone says that having children is a wonderful and joyous experience. When you actually measure happiness of parents, however, you see that it is not raised at all. We continue to perpetuate that children bring happiness belief because it is a “super replicator.” That is, people who believe kids are great tend to have them (and pass on that belief) and people who believe the opposite tend to avoid having kids.
Plan for variances in habits ahead of time. “I won't follow my normal workout routine when I go on my trip to Europe. So I will do 20 push-ups per day while I'm there and then return immediately to my previous workout routine once I get home.”
Doing something occasionally or whenever you feel like it is an inconsistent hobby. Doing it on a predictable schedule is a habit.
Competition used to be among individuals. Then it was enlarged and it was among families. Then it was enlarged and it was among communities. And so on.
This reinforces a key lesson in this book: you need to know what your demand curve looks like, the more precisely, the better.
When you make a business, you get to make a little universe where you create all the laws.
But when you find that you’ve hired the wrong man, you can’t get rid of him too quick. Pay him an extra month, but don’t let him stay another day.
The market fumbles its way to success. The good ideas take off and less successful ones die out. It's like evolution for economics.
The best revenge against your critics is massive success.
It’s truly bizarre when you think about it that we will devote ourselves fully to developing our tennis game, but leave something like our relationships largely to chance.
Protect yourself with insurance. You cannot afford to be unprotected.
Society is not founded on the ideals of humankind, but on the nature of humankind. We are a product of the forces and instincts that drive us.
Another option: throw an event for speakers (if you’re speaking at an event yourself)
Be with the way things are. We have to distinguish our thoughts and feelings about the events from how the events actually are. We often let our feelings about how things should be prevent us from being with the moment and taking appropriate action. We get so wrapped up in things not being as we wish they would that we prevent ourselves from moving forward.
We should expect people to forget and procrastinate often. Non-adherence is accidental, not deliberate. It’s just a result of our brain being wired for inattentiveness.
Worrying is the one game in which, if you guess right, you don’t get any satisfaction out of your smartness. A busy man has no time to bother with it.
Do not take advice on finance from a brick layer. Go to people who are experts in a particular subject if you want expert advice. It’s too easy for amateurs to give out advice.
No man can ask more than he gives. A fellow who can’t take orders can’t give them.
Behavior-based commitments (e.g. “workout 3 days per week”) work better than outcome-based commitments (e.g. “lose 20 pounds”) because it is too easy to make exceptions in the moment when the outcome is in the future. Meanwhile, the behavior is also in the moment, so sticking to your behavior is a choice for the here and now. Of course, the outcome are often a natural consequence of the behavior as well.
If you get a $1,000 deposit, I am telling you, starting today, transfer $10 into your PROFIT account. If you could run your business off $1,000, you can surely run it off $990. If you get $20,000 in deposits, you transfer $200 into your PROFIT account. If you can run your business off $20,000 you absolutely can run it off $19,800. You’ll never miss that 1 percent. It is a low bar. But something magical will happen. You will start proving the system to yourself. You won’t get rich overnight this way, but you will get a wealth of confidence.
Withholding information is a problem for me when I don't communicate well. If you don't communicate what is going on it feels like you're keeping people in the dark. That annoys people.
Professional athletes are particularly big trackers.
Ruminating over negative events in a repetitive way is not healthy and beneficial. However, thinking through your issues and constructing a meaningful and coherent narrative about these events is an effective way to deal with issues. Even if the narrative is not 100 percent accurate it can have a beneficial effect.
Common mistake 4: underestimating the amount of adversity they will have to overcome.
Politicians make all these promises, but your success (or your children's success) is not dependent on politics. Whether one person gets voted in or not does not determine if you will win. As long as the system provides the opportunity to succeed, no one individual, politics, or president will dictate your success – except you.
The main reason babies become smart adult is not because their parents read to them or hang fancy mobiles above their head (if so, our ancient ancestors would never become intelligent). It is because smart babies come from smart parents and thus have smart genes.
Manson’s Law of Avoidance: The more something threatens your identity, the more you will avoid it. The more something threatens how you view yourself, the more you will avoid getting around to doing it.
Smart people know what to do. They need to know what to stop.
This is a practice. You don’t go to the gym once and consider yourself done. Loving yourself is a practice.
One thing he had learned in his long life was that if he understood something, things were just as they were, and if he did not understand something, things were still simply just as they were.
“People are sensitive to relative rather than absolute values.”
It's possible regular folks have latent creative talent waiting to be unleashed but it is being held back by inhibition from other brain areas (which is normal) and only arises when those inhibitors are damaged.
Most people hide behind pillars. Pillars are fancy equipment, stuff not required to just do the work.
Japanese perfect plate story. “Why would I need someone to make sure I do my job correctly?”
You must not think a man has lived long because he has white hair and wrinkles: he has not lived long, just existed long.
People insist on categorizing and selecting. We are always choosing the best, the top, the most, the biggest, the smallest. Is this necessary?
For most of us, reactionary actions take up way more of our day than tasks we initiate. But most of the meaning we derive is from task we initiate, not reactions we fall into based on what others need.
Never reduce a target. Do not explain away failure. Always increase your actions.
Everything worthwhile in life is won through surmounting the associated negative experience.
Very young children may have a nonconscious mind that drives their behaviors earlier in life than their conscious mind.
We underestimate how much time, discipline, and stamina play a part in our success.
Busts are the product of booms, and I’m convinced it’s usually more correct to attribute a bust to the excesses of the preceding boom than to the specific event that sets off the correction.
Courage is our ability and willingness to overcome our fear.
True happiness occurs only when you find the problems you enjoy having and enjoy solving. Happiness is wanting the problems you have and wanting to solve them.
We are not given a short life but we make it short, and we are not ill-supplied but wasteful of it. Just as when ample and princely wealth falls to a bad owner it is squandered in a moment, but wealth however modest, if entrusted to a good custodian, increases with use, so our lifetime extends amply if you manage it properly.
“We tend to remember the best of times and the worst of times not the most likely of times.”
Surcharges are an appropriate way to take advantage of higher willingness to pay in peak periods. A passenger railroad could introduce surcharges for travel on Friday afternoons or on Sunday evenings. These surcharges would have two effects: they would increase the company’s profits and also damp demand, which lowers the chances that trains will be overbooked or overfilled in those peak travel times. Price cuts in off-peak periods often have little effect, but price increases in peak periods can have a significant effect. We see these kinds of asymmetries in time-based price differentiation in a number of industries.
Taking massive actions is the only way to fulfill your true potential.
For any change to happen in your life, you must accept that you were wrong about something you were doing before.
There is little evidence supporting the idea that women are more irritable during their menstrual cycle.
When people are describing their own personalities, they are often reporting their theories and constructions, which may or may not correspond to their nonconscious dispositions and motives.
Meaningful moments exist forever in our minds—memories are timeless. We get to relive them again and again.
Gillette practices premium pricing of the best kind: creating value through innovation, communicating that value, and then extracting it with premium price
Create an exit survey for non-buyers. (Anyone who leaves sales page?)
On his principle that people shouldn’t have to work: “A mother generally gives and never takes from her child except affection. In the family there is more giving than taking. But when you go beyond the concept of the family, you find the need for equivalences. If you give me a flower, I give you a flower. That is an equivalent. Why? If you want to give, you give. If you want to take, you take. But society won’t let you, because society is based on that exchange called money, or barter.”
In life, status gaps are often exaggerated to such an extent that they become comical. Heinrich Harrer met a Tibetan whose servant stood holding a spitoon in case the master wanted to spit. Queen Victoria would take her position and sit, and there had to be a chair. George the Sixth used to wear electrically heated underclothes when deerstalking, which meant a gillie had to follow him around holding the battery.
To move in one direction, you must forgo all others. To pursue one goal is to forsake a very large number of other possible goals.
Certainly the markets, and investor attitudes and behavior, spend only a small portion of the time at “the happy medium.”
“We’re all going to die, all of us. What a circus! That alone should make us love each other, but it doesn’t.” -Charles Bukowski
Writing reveals itself through writing. As you write, you uncover the hidden gems inside you that you didn't even know were there. Words come to you, characters reveals themselves, and dialogue forms that shows who these people are. It pretty much always works this way: you have to write to figure out what you're writing about.
The herd applies optimism at the top and pessimism at the bottom. Thus, to benefit, we must be skeptical of the optimism that thrives at the top, and skeptical of the pessimism that prevails at the bottom.
Before setting your sights on a goal make sure that said goal is within your power — that is, that it is something you actually have control over — and if it is not within your power, do not let it concern you.
“Anyone can fall in love. Falling in love is easy. Staying in love takes real work.”
Sivers was a professional musician before he started his business. It all started because he wanted to sell his own CD on his website. Pretty soon he was selling CDs for lots of musicians and CD Baby was born.
Every generation rebels against the preceding one. In many ways, it is natural and desirable.
The really important kind of freedom involves attention, and awareness, and discipline, and effort, and being able truly to care about other people and to sacrifice for them, over and over, in myriad petty little unsexy ways, every day. That is real freedom. That is being taught how to think. The alternative is unconsciousness, the default setting, the “rat race” — the constant, gnawing sense of having had and lost some infinite thing.
The most motivating choices are ones that align with your “why” and your purpose.
A human being is the kind of machine that wears out from lack of use. There are limits, but for the most part we gain energy by using energy.
Johnstone’s work has been to rediscover the imaginative response in adults and to rekindle the power of children’s creativity.
My feeling is that sanity is actually a pretence, a way we learn to behave. We keep this pretence up because we don't want to be rejected by other people—and being classified insane is to be shut out of the group in a very complete way.
Watches manufactured in Switzerland represent just 2 % of the world’s annual watch production. Yet on the back of this tiny volume, the Swiss watches altogether account for an incredible 53 % of the global watch market on a value basis.36 The difference between their volume-based market share (2 %) and their value-based market share (53 %) is dramatic.
On writing fluently: inspiration isn’t intellectual and you don’t have to be perfect. When you write and write and write and edit and edit and edit, you become so constrained that you lose flow.
Effective fencing requires adequate gaps in value across the price categories.
History is the most reliable path to understanding the present and anticipating the problems of the future.
Price is the only marketing instrument you can employ with no upfront investment. This makes it an especially powerful marketing tool for small business or start-ups with tight financial resources.
Randomness means there are some strategies that work well for any given cycle (an extreme fad diet), but these cycles are often short to medium term successes. More importantly, the strategies that work for a given cycle in the short term may not be the best for long run. They are sub optimal strategies winning over a randomly beneficial short term cycle. The same can said for setting huge goals, following a fad diet, chasing an extreme training protocol, and so on. Unsustainable and suboptimal for the long term. In this way, evolutionary traits that are undesirable can survive for a period of time in any given population. That is, suboptimal strategies and traits can seem desirable in the short run even though they will be resoundingly defeated in the long run.
Babylon was the wealthiest city in the world at the time of its height because its people appreciated the value of money.
There is always a bottleneck in every process. You have to manage the process based on the bottleneck.
All he ever needed was a few hundred for a starter, and to get that he’d decide to let me in on the ground floor. I want to say right here that whenever any one offers to let you in on the ground floor it’s a pretty safe rule to take the elevator to the roof garden.
Whoa! Chapter 40 is an ancient shout out to female empowerment and equality. “It is worthwhile to let [women] know that they are valued by men.”
Hell yeah or no. If it's not a hell yes, then decline. Say yes to less.
JOEL GREENBLATT: This is one of the hardest things to master for professional investors: coming in each day for work and doing nothing.
The goal of democracy is not to make every man equal, but to make his access to opportunity more equal. The ideal is not to raise every man to power, but to give him access to each point of entry where his fitness and skill can be tested. In other words, the hope of democracy is to offer a level playing field to start and to let your talents carry you where they may.
Quicker you let go of old cheese, the sooner you find new cheese.
Study of hospital workers by Raznoski found that people who made connections with patients and coworkers found more meaning in their work.
Idea: The trend is clear: our technology is allowing us to overpower our natural world. Imagine a time when we can control earthquakes or hurricanes or tornados. Or, when we went to the moon we figured out how to survive outside of the earth’s atmosphere. We somehow learned to transcend the boundaries of oxygen and spread our species to new places.
Life is divided into three periods, past, present and future. Of these, the present is short, the future is doubtful, the past is certain.
You can’t merely be in love with the result. Everybody loves the result. You have to love the process.
Writing systems are historically seen as the deciding factor on whether an ancients civilization is considered advanced or not. This can be debated. The Incas built a great civilization without writing.
“Personality is the psychological processes that determine a person's characteristic behavior and thought.” -Gordon Allport
It makes little sense to talk about humans having one “self” when the conscious self and the nonconscious self have stable ways of responding to situations (which often differ significantly).
Those who don’t believe in magic will never find it.” —Roald Dahl
Most people are driven by greed, fear, envy and other emotions that render objectivity impossible and open the door for significant mistakes.
The capacity to bring old elements into new combinations depends largely on the ability to see relationships.
Example of cultural evolution: the Moari of New Zealand were able to determine the most useful rocks and animals for domestication within a century of arriving.
If you want to grow, you have to expose yourself to high-quality influences.
“My act was becoming simultaneously smart and stupid.”
Progress is real. Man influences his control over the environment as time goes on and technology increases.
“How can we make sense of our lives and hold people accountable for their choices given the unconscious origins of our conscious minds?”
“They only think they’re happy because they don’t know what they are missing.” That’s actually the point. Not knowing what we are missing is the very thing that allows us to be happy despite not having some other opportunity.
The human brain prefers to focus on things that are either painful or pleasurable.
“We do not have the freedom we think we have… Either our wills are determined by prior causes and we are not responsible for them. Or they are the product of chance and we are not responsible for them.”
“An army may march great distances without distress if it marches through country where the enemy is not.”
It wasn't until college that Martin realized he needed to come up with entirely original content.
His agent told Martin to “stick to writing” because his performance was not going to work.
“Everything we experience in this world goes through one filter — our minds — and we spend very little time bothering to see how it works.”
The fallacy of adding too much value is that by adding value you kill the ownership of other peoples ideas. When you add to the idea it no longer feels like it is their idea.
Better be cheated in the price than in the quality of goods.
We could not have a conscious mind without a nonconscious one. We need all of the nonconscious processes (like proprioception) to function properly. Just like a computer screen needs the hardware and software for any image to appear.
The largest hurdle in freemium models is getting customers over this initial price barrier, or getting them to cross the “penny gap
Develop a “go to” restaurant on a regular basis.
His three rules for finding a job: 1) I would only work for someone I thought to be wildly smart. 2) I would only work for the head of the company. 3) I would only work in an up-and-coming industry.
If the desire to make money causes you to buy even though price is too high, in the hope that the asset will continue appreciating or the tactic will keep working, you’re setting yourself up for disappointment.
In one test, study participants received a pain reliever at different prices. One group saw a tag with a high price, and the other group saw a low price. Without exception, the participants in the high-price group claimed that the pain reliever was very effective. In the low-price group, only half of the participants made that claim. In both cases, however, the pain reliever was actually a vitamin C placebo, which has no objective ability to relieve pain.
The next thing to ensure is that we do not waste our energies pointlessly or in pointless activities: that is, not to long either for what we cannot achieve, or for what, once gained, only makes us realize too late and after much exertion the futility of our desires.
“Friends! I’m traveling to San Diego for the week. Who should I connect with while I’m in town?” (This is a great way to get intros.)
Ensure a future income. Every person gets old. Make sure your income will continue without work.
when the securities in a portfolio frequently turn into cash, the investor is constantly challenged to put that cash to work, seeking out the best values available.
On how things live on in our minds even after they are physically gone: “More and more, the universe looks like a great thought rather than a great machine.” -Sir James Jeans
“Illness has always been a temporary setback… Nothing prepares us for that one illness that doesn't go away.”
Set your goals 10X bigger than you think they should be.
The first step toward change is awareness. The best way to become aware is to measure. Writing it all down is key.
One of the most pervasive narratives about masculinity in our culture is that the most valuable thing a man can attain is sex and it’s worth sacrificing nearly anything to get it. (Interestingly, this corresponds to one of the dominant female narratives, which is that the greatest thing a woman can be is beautiful.)
Value investors, by contrast, are absolute-performance oriented; they are interested in returns only insofar as they relate to the achievement of their own investment goals, not how they compare with the way the overall market or other investors are faring.
If cancer beats you it is “such a hollow and inglorious triumph. Because the moment I die, the tumor starts to die as well. The cancer will have killed itself as well as me.”
The price a customer is willing to pay, and therefore the price a company can achieve, is always a reflection of the perceived value of the product or service in the customer’s eyes.
Yet when Diogenes was told that his only slave had run away, he did not think it worth the trouble to get him back. ‘It would be degrading,’ he said, ‘if Manes can live without Diogenes and not Diogenes without Manes.’
Extraordinary performance comes only from correct nonconsensus forecasts, but nonconsensus forecasts are hard to make, hard to make correctly and hard to act on.
Work attracts friends who admire your industriousness. Work attracts money and opportunity. “Hard work is the best friend I've ever had.”
The hero is just the product of a situation. Not the other way around. If it were not for the situation, we never would have heard of the hero.
There are many people who hurt, physically or emotionally, on a daily basis. For them, normal tasks require monumental effort. Remember this and be compassionate and patient.
Evolution produces ongoing “works for now” solutions and then builds upon those ideas.
How we judge an experience depends on three factors. First, how we group experiences for comparison (all restaurants vs. Greek restaurants). Second, how recently we experienced something (eating an incredible restaurant last week vs. last year). Third, how much we have experienced something (100 Greek restaurants vs. two).
“History is philosophy teaching by examples.” -Henry St. John
If there is any sure route to success and fulfillment in life, it is to be found in the long-term, essentially goalless process of mastery.
Reason cannot be the dominant aspect of any age because it is just an instrument. Reason and rationality are tools for thinking, but there are many other useful approaches that involve reason like sentiment.
Martin toured for five straight years with sold out venues. “Then, I saw something in the back I hadn’t seen in years. Empty seats.”
Create a list of people you should give recognition to and then review that list each week to see if you should send someone praise.
Seek pleasure and you will quickly discover the shortest path to suffering.
4) Why are humans so good at reading one another’s intentions? Why can we develop theories of others minds? Why do humans have better neural circuits for this than any other animal?
The solution is profoundly simple: Take your profit first.
On the value of reading and writing philosophy: This is the only way to prolong mortality – even to convert it to immortality. Honours, monuments, whatever the ambitious have ordered by decrees or raised in public buildings are soon destroyed: there is nothing that the passage of time does not demolish and remove. But it cannot damage the works which philosophy has consecrated: no age will wipe them out, no age diminish them. The next and every following age will only increase the veneration for them, since envy operates on what is at hand, but we can more openly admire things from a distance. So the life of the philosopher extends widely: he is not confined by the same boundary as are others.
“This business of journalism is just about entertainment, particularly when it comes to radio and television.”
Subtlety #3: Whether you realize it or not, you are always choosing what to give a fuck about. The key is to gradually prune the things you care about, so that you only give a fuck on the most important of occasions.
Set targets that are 10X the goals you would ever dream of.
Pattern: Inhale > Think “I love myself” > Exhale > Let out whatever thoughts you have.
Your personality is not fixed and improvement does not require you to become a radically different person. You don't have to change your whole life, just improve one tiny trait.
Lacking solutions, I had to find my own.
George Stigler, who won the Nobel Prize in economics in 1982, claims that price leadership is the best solution for companies in a highly competitive oligopoly
Most people never get close to being overexposed. Nearly everyone is hindered by obscurity.
It is extremely difficult to stay alert and attentive instead of getting hypnotized by the constant monologue inside your head.
My feeling is that a good teacher can get results using any method, and that a bad teacher can wreck any method.
Content lies in the structure, in what happens, not in what the characters say.
The intent-behavior gap: marketers, leaders, and designers often INFER what the user wants based on actual behaviors. In fact, most people aren’t paying close attention and so their actions are rarely an indication of their optimal preferences. Their is a gap between what they truly intend and what they actually do.
It is impossible for us to know the causes of our choices and wants.
Three questions to ask when analyzing any human trait. 1) What is the internal logical structure of the trait you are looking at? 2) Why does the particular trait have the structure it does? What did it evolve for? 3) How is this trait mediated by the neural machinery in the brain?
Can we become comfortable with the most uncomfortable thing in the world—death? If the weight of mortality does not grow lighter, does it at least grow more familiar?
One of the downfalls of the “follow your passion” advice is that it assumes that putting your own passion and happiness at the center of your world is what leads to meaning, fulfillment and joy. That is often not the case.
When we were children, time slowed down. Time meant something; or more likely, we were oblivious to linear time. Ignorance of time literally was bliss.
In business, some people can make a lot of money in a short amount of time (corporate raiders, finance whiz kids, tech startups), but often there is very little value created for others or the national economy. The individual gets rich, but the world doesn’t get much better. Is this really a better path than the one of the craftsman? Someone who slowly and methodically improves, contributes something useful and valuable to society, and makes enough money in the process (despite not getting rich)?
Action isn’t just the effect of motivation; it’s also the cause of it. Do something and inspiration will follow.
“I don’t believe in art. I believe in the artist.”
Stop watching the news. The news just aggregates the worst, saddest, and most stressful stories every day.
If you minimize the chance of loss in an investment, most of the other alternatives are good.
Ramachandran refers to a phenomenon known as The Peak Shift Effect, which is also called supernormal stimuli by other experts. It seems like a very powerful concept to me. It essentially says that the brain learns certain rules for discriminating between things and that if you present the brain with an exaggerated version of that rule, it strongly prefers it. Tinbergen’s famous studies on herrings provide a good example. Baby herrings will peck at a red spot on their mother’s beak when they want food. If a research presents a fake beak with three red spots, then the baby herring goes berserk. This supernormal stimuli is preferred by the brain as if the baby bird is saying, “Wow! What a beak.”
The most successful path to mastery is to practice for the sake of the practice itself. Not for the result.
The hardest part of momentum is the beginning. But like pushing the merry-go-round on the playground… Once you get moving you can keep going very easily.
“You wanted to lose weight for years. Then you REALLY wanted to. What's the difference? Whatever it is, it's not a difference you brought into being.”
Making small course corrections will result in exactly zero applause.
People are motivated to see themselves through rose-colored glasses. Most of us believe we are a little more kind and smart and generous than we actually are.
The fact is that a diverse portfolio of overpriced, subordinated securities, about each of which the investor knows relatively little, is highly risky.
One Harvard study shows that gray matter grows in meditators. This is known as neuroplasticity.
Fear is a signal to do what you fear right now. Do not feed fear by waiting and letting it build.
“Everything is becoming mechanized in this life.”
“Sometimes I think that the more wealth people accumulate, the less they laugh.”
“Success is the number of experiments that can be crammed into 24 hours.”
Duchamp believed that art was more than something that appealed to the eye. He thought it should live in the mind and emanate from there more than merely basing art on what looked good.
The R.A.I.N. Technique for meditation: Recognize. Allow. Investigate. Non-identification. 1) Recognize: Acknowledge your feelings. 2) Allow: Where you lean into the pain. Let the pain be. 3) Investigate: Check out how the situation is impacting your body. Is my face hot? Is my back tight? Etc. 4) Non-identification: Realize that just because you feel pain or frustration or guilt or anger right now does not mean you are an angry or broken person. It is simply a phase happening at this moment, not your identity as a person.
In order to go farther than you ever thought possible you must both think and act at levels 10X beyond the norm.
Team players aren't very good at creating value in their own. “I don't know. What do you think?”
There are three central elements to a value-investment philosophy. First, value investing is a bottom-up strategy entailing the identification of specific undervalued investment opportunities. Second, value investing is absoluteperformance-, not relative-performance oriented. Finally, value investing is a risk-averse approach; attention is paid as much to what can go wrong (risk) as to what can go right (return).
Ramachandran loves “small science” which doesn't require big teams or lots of technology and can be repeated by almost anyone.
Meditation creates a space between feeling an impulse and acting on it.
A market downturn is the true test of an investment philosophy.
Exercise creates a twelve hour mood boost. This is a good reason to do something physical early in the morning.
Stocks and bonds go up and down in price, as do Monets and Mickey Mantle rookie cards, but there should be no confusion as to which are the true investments
The mind should not be kept continuously at the same pitch of concentration, but given amusing diversions.
To establish a desirable pattern of nonconscious motives, the best advice is to practice, practice, practice. Train yourself into the nonconscious mind you want.
Never do anything just for the money. Instead, just answer calls for help.
Idea: It makes sense to me that intelligence and bipedal walking co-evolved.
Living is the least important activity of the preoccupied man; yet there is nothing which is harder to learn.
When the author had his first child, he and his wife created a time schedule for his daughter's sleep that allowed him to spend an hour with her each morning, maintain the same work calendar. The bonus was the daughter was asleep by 7pm, which meant uninterrupted spouse time.
“If progress is real despite our whining, it is not because we are born any healthier, better, or wiser than infants were in the past, but because we are born to a richer heritage, born on a higher level of that pedestal which the accumulation of knowledge and art raises as the ground and support of our being. The heritage rises, and man rises in proportion as he receives it.” -Will Durant
You must consider whether your nature is more suited to practical activity or to quiet study and reflection, and incline in the direction your natural faculty and disposition take you.
You don't sign up for a marathon and hire a taxi to drive you to the finish line. The real point is what you want to be, not have.
Sacks created such muscular imbalances with his squatting that he tore both quadriceps tendons. Make sure you take proper care to build a strong, but balanced body.
Above all you should desire safety for your money. Better a little caution than a great regret.
I've also trained myself to make positive comments, and to be as direct as possible. I say ‘Good' instead of'That's enough'.
Duchamp graduated early and took the fastest route through his required time of military service. He was only an average student, but he believed in getting through the things you were required by society to do as quickly as possible.
Everything in life is either input or output. We are either creating something or consuming something.
A high margin results only in high profit if you achieve a sufficient gap between price and costs. That is not a trivial observation.
Example of technology wild gamble: the invention of airplanes totally redefines the world of trade and commerce. Previously, water was the primary mode of trade and it dictated which nations rose to power (those with large shorelines like Greece and Italy). Then, suddenly, airplanes shifted the power to nations with huge land masses in comparison to their coasts (USA, China, Russia).
Most processes are a series of dependent events. In any series of dependent events most people can only go as fast as the people in front of them. Because of this, your throughput is only the output of the final person / step in the process.
Repetitiveness is key for determining if you are seeing skill or randomness at play. Can't repeat it? Not skillful.
Everyone tends to use the present as a way to imagine the future and influence memories of the past. Thus, our memories and imaginations are often closer to our current reality than actual reality.
“The beacon shines on a destiny that is not always one we envision.”
Common mistake 3: spending too much time competing and not enough time dominating their sector.
I once asked a girl to close her eyes while I put a coin under one of three cups. Secredy I put a coin under each cup. When I asked her to guess which cup the coin was under, she was, of course, correct. After she'd made a correct choice about six times, she was convinced I was somehow controlling her thoughts, and moved into a rather disassociated state, so I explained, and she ‘snapped out of it'. I would suggest this as a possible means of inducing hypnosis.
The value we perceive changes as the product ages.
Investors cannot assume that good ideas will come effortlessly from scanning the recommendations of Wall Street analysts, no matter how highly regarded, or from punching up computers, no matter how cleverly programmed, although both can sometimes indicate interesting places to hunt.
“The surest gauge of the scale of a life is how many other lives it touches.”
Even at the level of geometrical signs ‘meaning' is ambiguous. A cross, a circle, and a swastika contain a ‘content' quite apart from those which we assign to them. The swastika is symmetrical but unbalanced: it's a good sign for power, it has a clawiness about it (cartoonists drew swastika spiders scrabbling over the face of Europe). The circle is stiller, is a much better sign for eternity, for completeness. The cross can stand for many things, for a meeting-place, for a crossroads, for a kiss, for a reed reflected in a lake, for a mast, for a sword—but it isn't meaningless just because the interpretations aren't one-for-one. Whatever a cross suggests to us it won't have the same associations as a circle, which makes a much better sign for a moon, for example, or for pregnancy.
Whatever we seek—we imagine the satisfaction to be far greater than it really is. Eventually life is just life again.
It can be easy to get trapped in life. “Staying on a track can kill, one easy day at a time.”
When the end of life comes, we leave with nothing but our relationships.
When there’s nothing particularly clever to do, the potential pitfall lies in insisting on being clever.
Food and animal domestication arose independently in five different areas of the world (at widely differing times) and possibly four others although there is still some contention about those.
You want to reign in your impulses and weaknesses to the point where they are useful, but not excessive.
Example of priming? One study claimed people named “Dennis” are more likely to become dentists.
To learn, we should not just give people results to memorize, but stories and plots that allow us to deduce the answers.
Three metrics that will tell you if the business is doing well: net profit, return on investment, and cash flow. All three should be increasing all the time.
You will find no one willing to share out his money; but to how many does each of us divide up his life! People are frugal in guarding their personal property; but as soon as it comes to squandering time they are most wasteful of the one thing in which it is right to be stingy.
The skill is practicing the goal, not having the goal.
I know a young fellow with the right sort of stuff in him preaches to himself harder than any one else can, and that he’s mighty often switched off the right path by having it pointed out to him in the wrong way.
A good decision is one that a logical, intelligent and informed person would have made under the circumstances as they appeared at the time, before the outcome was known.
It’s simple to say, but many people never achieve a serious measure of wealth because they never seek it. They never truly seek it, focus on it, and commit to it.
the avoidance of loss is the surest way to ensure a profitable outcome.
You can know every fact about an industry and still not be a real expert because you don’t understand the underlying principles and methods.
One way something can become automatic (nonconscious) is through lots of repetition and practice.
“We acquire virtues by first having put them into action. We become just by the practice of just actions, self-control by exercising self-control, and courageous by performing acts of courage.” -Aristotle
Not only can we study what people are thinking, we can study what goes on inside people's heads that even they can't see.
I simply approach each problem on a basis of common sense and try to find the most obvious solutions possible.
There aren’t always great things to do, and sometimes we maximize our contribution by being discerning and relatively inactive. Patient opportunism—waiting for bargains—is often your best strategy.
Duchamp took nothing for granted. He doubted everything and in the process of doubting came up with something new.
A positive correlation between risk and return would hold consistently only in an efficient market. Any disparities would be immediately corrected; this is what would make the market efficient. In inefficient markets it is possible to find investments offering high returns with low risk.
A prerequisite for optimal price differentiation is detailed knowledge about the buyers’ willingness to pay
Above all, investors must always avoid swinging at bad pitches.
Reaping the rewards of price differentiation is a “micro” task and not a “macro” one. It requires a microscopic perspective, not a rough or back-of-the-envelope calculation. Gut feeling, no matter how much experience may back it up, hits its limits on questions of price differentiation.
The more we concentrate on smaller-picture things, the more it’s possible to gain a knowledge advantage.
‘What can happen to one can happen to all.’ If you let this idea sink into your vitals, and regard all the ills of other people (of which every day shows an enormous supply) as having a clear path to you too, you will be armed long before you are attacked.
The greatest risk doesn’t come from low quality or high volatility. It comes from paying prices that are too high.
The more challenging and potentially lucrative the waters you fish in, the more likely they are to have attracted skilled fishermen.
Oprah's 2004 season opener is one of the greatest product launches and examples of going above and beyond expectations.
“Talk about things that matter with people who care.” -Jim Rohn
Individuals at different times have different levels of willingness to pay
Pricing belongs on the CEO ’s desk.
The best opportunities are usually found among things most others won’t do.
Like a dead branch falling from a tree, which then decomposes and nourishes the soil, your disappointments can transform into the elements of change and growth.
Three important questions to ask: 1) Did we sell any more products? 2) Did expenses go down? 3) Did inventory go down?
We must live and work together as brothers or perish together as fools.
Out of every 100 ideas, 99 will likely be inferior to the traditional alternative it was proposed to replace.
Idea: Will competition ever be enlarged enough to not be between humans? We would need a stunning wild gamble where another species forces us to bond together and compete against a common foe.
It is necessary instead to understand the rationale behind the rules in order to appreciate why they work when they do and don’t when they don’t.
Don't focus on being the best in the world. Focus on being the best FOR the world.
“I had never really imagined success, I was just trying to be a performer.”
I love how he describes old age as “the leisurely adventure of growing old with my wife.”
The quality of your life will, to a large extent, be decided by with whom you elect to spend your time.
“We don’t always see ourselves as superior, but we almost always see ourselves as unique.”
Of the three forms of the efficient-market hypothesis, I believe that only the weak form is valid.
Profit is ultimately the only valid metric for guiding your company. The rationale is simple: profit is the only metric which takes both the revenue side and the cost side of a business into account.
Humans are different, plain and simple. We are not “just another ape.”
Write down your most important goals.
We tend to overvalue freedom. We can easily imagine all of the benefits freedom will provide to us, but we tend to underestimate the fact that freedom hinders us from moving forward because we are constantly debating if their are better options out there. Only when we have fully committed and gone “all in” do we reach an inescapable situation where our brain can easily justify our behavior and circumstances.
This is an important insight. It means that it is not the end of the world if you don’t have the optimal price figured out down to the last decimal place. It is more important to be in the right vicinity.
The idea that a large portion of the human mind is nonconscious was Freud's greatest insight.
Missing a profitable opportunity is of less significance than investing in a loser.
The only real revolution is in the enlightenment of the mind and the improvement of character. The only real emancipation is individual. The only real revolutionists are philosophers and saints.
Interesting trend: when people and businesses cut spending and focus on saving, they almost always save their energy, effort, and creativity as well. It is as if the mindset of dialing down spending naturally dials down activity in other areas.
Run your business based on what you can afford to do today, not what you hope to be able to afford someday.
Am I weak or am I strong? Am I kind or cruel? I have been all these things! I don’t even truly understand the difference between right and wrong. Just and unjust. And what does any of it matter, since in no time at all everybody I know will be rotting in the ground feeding worms?”
“A hearty laugh is the telltale sign of good health.”
On the differences between art and science: “I don’t know why we should have such reverence for science. It’s a very nice occupation, but nothing more. It has no noblesse to it. It’s just a practical form of activity, to make better Coca-Cola and so forth. It’s always utilitarian. In other words, it hasn’t got the gratuitous attitude that art has, in any case.”
the effects of compounding even moderate returns over many years are compelling, if not downright mind boggling.
Pursue price leadership through a consistent communication campaign emphasizing the importance of price and value.
Within a few weeks even earthquake survivors tend to return to previous levels of optimism.
There are two ways our actions lead to change at the automatic, nonconscious level. The first is by providing the opportunity for our brains to infer from our behavior (nonconsciously) that we are new people. It gives your mind new data and more bits of insight about your attitudes and feelings. (Note: this is similar to your identity votes concept.) Second, the more frequently we perform a behavior, the more automatic it becomes.
When you're onto something great it won't feel like something great. It will feel like uncommon sense.
The compound effect is the operating system that has been running your life whether you know it or not.
We have two classes of forecasters: Those who don’t know—and those who don’t know they don’t know. JOHN KENNETH GALBRAITH
Books on social psychology are often better books about advertising than actual books on advertising.
Fencing is effective when the value difference between the two price categories is sufficiently large and the seller can control access. That means that the highest price category needs to offer correspondingly high value, and the value in the lowest price category is kept intentionally low.
Don't tell people how smart you are. Nobody gives a damn.
Emotions are simply biological signals designed to nudge you in the direction of beneficial change.
The faster an object travels through space, the slower its progress in time. If an object could travel at the speed of light, time would stand still.
Note: loss aversion is another vote for small habits and one percent improvements because it is only narrow misses that prompt the feeling of loss aversion.
On finding a good teacher: To see the teacher clearly, look at his students.
“People who are ‘ready' give off a different vibe from people who aren't… The minute you become ready is the minute you stop dreaming.”
When you don't feel like doing a habit, do a crappy job.
The financial crisis occurred largely because never-before-seen events collided with risky, levered structures that weren’t engineered to withstand them.
You’ll find that education’s about the only thing lying around loose in this world, and that it’s about the only thing a fellow can have as much of as he’s willing to haul away.
The biggest challenge facing pricing in the modern world is overcapacity
Our tendency to underestimate the influence of the situation is known as fundamental attribution error.
Some researchers have theorized there is a psychological immune system responsible for emotional health the same way there is a biological immune system responsible for physical health.
It’s worth noting that the assumption that something can’t happen has the potential to make it happen, since people who believe it can’t happen will engage in risky behavior and thus alter the environment.
The central idea of the book reminds me of the Robert Frost quote, “An idea is a feat of association, and the height of it is a good metaphor.”
The boy who does anything just because the other fellows do it is apt to scratch a poor man’s back all his life.
In the world of investing, … nothing is as dependable as cycles. Fundamentals, psychology, prices and returns will rise and fall, presenting opportunities to make mistakes or to profit from the mistakes of others. They are the givens.
What would I say if I was suddenly called upon to lead?
Gratitude is not a limited resource. Express your thanks more often.
The world that children share with their peers is what shapes their behavior and modifies the characteristics they were born with and, hence, determines the sort of people they will be when they grow up.
Can you say, “I’m in love” and have it simply be with yourself? Of course you can. If you love yourself, you naturally shine. You get a spring in your step and your smile comes out.
“One may know how to conquer without being able to do it.”
Goals are limited in the amount of happiness they can provide in our lives because they are finite. Once you achieve the goal, it can no longer provide happiness because the finish line has been crossed. Paradoxically, then, by choosing processes as your focus, you can increase your overall, lifelong happiness by focusing on the process and not the goal. Processes never end, which means happiness can continue indefinitely.
If history supports any religion it is probably dualism, which would explain the good things and bad things that occasionally happen through the lens of a good god and an evil god.
Merely becoming conscious of your actions begins to change them.
All of life is practice in one form or another.
“Appear weak when you are strong, and strong when you are weak.”
As a doctor, I was an object, a cause. As a patient, I was merely something to which things happened.
Sellers should choose incremental discounts whenever possible. For buyers the opposite advice applies. They should ask for full-volume discounts. In other words both buyers and sellers should focus not only on the percentage of discount they receive, but also the structure of the discount.
Acknowledge the negative and accentuate the positive.
Getting praise can be dangerous because it becomes easy to delude yourself when all you hear are positive things.
“But I ask you, those of you who are with us all day, not to stress yourselves out because of us. When you do this, it feels as if you're denying any value at all that our lives may have–and that saps the spirit we need to soldier on. The hardest ordeal for us is the idea that we are causing grief for other people. We can put up with our own hardships okay, but the thought that our lives are the source of other people's unhappiness, that's plain unbearable.”
There’s nothing in the world sicker-looking than the grin of the man who’s trying to join in heartily when the laugh’s on him, and to pretend that he likes it.
You are going to die someday. Everyone you know is going to die soon. And in your short life you only have a certain amount of fucks to give.
We often mistakenly equate nonconsciousness with inattention. The nonconscious is composed of mental processes that are inaccessible to consciousness but that influence judgments, feelings, or behavior.
One of the most enduring lessons of social psychology is that behavior change often precedes changes in attitudes and feelings. Changing our behavior to match our desired conscious perceptions of ourselves is a good way to bring about changes in the adaptive nonconscious.
The soul of a free man looks at the world as a series of problems to be solved. Meanwhile, the soul of a slave whines, “What can I do?”
Moment by moment each person adjusts his status up or down a fraction.
Do not be averted to the things not within your power — illness, death, disease, etc. — if you desire anything not within your power, the result will be unfortunate.
Those who become the greatest and go the farthest are highly selective about what they take on. They are clear on where they want to go and recognize that most of what life offers will not get them there. Almost everything in life is a non-essential distraction
The pursuit of meaning, not happiness is what makes life better.
Market excesses are ultimately punished, not rewarded.
You have to optimize the whole system, not just a local process.
When you change what you believe, you change what you do.
Trying to ascribe a numerical value to how much genes or environment impact the outcome misses the point. Both impact it and the percentage to which it impacts it can vary widely. The key is to realize they are connected and not to worry about some single numerical value. Psychologists often make this mistake – especially when discussing IQ as a single trait.
The historian always oversimplifies.
If you are doing something that you believe is right do not worry about people who will criticize it wrongly.
Those who hold eye contacts report that they feel powerful—and actually look powerful. Those who break eye contact and glance back ‘feel' feeble, and look it.
the presence of a catalyst serves to reduce risk. If the gap between price and underlying value is likely to be closed quickly, the probability of losing money due to market fluctuations or adverse business developments is reduced.
“The worst strategy of all is to besiege walled cities.”
How do you grade yourself? You should know what matters most to you.
Superior investing, as I hope I’ve convinced you by now, requires second-level thinking—a way of thinking that’s different from that of others, more complex and more insightful.
Reading about spontaneity won't make you more spontaneous, but it may at least stop you heading off in the opposite direction; and if you play the exercises with your friends in a good spirit, then soon all your thinking will be transformed.
80 percent of Google's projects will fail, but that doesn't matter. People only remember the 20 percent that succeed.
‘What can happen to one can happen to all.'
the bulk of discussion time is visibly taken up with transactions of status which have nothing to do with the problem to be solved.
It looks to me as if you were trying only half as hard as you could, and in trying it’s the second half that brings results.
The essential first step in avoiding pitfalls consists of being on the lookout for them.
Sustained profitability depends on efficiency.
We have three shortcuts that our brain uses frequently.
A good play is one which ingeniously displays and reverses the status between the characters.
By and large, the poor have the same impulses as the rich, but with less opportunity or skill to implement them.
When the highest-status person feels most secure he will be the most relaxed person.
“Everybody has a heart that can be touched by something.”
Domestication of large mammals ended approximately 4500 years ago. This indicates humans attempted to domesticate all of them and no suitable species remained. This is another piece of evidence that the type of animals available dictated the domestication in certain regions, not the people living in the region. This the spread of agriculture was once again impacted by the environment.
Most children have at least two distinct environments: the home and the world outside the home.
Research found that peer acceptance or rejection was associated with overall life status adjustment in adulthood. However, having or not having friends during grade school was not associated with life status adjustment in adulthood. Social comparison is a key part of discovering and finding yourself, regardless of what your friendships look like.
The more attention you shine on a subject, the more evidence of it you find. This is how downward spiral talk escalates into a reality.
Interesting take on who determined the value of art: “The artist produces nothing until the onlooker has said, “You have produced something marvelous.” The onlooker has the last word on it.”
The typical explanation for why our nonconscious mind developed is an evolutionary one. Those mental processes were selected for by evolutionary pressures. It's just a theory, but a good theory.
“Military tactics are like water. For water, in its natural course, runs away from high places and hastens downwards. So, in war, the way is to avoid what is strong and strike at what is weak.”
We can see from these comparative graphs that one uniform price —even when set optimally—exhausts only part of the available profit potential in the market.
For every business that cannot be valued, there are many others that can. Investors who confine themselves to what they know, as difficult as that may be, have a considerable advantage over everyone else.
The trick is to keep truth up front in daily consciousness.
Mirror neurons are hyper developed in humans compared to animals. This allowed humans to learn new skills within just one or two generations as opposed to the hundreds or thousands of generations required for genetic evolution. Cultural evolution operates at light speed compared to genetic evolution.
Idea: there are three worlds. The first world is the external world. The second world was born when thoughts became possible and consciousness emerged. The third world emerged when our lives became digital. We can now live in a world where we are not physically there and it is not in our thoughts, but it exists.
Two of the most powerful intangible benefits we willingly pay for every day are convenience and peace of mind.
Evolution works with what it has.
If your idea is good, people will tell you how to improve it. Listen to them. Don’t hold the initial version too close to your chest.
Tact is the knack of keeping quiet at the right time; of being so agreeable yourself that no one can be disagreeable to you; of making inferiority feel like equality. A tactful man can pull the stinger from a bee without getting stung.
Research has revealed five key traits that are fundamental to all people: extroversion, emotional stability, agreeableness, conscientiousness, and openness to experience. These traits are viewed as the fundamental building blocks of personality that everyone possesses to some degree.
Markets exist because of differences of opinion among investors.
Reason 3: ease of intercontinental diffusion. It was easy for ideas, technologies, and innovations to spread between Europe, Asia, and Africa. However, it was quite difficult for things to spread to the Americas because of large oceans and the only close landmass being in cold climates and at high latitudes unsuitable for farming.
People maintain prejudices quite effortlessly.
You can do just about anything if you break down the task into habits.
Generally speaking, behavior is the “rate limiter” in our lives. We can usually get information, access, technology, and resources fast enough these days. But doing the right thing with all the resources at our disposal is a much harder task.
When you break a bone, you don't blame it on the leg or the arm. It is a problem of the entire body. What if we acted that way in society? Instead of blaming groups for violence or terrorism, we see it as a problem for all of society, something we all have a responsibility to solve.
“Pleasure is a false god. Research shows that people who focus their energy on superficial pleasures end up more anxious, more emotionally unstable, and more depressed. Pleasure is the most superficial form of life satisfaction and therefore the easiest to obtain and the easiest to lose.”
You are not fragile. Engage.
The standard way of expressing a price—for example $16.70—causes a pronounced response in the brain’s pain center. The response is weaker, however, when the respondent only sees 16.70 and the dollar sign is omitted. Apparently the brain does not immediately perceive that number to be a price. The activation of the pain center is even weaker for a round number, such as 17.
The raw materials for the process consist of (a) a list of potential investments, (b) estimates of their intrinsic value, (c) a sense for how their prices compare with their intrinsic value, and (d) an understanding of the risks involved in each, and of the effect their inclusion would have on the portfolio being assembled.
A man’s as good as he makes himself, but no man’s any good because his grandfather was.
The biggest of questions is not about life after death. The capital-T Truth is about life before death. It is about making it to thirty, or maybe even fifty, without wanting to shoot yourself in the head.
Randomness alone can produce just about any outcome in the short run.
Fredrickson's research found that 70% of people had higher happiness levels vs meaningfulness levels. These people displayed a similar genetic markers as those in stressful and adverse situations.
The only thing you have that nobody else has is control of your life. You job, your day, your heart, your spirit. You are the only one in control of that.
On average, farming sustains populations that are 10x to 100x larger than hunting and gathering.
Research by Joachim Brunstein and Oliver Schultheiss has shown the importance of having conscious and nonconscious motives in sync. People who had more alignment between their conscious and nonconscious goals had greater well-being and satisfaction than those who did not.
“The pursuit of happiness is built into the very definition of desire.”
You could live more life in one congruent day than many people live their entire lives.
The improviser has to be like a man walking backwards. He sees where he has been, but he pays no attention to the future.
If a moment is remembered, no matter how quickly it passed, that moment lasts forever.
For example, assuming Tim and I had the same goal, if Tim could accomplish this goal in one day (like make a successful multi-million dollar investment) the same would likely take me 10 or more years. Tim is moving over 3,650 times faster than me. Thus, time has dilated 3,650 times for Tim. While he can now set grander and greater goals, I continue plugging along. One day to Tim is 3,650 days to me.
Pay attention: what you need to know is usually in front of you. There are no secrets, just things people choose not to notice.
Most work days consist of small wins and tiny actions, not large external bonuses or rewards. You need meaning to drive you forward on most days.
Profit isn’t even something that waits until tomorrow. Profit must happen now and always. Profit must be baked into your business. Every day, every transaction, every moment. Profit is not an event. Profit is a habit.
“Get a life in which you are generous.”
Cultures are not passed on from parents to children. We know this because children of immigrant parents adopt the culture of their peers. This means neither the parent’s child rearing methods nor the imitation of the parents by the child are dominant factors in passing on culture.
In the fetus there is a massive over connection of neurons and then they are gradually pruned down to strengthen and prioritize certain connections.
An investor who earns 16 percent annual returns over a decade, for example, will, perhaps surprisingly, end up with more money than an investor who earns 20 percent a year for nine years and then loses 15 percent the tenth year.
The author ran an implementation intentions study at Express Scripts to increase participation at the annual walk. People who pledged to walk were 3 times more likely to show up vs. those just saying they would walk.
You will either work to accomplish your goals and dreams or you'll be used to accomplish someone else's goals and dreams.
“Certainty is something that is likely to take place across the highest number of different alternative histories. Uncertainty concerns events that should take place in the lowest number of them.”
After a while a pattern is established in which each performance gets better and better until the audience is like a great beast rolling over to let you tickle it. Then hubris gets you, you lose your humility, you expect to be loved, and you turn into Sisyphus.
Design the life you want first and the business you want second. Most people choose a career before thinking about what kind of life they want to build. (Note: great idea. Even better idea might be to test lifestyles. Try one project in various “lives” and see which you enjoy most. Write a book (author), show a photo project in a gallery (photographer), etc.)
“Ponder and deliberate before you make a move.”
Introduce the group via email afterward. Also, include a resource list in the follow up email based on what people bring up in conversation at the dinner.
Ordinary effort, ordinary result.
Practical enlightenment is the act of becoming comfortable with the idea that some suffering is always inevitable.
He knew his business. And when a fellow knows his business, he doesn’t have to explain to people that he does. It isn’t what a man knows, but what he thinks he knows that he brags about. Big talk means little knowledge.
Blindsight is an example of how your conscious mind is tied to your visual cortex, yet a lot of other information you are taking in can be processed nonconsciously.
Stop lying and justifying hard choices by saying things like, “It's not fair for everyone to avoid sweets just because I don't want to eat sweets.”
The better a knight prepares, the less willing he will be to surrender.
The fertile inherit the earth. The birth rate may determine the fate of belief systems because the more people believe an idea and the more people are trained in an idea (usually the kids of believers), the more that idea will take hold. This has happened with religion throughout a lot of history, but perhaps now it is happening with science.
Instead of reading loads of self-help books, we should just focus on one thing. Put all our energy toward that. And place a bet on one thing. For the author, that one thing is “I love myself.”
The nurture assumption is that, aside from their genes, what influences the way children develop is the way their parents bring them up. In other words, we assume parents are the whole environment, when in reality the environment includes much more.
“A person who has not made peace with his losses is likely to accept gambles that would be unacceptable to him otherwise.” -Kahneman and Tversky
There are (were?) a famous group of pirates in Indonesia known as the Bugi. They so terrorized early European sailors that the sailors came home and told their children, “Behave yourselves or the Bugimen will get you.” Crazy origin of the phrase.
Nearly everyone lives in The Measurement World without realizing it. Everything we do is based on measurement in our lives. How much money we make. Whether our team wins. How beautiful our spouse is. Everything is based around some form of measurement.
“Which would you rather have? Money or a faithful and modest friend?”
“Do what is right, let the consequence follow.”
Whenever you hear something, you should reverse it and see if the opposite is also true. Never believe something merely because it is convenient.
Even if you know about randomness and cognitive biases, you are still just as likely to fall victim to them.
Simply writing about traumatic events — especially if you explain the event itself — people show increased psychological and physiological well being including increased viral antibodies.
One thing is certain, life rewards those who act—the hustlers; not the wishers.
Tragedy also works on the see-saw principle: its subject is the ousting of a high-status animal from the pack.
As we practice things, even though it feels like we are making no progress at all, we are turning new behaviors into habits. Learning is happening all along.
High quality assets can be risky, and low quality assets can be safe.
“Every man believes that he is quite different.”
When prices are high, it’s inescapable that prospective returns are low (and risks are high).
“Money needed to be worked for but not fretted over. It would appear when required. In the meantime, better to climb trees and build snowmen. In other words, to live.”
Advances in technology are a great example of time dilation. Due to the rapid progress of technology, humanity is able to progress hundreds to thousands of times faster than we used to.
A huge percentage of the stuff that I tend to be automatically certain of is, it turns out, totally wrong and deluded.
We should also make ourselves flexible, so that we do not pin our hopes too much on our set plans, and can move over to those things to which chance has brought us, without dreading a change in either our purpose or our condition,
Subtlety #1: Not giving a fuck is not about being indifferent. It just means you’re comfortable with being different. Don’t say fuck it to everything in life, just to the unimportant things.
Mirror neurons have multiple functions. They allow you to predict another person's intentions. They allow you to adopt someone else's point of view and to see yourself as others see you (self-awareness). They allow you to transform a map in one dimension into a map in another dimension (ex. visual to auditory).
There is some evidence that happiness is a heritable trait. Monozygotic twins have similar levels of happiness even when raised in separate families.
The conflict between the desire to be accurate and the need to feel good about ourselves is one of the major battlegrounds of the self.
avoiding loss should be the primary goal of every investor.
I agree with Martin that it is not your job to judge the success of your own work: “I do not know if my act holds up all these years later. It is not for me to decide or even think about.”
Economic history is the slow heartbeat of the social organism. No matter who is in power, the gains gradually accrue to the most clever and talented. Then, eventually, there is some fracturing of the order, a new minority rises to power, and the pattern repeats itself.
Incremental changes do not always lead to incremental results. Sometimes there is a “phase transition” like heating a block of ice from 31 degrees to 32 degrees.
Always trust, but verify whenever you delegate a role.
Cultures are not passed on by all of the adults in a society. We know this because cases where children are of a different culture than the adults (for example, deaf children) take on the culture of their peers and not the culture of the adults. Thus, the society-wide adult culture is not a dominant factor in passing on culture.
The most important argument for the existence of odd prices is that customers perceive the digits in a price with decreasing intensity as they read from left to right. The first digit in a price has the strongest influence on perception; that is, a price of $9.99 comes across as $9 plus something rather than $10.
“You can be sure in succeeding in your attacks if you only attack places which are undefended.”
The faster an object travels through space, the slower its progress in time.
The Coolidge Effect: the phenomenon where males are sexually excited by new partners over and over again. Proven by a seldom known rat study where a sex deprived rat has sex with a female until exhausted. Then a new female is introduced and it happens again. And then again even though the rat was seemingly exhausted before.
A leader who feels he is superior is likely to suppress the visions of the very people he needs to rely on to succeed.
Two examples of huge shifts in our cultural evolution: Copernicus and his discovery that we were but one planet is a vast ocean of planets and galaxies. Darwin and his discovery that we were just an animal that evolved from many other animals. These two beliefs radically changed how strongly we believed in religion. If we are but one of many planets, why would God care so much about us? If evolution is true, how could an intelligent designer have created us?
“Expect nothing, and you will enjoy everything!”
Oaktree portfolios are set up to outperform in bad times, and that’s when we think outperformance is essential.
The Anna Karenina Principle: In many areas of life, success is not about doing one thing correctly, but about avoiding many possible modes of failure.
“Whenever we think we have final answers, progress, science, and understanding of our world ceases.”
Enjoy life while you are here. Do not overstrain to save.
A knight sets out to illuminate the darkness in society, not from its leaves but from its roots. This is how justice will be realized. Find the source.
Rest more: There is always the option to do nothing.
How to overcome these biases? We need tricks. We are just animals and we need to re-structure our environment to control our emotions in a smart way.
If you're willing to take credit when you win then you have to be willing to take responsibility when you lose.
Investments, even very long-term investments like newly planted timber properties, will eventually throw off cash flow. A machine makes widgets that are marketed, a building is occupied by tenants who pay rent, and trees on a timber property are eventually harvested and sold.
How do you write a tons of books? Write “200 crappy words per day” and you’ll find motivation often flows out of you.
“Boredom is the awareness of time passing.” -Heidegger
Daily well being is what we should be targeting.
The question to ask yourself when making a destructive or critical comment about someone is not, “Is it true?” But, “Is it worth it?”
Life is a long series of farewells; only the circumstances should surprise us.
There are some advertisements you just cannot write until you have lived long enough. The cycle of years does something to fill your reservoir, unless you refuse to live spatially and emotionally.
The desire for a more positive experience is itself a negative experience. And, paradoxically, the acceptance of one’s negative experience is itself a positive experience.
No two people are exactly alike, and the more obvious an improviser is, the more himself he appears. If he wants to impress us with his originality, then he'll search out ideas that are actually commoner and less interesting.
Investing is in some ways an endless process of managing liquidity.
Do not blame others for your failures. Even if they are at fault.
Life is filled with an almost infinite wealth of hard decisions. You are bound to fumble along time way.
“Where the determination is, a way can be found.”
Sometime around 150,000 years ago, this phase transition happened within the human brain.
The more you think about it, the more you feel it, the stronger the memory. The more you recall something, the more it strengthens. The emotions you focus on are the same. The more you focus on negative aspects of your memory, the more they take control. They more you focus on the positive thoughts and loving yourself, the more they take control.
Never announce that you are a knight, simply behave as one. You are better than no one, and no one is better than you.
“When scientists make erroneous predictions they almost always err by predicting that the future will be too much like the present.”
First-level thinkers look for simple formulas and easy answers. Second-level thinkers know that success in investing is the antithesis of simple
No system of thought can contain the fullness of human experience.
To truly appreciate something, you must confine yourself to it. There’s a certain level of joy and meaning that you reach in life only when you’ve spent decades investing in a single relationship, a single craft, a single career. And you cannot achieve those decades of investment without rejecting the alternatives.
While you are at it, there’s nothing like picking out a good-looking wife, because even the handsomest woman looks homely sometimes, and so you get a little variety; but a homely one can only look worse than usual. Beauty is only skin deep, but that’s deep enough to satisfy any reasonable man. (I want to say right here that to get any sense out of a proverb I usually find that I have to turn it wrong side out.) Then, too, if a fellow’s bound to marry a fool, and a lot of men have to if they’re going to hitch up into a well-matched team, there’s nothing like picking a good-looking one.
once you adopt a value-investment strategy, any other investment behavior starts to seem like gambling.
There is no point of performance you can achieve where you will feel “done”.
“Mindfulness represents an alternative to living reactively.”
On the perils of learning creative principles: Dullness is not the consequence of age, but of education. As we learn creative principles like composition and balance, we start seeing the world as it ought to be rather than as it is. The problem is that the world as it is, is actually far more interesting than the version our educated minds wish it to be. We have to relearn how to attend to the world as it is rather than being disappointed for it not perfectly matching the rules we have been taught.
Homeostasis: Our body, brain, and behavior have a built in tendency to stay within very narrow limits.
But the real avant-garde aren't imitating what other people are doing, or what they did forty years ago; they're solving the problems that need solving, like how to get a popular theatre with some worth-while content, and they may not look avant-garde at all!
A simple question to ask yourself when you’re worrying: “Is this useful?”
The process of price setting begins at the conception of the product idea. A company must think about prices as early and often as possible in the development process, not just after a product is ready to launch.
To bring your dreams and desires to fulfillment, you must be successful with money.
Powerful companies and brands are omnipresent. You need to be everywhere.
Always go a little bit beyond what people expect. Dress a little nicer. Try a little harder.
“I mean, what's the use of hating? You're just using up your energy and die sooner.”
Don’t let yourself coast when things are going great. “It’s easy to wish for your health when you’re sick. But you need to be just as vigilant when things are going great.”
The process of evolution strikes a balance between discovering the new and exploiting the familiar.
The best way to describe your total creative capacity is to say that for all practical purposes it is infinite.
These interesting findings imply that the share of companies which are successful with a premium price strategy is greater than the share of companies which have achieved sustained success with low-price strategies.
Everything in life is based on your reference frame. Look at things in a new way and suddenly your problems fade away.
True commitment can only occur when turning back is no longer an option. This moment constitutes conversion in the highest regards. Failure is no longer caused by a lack of commitment. If you are going to fail, you are going to fail epically. If you are going to succeed, you will live at your highest level.
Investing deeply in one person, one place, one job, one activity might deny us the breadth of experience we’d like, but pursuing a breadth of experience denies us the opportunity to enjoy the rewards of depth of experience.
What makes us feel good depends on our cultures, our personalities, and our level of self-esteem. But our desire to feel good is probably universal.
Mirror neurons are like “nature’s own virtual reality simulations of the intentions of other beings.” They allow you to envision what someone else is doing and to predict what will happen next. This is how we interpret other people’s complex intentions.
You can try two strategies for getting people to say yes to these dinners: First, “work your way up the food chain” by getting smaller players to say yes first and then going slowly up the food chain to bigger names. Second, you can try to land one big name to start and then use that credibility to pull everyone else in.
Without religion, it is very possible that the world would have been less moral. Yes, immorality and crime still persisted, but the forces of religion probably dampened their effects.
The excessive increase of anything causes a reaction in the opposite direction.
Human knowledge is never contained in one person. It grows from the relationships we create between each other and the world, and still it is never complete.
Give preference to companies having good managements with a personal financial stake in the business.
Never let the audience know you are bombing. “This is funny, you just haven’t gotten it yet.” Keep going even if the laughs aren’t coming. For eight years he tried this routine and it didn’t work well.
John Endler's guppy studies from the 1970s showcase how environment drives evolution.
There are four primary reasons Europeans rose to power and conquered the natives of North and South America, and not the other way around.
If an improviser is stuck for an idea, he shouldn't search for one, he should trigger his partner's ability to give ‘unthought' answers.
The only thing that is capital-T True in life is that you get to decide how you’re going to try to see it. This is the freedom of real education, of learning how to be well-adjusted: You get to consciously decide what has meaning and what doesn’t.
What you appreciate, appreciates.
The function of religion is to give humankind a belief to be able to tolerate life.
“Let your plans be dark and impenetrable as night, and when you move fall like a thunderbolt.”
Value Chain Position Profit: Certain places in the value chain are incredibly profitable while others are not. Look for these key control points.
“We all know we're going to die; what's important is the kind of men and women we are in the face of this.”
“You do not know at twenty what you are going to do at forty.”
In the case of nonlinear pricing, one must know the marginal utilities for each additional unit. Without knowledge of willingness to pay as a function of time, location, or other criteria which will serve as the basis for differentiation, managers are stumbling around in the dark.
It stands to reason that since you learned every habit you have, you can also learn new ones.
“Things that happen with little help from luck are more resistant to randomness.”
Children come into the world already different from one another thanks to their genes. Then, parents treat their children differently precisely because they think and act in different ways. Genetics leads to different parenting styles.
History cannot be a science, only an industry, an art, and a philosophy. An industry by ferreting out the facts. An art by seeking order in the chaos of materials. A philosophy by seeking perspective and understanding.
Many students block their imaginations because they're afraid of being unoriginal. They
Important point: “it's more random than we think, not it is all random.” Chance favors preparedness, but it is not caused by preparedness (same for hard work, skills, etc.)
The idea that we can have nonconscious feelings and emotions is controversial. Many philosophers and scientists reject the idea of nonconscious feelings as an oxymoron.
Geographic location is a key determinant in the pace of technological innovation and acceleration because a centrally located society will not only accumulate knowledge and technology from their own inventions, but also from neighboring societies. In the case of a particularly large land mass like Eurasia, technologies can spread from one culture to another and continue to do so along the entire span of the continent. This spread occurs much more quickly in these locations than it would to, say, aboriginal cultures in Tasmania, which did not receive outside contact from other civilizations for over 10,000 years.
What each person calls their “necessary expenses” will always grow to match your income unless you resist that urge. Do not confuse your necessary expenses with your desires.
We overestimate the impact any one person or leader can have because we fail to see how complex the problems are that current leaders face.
“There are five essentials for victory: He will win who knows when to fight and when not to fight. He will win who knows how to handle both superior and inferior forces. He will win who’s army is animated by the same spirit throughout all it’s ranks. He will win who, prepared himself, waits to take the enemy unprepared. He will win who has military capacity and is not interfered with by the sovereign.”
There are two things you never want to pay any attention to—abuse and flattery. The first can’t harm you and the second can’t help you.
“The truth is that getting ready to die is tough and painful–more so, I believe, than the merely physical torments that define a bad disease.”
If what you hold is illiquid or unmarketable, the opportunity cost increases further; the illiquidity precludes your switching to better bargains.
An exercise: fix your eyes on some object, and attend to something at the periphery of your vision. You can see what you're attending to, but actually your mind is assembling the object from relatively little information. Now look directly, and observe the difference. This is one way of tricking the mind out of its habitual dulling of the world.
Uncertainty can preserve and prolong our happiness. When events seem rare, unexplainable or strange, we tend to value them more than things that can be explained, seem ordinary, or otherwise make general sense. (Note: does this explain something about why we love to believe myths or religious stories, often with very strong emotions?)
A great many ideas are lost in the final stage. The idea man, like the inventor, is often not patient enough or practical enough to go through with adapting his ideas to fit the actual conditions of the world.
The first thing you must understand is that you need not have gone anywhere. You are always in the right place at exactly the right time, and you always have been.”
People who describe the glass as half full are not delusional optimists. In fact, they are more based in reality because they are describing a substance that is actually in the glass. They are describing reality as it is. The cynic who describes the glass as half empty is focusing their energy on something that is not actually there.
The trick of successful investors is to sell when they want to, not when they have to. Investors who may need to sell should not own marketable securities other than U.S. Treasury bills.
Never play by the agreed upon norms of your industry. Create new ways to dominate your sector.
Most people seem to think outstanding performance to date presages outstanding future performance. Actually, it’s more likely that outstanding performance to date has borrowed from the future and thus presages subpar performance from here on out.
There are many ways to make profit and it is unlikely that your business all of them.
“The least likely experience is often the most likely memory.”
Even after being on The Tonight Show and starting to headline a few clubs (but without any mainstream success), Martin wrote in his journal, “My new material is hopelessly poor. My act is simply not good enough. It’s not even bad.” It is fascinating to see such a successful creator struggle with his work.
Investment performance is what happens to a portfolio when events unfold.
To be a value investor, you must buy at a discount from underlying value.
“It seems to me that I discover my thoughts through the act of writing — in the act of writing.”
The new research on daily experiences has changed the way we think about health, happiness, and well being.
Wealth will make you much happier when you go from poverty to the middle class but not much more happy beyond that. Some making $5M per year is about as happy as someone making $100K per year.
Once he achieved peak success, he struggled with trying new material and experimentation. In his words, “This was no longer an experiment. I felt a huge responsibility not to let people down. Arenas of 20,000 and three day gigs of 45,000 were no place to try new material.”
The French engineer Jules Dupuit noted this necessity way back in 1849. At that time, the lowest class passenger rail cars did not have a roof. “It is not because of the few thousand Francs which would have to be spent to put a roof over the third class seats,” Dupuit explained. “What the company is trying to do is to prevent the passenger who can pay the second class fare from traveling third class; it hits the poor, not because it wants to hurt them, but to frighten the rich.
We place additional significance on whatever we encounter first.
History is the map of human character. To know how man will act you must know how man has acted.
Accept the things that come to you — wealth, power, food, relationships, etc. — with grace and dignity, but do not desire them before they get to you.
the first and perhaps most important step in the investment process is knowing where to look for opportunities.
People who are exceptional become that way by thinking they are average and focusing on improvement. You don’t become exceptional by believing you are exceptional.
State an end time in advance. “The dinner is done by 9:30, but everyone is allowed to stay longer if they want.”
Sacks believes that the history and human elements of science are important to our knowledge and understanding. So often researchers and experts will ignore anything older than five years because it is “outdated.” But Sacks loves learning about the inspiring discoveries of old researchers and the history of chemistry or physics or biology. These stories increase his overall sense of understanding and perspective.
Subtlety #2: To not give a fuck about adversity, you must first care about something more important than adversity.
As you love yourself, life loves you back.
The most common explanation of the different trajectories experienced by Europe compared to Africa, Asia, Oceania, etc. is genetic and biological. People assume there is some innate biological difference that made Europeans smarter, more creative, or more resilient. Science, however, has produced no substantial evidence to indicate this is the primary cause of different outcomes.
You have to follow a disciplined thought process in order to be successful, but it doesn’t have to be mine.
You can’t work individuals by general rules. Every man is a special case and needs a special pill.
The magnitude of your success is tied to how many times you’ve failed at that thing.
CHRISTOPHER DAVIS: It is also critical to spend time trying to fully understand the incentives at work in any given situation. Flawed incentives can often explain irrational, destructive, or counterintuitive behaviors or outcomes.
The Experience-Stretching Hypothesis: your experiential background can dramatically change your happiness levels. Once you know something exists and have experienced pleasure from it, then your definition of happiness changes compared to what it was in the past.
William Hamilton noted that the human mind can attend to one thing nonconsciously while performing another behavior consciously. Such as drifting to another train of thought while reading aloud.
Liberty is possible when security has been achieved, but until that point you are facing competition. It is only because of competition that we developed the ability to create liberty.
According to the author, cultures are passed on by the children’s peer group. She calls this “group socialization theory.”
Research shows that people actually feel less pain when they believe they are suffering for something of great value.
Forgiveness means letting go of the hope for a better past.
In a group of 8 or more, you’ll need a private dining room. The downside of this is that there are multiple conversations going on and people may feel lost and left out of conversations going on at the other side of the table.
It is impossible to understand the human brain without understanding how it evolved.
The root of the word decision means to cut-away and remove other options. Thus, when a decision is made, it is separated from other decisions which could have been made. There are opportunity costs to every decision.
“Giving improves well-being in many ways.”
Even after his works had been exhibited in court as proof that he wasn't in his right mind, Henri Rousseau still had the stubbornness to go on painting!
After 40 years in the pricing game I am convinced that only very few companies will achieve long-term success with a low-price strategy.
Right now, most of us engage in far too many priorities. If we have more than three priorities, we have none.
His mantra became his anchor. The one true thing in his life.
The closer we get to reality, our authentic self and desires, the slower time goes.
When someone responds negatively to an event — like crying when their child goes off to college — offer them sympathy and support, but notice that this event does not effect others. The stranger on the corner does not weep. Thus, it is not the event that is negative, but the person’s opinion of it. Although you may offer outward sympathy and support, do not let such events effect you internally.
Don't worry about time management or balance. Instead, focus on abundance. Don't think either/or. Instead, think all/everything.
“Make your way by unexpected routes and attack unguarded spots.”
Some men are preoccupied even in their leisure: in their country house, on their couch, in the midst of solitude, even when quite alone, they are their own worst company. You could not call theirs a life of leisure, but an idle preoccupation.
In old age, you understand how good it is that there should be radicals and how good it is that there should be conservatives. The radicals supply the gas and the conservatives apply the brakes. Both of those functions are indispensable. That tension is required for a functioning society.
Again and again, the environment dictated the spread of power throughout islands of East Asia and the Pacific. Depending on location, islanders differed in their connectedness to other peoples and in the plants and animals available to them to domesticate. People with favorable locations for food production and access to technology replaced those with less favorable environments.
combining the imagination of two people which would be additive, rather than subtractive.
Evolution found ways to radically repurpose functions in the ape brain into remarkably more powerful functions in the human brain.
It’s all invented. Everything in life is an invention. The way we see things. The way we measure things. The way we compete. The way we judge ourselves.
In my view, investors should usually refrain from purchasing a “full position” (the maximum dollar commitment they intend to make) in a given security all at once. Those who fail to heed this advice may be compelled to watch a subsequent price decline helplessly, with no buying power in reserve. Buying a partial position leaves reserves that permit investors to “average down,” lowering their average cost per share, if prices decline.
Be incredibly clear in your writing. Leave no room for confusion.
The adaptive nonconscious helps our brains deal with situations where there is a lot to analyze but only a small slice of information that matters. It allows your brain to act like a spotlight and highlight what is happening on center stage while keeping the rest of the theater in the dark.
But nothing delights the mind so much as fond and loyal friendship. What a blessing it is to have hearts that are ready and willing to receive all your secrets in safety, with whom you are less afraid to share knowledge of something than keep it to yourself, whose conversation soothes your distress, whose advice helps you make up your mind, whose cheerfulness dissolves your sorrow, whose very appearance cheers you up!
A portfolio that contains too little risk can make you underperform in a bull market, but no one ever went bust from that; there are far worse fates.
There have always been two ways to be rich: by accumulating vast sums or by needing very little.
Don’t let what may appear to be a setback become a missed wormhole of opportunity.
Do your research again before the dinner. The more you know about the people you are dealing with, the better you can serve their needs and ask relevant questions.
When buyers know neither the price range of a product category nor have any special requirements (e.g., high quality, low price), they gravitate toward a price in the middle of the range.
Stick with the plan. Money accrues surprisingly quickly and debts are gone fast with discipline and consistency.
The more open and vulnerable you are during your intro, the more others will follow suit.
Government and religion are two of the main reasons some societies overcame others. These shared myths led to collaboration and increased power.
The high art of pricing lies in intelligent price differentiation
If you're going to fail in public, best to do it in front of a limited audience. You need a relatively safe space to fail.
The greatest part of entrepreneurship is breaking down your limiting beliefs. It has nothing to do with money.
We have a tendency to see risks against specific things as more likely than general risks (dying in a terrorist attack while traveling vs. dying on your next trip, even though the second includes the first). We seem to overvalue the things that trigger an emotional response and undervalue the things that aren't as emotional.
Whenever you're going to not do a habit, explain to your brain why you're missing.
A habit is the “natural way we do something.”
Commit first. Figure out the details later.
Idea: compare downward to maintain perspective? Travel to poor areas? Etc.
At least three areas have developed extraordinarily rapidly in human brains relative to other primates: Wernicke’s area, the prefrontal cortex, and the IPL region in each parietal lobe. These three areas structurally evolved in small steps, but functionally they led to massive leaps forward compared to other primates.
We know 1,000 things about the news of today, but rarely about the past. How can we understand our present without knowing our history?
One year with a great return can overstate the manager’s skill and obscure the risk he or she took. Yet people are surprised when that great year is followed by a terrible year. Investors invariably lose track of the fact that both short-term gains and short-term losses can be impostors, and of the importance of digging deep to understand what underlies them.
Everyone hustles his life along, and is troubled by a longing for the future and weariness of the present. But the man who spends all his time on his own needs, who organizes every day as though it were his last, neither longs for nor fears the next day.
Then we go to the theatre, and at all points where we would say ‘No' in life, we want to see the actors yield, and say ‘Yes'. Then the action we would suppress if it happened in life begins to develop on the stage.
For organization habits: practice imperfect cleaning where you get your home or work space to a 9/10 cleanliness, but don't worry about perfection.
It is not possible to access our nonconscious minds, thus one of the best strategies we have is to work backwards by running experiments, examining our behavior, and coming up with a theory that, while unlikely to be perfectly accurate, is useful enough to shed insight on our nonconscious behavior and help adjust our future actions.
Delusional self-confidence causes you to resist change.
Our lives today are filled with information from the extremes of the bell curve of human experience. The best of the best, worst of the worst, and most upsetting of the upsetting. We only see the most exceptional news stories because that’s what drives revenue. This is a real problem when it comes to comparison because you can only be exceptional in one thing thing and you’re going to be below average in nearly everything else. That makes comparison a very dangerous game to play.
Never run a business in which you have no influence on the prices you charge.
But to live well, sometimes you will need to hold two seemingly opposing truths, one in each hand, and carry them both comfortably. Nature creates its balance with opposites. We need the sun and the rain, the glacier and the desert.
Martin gave himself a deadline for success. He would be a performer until he was 30 and then had to figure out something else to do.
Understanding the causes of history improves our ability to intervene and improve the world. Many people mistakenly assume that discussing history is just a way to explain away tough issues. Not at all. It improves our ability to take effective action.
War seems to be a constant among all civilizations and times. It is a result of competition among groups just as individuals compete as well.
“In my experience, meditation makes you 10% happier.”
We must realize that our difficulty is not the fault of the places but of ourselves. We are weak in enduring anything, and cannot put up with toil or pleasure or ourselves or anything for long.
“There are no new fundamentals.” -Jim Rohn
In advertising, an idea results from a new combination of specific knowledge about products and people with general knowledge about life and events.
A system with local maximums is not an efficient system. You should not try to maximize the productivity of every moment because it's not an optimally designed system.
Richard Thaler ran an experiment on pre-commitment and created an automatic 401k saving program that increased savings as employees earned raises. What they found was that people saved nearly double the amount they would have for retirement. Most people WANTED to save more, they just never got around to it when their pay increased because of inattention and inertia. Thaler’s plan made it automatic.
“I remember asking him, “Since you’ve stopped making art, how do you spend your time?” And he said, “Oh, I’m a breather, a respirateur, isn’t that enough?” He asked, “Why do people have to work? Why do people think they have to work?” He talked about how important it was to really breathe, to live life at a different tempo and a different scale from the way most of us live.”
Of course, clothes don’t make the man, but they make all of him except his hands and face during business hours, and that’s a pretty considerable area of the human animal. A dirty shirt may hide a pure heart, but it seldom covers a clean skin. If you look as if you had slept in your clothes, most men will jump to the conclusion that you have, and you will never get to know them well enough to explain that your head is so full of noble thoughts that you haven’t time to bother with the dandruff on your shoulders.
First, since investors cannot predict when values will rise or fall, valuation should always be performed conservatively, giving considerable weight to worst-case liquidation value as well as to other methods.
It takes two months of building a meditation habit before you start experiencing the benefits.
Chain your habits together with the easiest habits at the beginning. Make it really easy to start and let the momentum build.
prices move up and down for two basic reasons: to reflect business reality (or investor perceptions of that reality) or to reflect short-term variations in supply and demand.
“If you know the enemy and know yourself, you need not fear the result of a hundred battles. If you know yourself, but not the enemy, for every victory gained you will also suffer a defeat. If you know neither the enemy nor yourself, you will succumb in every battle.”
So we should make light of all things and endure them with tolerance: it is more civilized to make fun of life than to bewail it.
On learning: For mastering most skills, there’s nothing better than being in the hands of a master teacher.
The first biological lesson of history is that life is competition.
How much greatness do we expect of those around us? It matters.
Eating healthy is perhaps the most impactful health habit you can adopt.
College doesn’t make fools; it develops them. It doesn’t make bright men; it develops them. A fool will turn out a fool, whether he goes to college or not, though he’ll probably turn out a different sort of a fool.
Mastery is not about perfection. It’s about the process.
“All warfare is based on deception. Hence when able to attack we must seem unable. When using our forces we must seem inactive. When we are near we make the enemy believe we are far away. When far away we must make the enemy believe we are near.”
“Through the years, I have learned that there is no harm in charging oneself up with delusions between moments of valid inspiration.”
“Would you be friends with yourself?” That is, what makes you interesting?
The 5 Laws of Gold: 1) Gold comes easily and in increasing quantity to the person who saves at least 1/10th of their earnings. 2) Gold labors diligently and multiplies for the person who finds it profitable employment. 3) Gold clings to the protection of the person who invests their gold with wise people. 4) Gold slips away from the person who invests gold into purposes through which they are not familiar. 5) Gold flees the person who tries to force it into impossible earnings.
As time wore on, philosophers became the driving forces behind societal changes rather than the church. And then, eventually science stole that job from philosophy.
An artist who is inspired is being obvious. He's not making any decisions, he's not weighing one idea against another. He's accepting his first thoughts.
It’s okay for things to suck some of the time.
Most business owners try to grow their way out of their problems, hinging salvation on the next big sale or customer or investor, but the result is simply a bigger monster.
“In war, the victorious strategist only seeks battle after the victory has been won.”
“When we imagine the future we often do so in the blind spot of our minds eye.”
Using the person’s name in the email title is great.
While a great many methods of business valuation exist, there are only three that I find useful. The first is an analysis of going-concern value, known as net present value (NPV) analysis. NPV is the discounted value of all future cash flows that a business is expected to generate.
Give an A. If you automatically assume the best and give everyone an A in life, then you let the best come out in them and you remove a lot of the barriers that have been the relationship back.
Good times teach only bad lessons: that investing is easy, that you know its secrets, and that you needn’t worry about risk.
Offering true value is a necessary but by no means sufficient condition for success. Far too often I have heard managers claim that if you make a good product, it will sell itself.
It is very important to have something to work toward. The pursuit of a goal is often better than the accomplishment of it.
Many social situations tend to be so powerful that virtually everyone construes them in the same way and they overpower personality differences.
The Calculating Self is who runs our lives in The Measurement World. The Central Self is who runs our lives in The Possibility World.
The ratio of undistilled information to distilled is rising. Let's call information that has never had to prove its truth more than once or twice, undistilled. And information that has been filtered through many years, counter arguments, and situations is distilled. You want more distilled information (concepts that stand the test of time and rigorous analysis) and less undistilled information (the news, reactionary opinions, and “cutting edge” research).
Agriculture did not lead to an unequivocally better lifestyle. In fact, for those who actually grow food life tends to be worse than it would be as a hunter gatherer. If this is true, and the evidence seems to point that way, then it means that advancement of civilization has essentially happened on the backs of society's have-nots. In other words, the entire system we live within – agriculture, capitalism, etc. – requires inequality to function.
A lot of people hesitate to take responsibility for their problems because they believe that to be responsible for your problems is also to be at fault for your problems. This is not true. We are responsible for experiences that aren’t our fault all the time. This is part of life.
There is little harm in believing we are better, more popular, and more talented than we actually are. This likely leads to more happiness and satisfaction. The problems occur when our self estimates deviate too wildly from reality.
Some things are in our power and some are not. Examples of things not in our power: reputation, power, and the things that are not our own acts.
Every dollar you spend today is costing you $5 in twenty years. (Because of opportunity cost from investing.)
The correctness of a decision can’t be judged from the outcome. Nevertheless, that’s how people assess it. A good decision is one that’s optimal at the time it’s made, when the future is by definition unknown. Thus, correct decisions are often unsuccessful, and vice versa.
Approach everything with the attitude that it can be done. Believe that you will figure it out.
What matters most when it comes to making sense of our lives and is that people commit to a believable narrative that corresponds reasonably well to their adaptive nonconscious. You can’t keep revising your story and the reasons for why things happened without ruminating senselessly. A good self narrative does not need to be constantly retold.
To be psychologically balanced and centered depends heavily on being physically balanced and centered.
Pennebaker's approach for dealing with traumatic events: write by yourself for 15 minutes per day for three days. Develop a meaningful narrative that helps explain the event.
“We cannot do without reality and we cannot do without illusion. Each serves a purpose, each imposes a limit on the influence of the other, and our experience of the world is the artful compromise that these tough competitors negotiate.”
Revolutions are just surface level changes. Human nature remains the same. The people merely change with the revolution and fall back into the same underlying patterns.
“Nothing looks exactly the same once you truly understand that you are not exempt from death.”
I’m firmly convinced that investment risk resides most where it is least perceived.
Step 3: Question
I’m afraid that habit, which induces firmness in things, may drive this fault more deeply into me: long association brings love of evil as well as good.
Three types of dinners: 1) Reconnecting old ties. 2) Connecting people who should know each other. 3) Connecting with people who I’ve meant to connect with for a long time.
Some men learn all they know from books; others from life; both kinds are narrow. The first are all theory; the second are all practice.
Certainty is the enemy of growth.
The author told his whole staff they needed to make 50 sales calls. Then he told them they needed to make the calls in 30 minutes. He went and made 28 calls in 22 minutes. The point is to stop analyzing and paralyzing yourself with overthinking. Just act.
Duchamp was a very innovative. At one point, after creating a variety of highly regarded works on canvas, he abandoned painting on canvas all together because “canvas and oil paint were the instruments that had been so abused in the last nine centuries.” He abandoned the whole medium in an effort to come up with something completely new, which is how he invented his glass pieces.
“What makes humans different from every other animal is that they think about the future.”
Always remember that a man who’s making a claim never underestimates his case, and that you can generally compromise
We are so mentally wired to overvalue the sensational stories that you can “realize informational gains by dispensing with the news.”
Cooperation is real and it expands as technologies evolve, but mostly because it is a form of competition. We cooperate within our group, family, community, and nation in order to make our group more powerful.
Whatever limitations are imposed on us in the investment world, it’s a heck of a lot better to acknowledge them and accommodate than to deny them and forge ahead.
Ask people around you to help you with your writing. Call on them for their expertise. If you want to write about gardening or include a garden in your writing, but you don't know the first thing about gardening, then ask someone who does. Enlist the help of others to make your words come alive.
Time Profit: Be faster, be newer, be innovative. Be there before everyone else and exploit the advantage for as long as you can.
Habits rule a man’s life.
Reserve accountability for your most important habits. It can be a logistical pain to setup accountability partners, but it works really well.
Hearing people out does not make you dumber. So listen and say thank you.
Pyramid Profit: Different customers have different price sensitivities. This profit model works with that. Multiple tiers: Firewall (low-priced tier at bottom that can't reasonably be underpriced by a competitor), Next tier (mid-range products that you upsell and cross-sell to from the low-priced tier), Premium tiers (higher-priced products that loyal customers buy)
The things that happened are only a small subset of the things that could have happened. Thus, the fact that a stratagem or action worked—under the circumstances that unfolded—doesn’t necessarily prove the decision behind it was wise.
The second method of business valuation analyzes liquidation value, the expected proceeds if a company were to be dismantled and the assets sold off.
At this end of each day, rate yourself based on how much time you wasted and so on.
Be slow to hire and quick to fire.
If your mind races off, you're like a chariot without the reigns. Take the reigns and be in control of your mind.
We are no longer facing a material crisis. We have plenty of resources: TVs and clothes and goods that we don’t need. The problem we face is existential and spiritual. We have so much stuff and so many opportunities that we don’t know what to give a fuck about anymore.
In many cases, we actually want our nonconscious tendencies to change and align with our conscious motives and desires.
Culture is heavily dependent on population density. The higher the population, the more culture seems to spawn and spread.
On the human tendency to overthink things and our ability to assign meaning to anything: “Words are taken and repeated and after a certain number of repetitions the word takes on an aura of mysticism, of magic. And it goes on because men love to do that.”
Death comes for all of us. It is our fate as living, breathing, metabolizing organisms.
This is a discussion of the underlying causes of human behavior. In many cases, these causes are hidden to us.
“The general who loses a battle makes but few calculations beforehand.”
“There are only two things worth hating: an easy life and too much success.”
History is the story of humankind in a struggle with other species and themselves for the limited resources and gifts of the environment. Competition is the basic law.
It is your duty to be successful. Do not view success as an option.
The entire strategy can be concisely described as “buy a bargain and wait.”
The insidious thing about these forms of worship (money, power, fame, beauty, etc.) is not that they’re evil or sinful; it is that they are unconscious. They are default settings. They’re the kind of worship you just gradually slip into, day after day, getting more and more selective about what you see and how you measure value without ever being fully aware that that’s what you’re doing.
Tracking will revolutionize your life. The author started by tracking every financial decision in a notebook.
“All you can give us is what life is about from your point of view.”
Calculating the present value of contractual interest and principal payments is the best way to value a bond. Analysis of the underlying business can then help
“Observe both the things that come first and the things that follow.” You can’t just look at someone competing on the Olympic stage and desire that. You must also look at the practice, the effort, the time, and the sacrifice that came before the result. If you consider all of what is required for a task and then still wish to do it … only then should you proceed because you will properly understand what is required.
A knight does not whine. He concerns himself with affecting change, not burdening the world with his grievances.
Knowledge uninvested is wasted.
“Mild success can be explainable by skills and labor. Wild success is attributable to variance.”
Prediction of history is much easier over long time spans, but basically impossible over short time spans.
All of us have the ability to act more like the person we want to be.
A knight is the best kind of servant, leaving every space he enters brighter and cleaner than when he arrived. His surroundings reflect his state of mind.
The problem is that the pervasiveness of technology and mass marketing is screwing up a lot of people’s expectations for themselves.
If time is relative, we don’t need to assume one minute means one minute. Perhaps, five minutes could be squeezed into one minute, of five hours, or five years. The compression of time is not a matter of compounding activities, but the compounding of meaning.
Avoid checking email or answering the phone during the first few hours of your day—that time is sacred. Checking your email is simply a database of other people’s agendas. Thus, by checking your email at the beginning of the day, you have already set a pattern that your day is not going to be designed by you, but someone else.
Today, innovation is so fast that we accomplish more in a day than previous generations did in a lifetime.
Start by eliminating your triggers. Throw out junk food, etc.
“In battle, there are not more than two methods of attack: the direct and indirect.”
“There is no instance of a country having benefitted from prolonged warfare.”
I teach that a master-servant scene is one in which both parties act as if all the space belonged to the master. (Johnstone's law!) An extreme example would be the eighteenth-century scientist Henry Cavendish, who is reported to have fired any servant he caught sight of! (Imagine the hysterical situations: servants scuttling like rabbits, hiding in grandfather clocks and ticking, getting stuck in huge vases.)
Weak and overwhelmed individuals resort to criticism.
“Wealth does not make people happy, but positive increases in wealth may.”
On taking time to find yourself: “What's unworthy about working to understand who you truly are and what you really want from life? What better use can a person make of his youth?”
The success of your investment actions shouldn’t be highly dependent on normal outcomes prevailing; instead, you must allow for outliers.
Apple supplemented its skimming strategy with continuous innovation and an expansion of its product line. This process is sometimes called “versioning,” the ongoing introduction of new versions. Each new version offers superior performance compared to the previous generation, which allows Apple to keep the prices for its devices relatively constant.
The earlier you start making changes the more the compound effect works in your favor.
Once we eliminate fantasy, then we have no artists.
While most other investors are preoccupied with how much money they can make and not at all with how much they may lose, value investors focus on risk as well as return.
At what point does liberty become excessive? At what point does it become disorder?
Fascinating: many traits evolved from previous traits with very different functions. For example, wings evolved from scales. The original purpose was insulation not flight.
I advised him to repeat the “profit” mantra every day, as often as possible. He of course will hear the message every time he says it, but others hear it only once or twice and won’t get tired of it.
“We favor the visible, the embedded, the personal, the narrated, and the tangible. We scorn the abstract. Everything good — aesthetics, ethics — and wrong — fooled by randomness — with us seems to flow from it.”
Often a very old man has no other proof of his long life than his age.
“It’s easier to hold to your principles 100 percent of the time than it is to hold to them 98 percent of the time.” —Clayton Christensen
No business is going to keep someone around just for showing up. You have to continually get ready.
I think what most people — especially educated, pampered middle-class white people — consider “life problems” are really just side effects of not having anything more important to worry about.
Your starting point matters because we often end up close to where we started. (This could be applied to many areas of life: memories, socioeconomic status, education, etc.)
Once you understand that every sound and posture implies a status, then you perceive the world quite differently, and the change is probably permanent. In my view, really accomplished actors, directors, and playwrights are people with an intuitive understanding of the status transactions that govern human relationships.
Most of the poor are victims of racial discrimination and environmental handicaps.
“A wise general makes a point of foraging on the enemy. One cartload of the enemy's provisions is equivalent to twenty of one's own.”
Failing to think big in the beginning will lead to failing to act big.
When a customer pays a very high price for a product, he or she expects that the product will hold its value.
“Very rarely is cost leadership a driver of superior profitability .”
“I am happy where I am,” he confided to me. “I have friends. I’m good at what I do. And that is enough.”
Childish behavior does not equal childish intelligence.
People who think they can do no wrong usually can't admit they are ever wrong. Which, paradoxically, makes you more wrong. Owning up to your mistakes is essential.
History is colorblind and can develop a civilization under any race and in nearly any circumstance.
Opponent Process Theory helps explains what happens at a physiological level when processes oppose one another. Perhaps psychological processes follow similar patterns?
There are only a few things investors can do to counteract risk: diversify adequately, hedge when appropriate, and invest with a margin of safety.
Much of what is randomness is timing. The best strategy for a given time period is often not the best strategy overall. In any given cycle, certain places will be dangerous, certain trading strategies will be fruitful, etc.
The quality of your work (and life) is a result of all the forces that have played upon you throughout life. The goal is to make the most of those forces.
“One of the hallmarks of depression is that when depressed people think future events they can't imagine liking them very much.”
The fun of the thing’s in the run and not in the finish.
William Hamilton theorized that habits acquired early in life had a distinct effect on nonconscious mental processes.
This is how time relativity works. Time feels the same to each individual but can be vastly different—speed is relative to each person.
Step 5: shape and develop your idea into practical usefulness. Put your idea out into the world, submit it to criticism, and adapt it as needed.
Every great knight has weaknesses. You will be no different.
Everyone wants you to believe that the secret to a good life is to have a nicer job or a better car or a prettier girlfriend.
Humans were likely responsible for the extinction of nearly all of Australia's large mammals. The same is true for many large mammals that occupied the Americas over 10,000 years ago.
So you have to get used to your circumstances, complain about them as little as possible, and grasp whatever advantage they have to offer: no condition is so bitter that a stable mind cannot find some consolation in it.
Humanity has been on a clear path from small groups to larger ones, culminating in states, over the last few thousand years.
Value investing by its very nature is contrarian
“If he is superior in strength, evade him.”
“Show up. Listen. Try to laugh.”
It is not the maximum price differentiation that is optimal, but rather the extent that strikes the best balance between value and costs.
But it isn’t enough to be all right in this world; you’ve got to look all right as well, because two-thirds of success is making people think you are all right.
Learning how to build new habits is useful because you can translate the skills you learn to new habits. That's one reason why building an incredibly simple habit is still worthwhile.
Most improvements in life make very little difference and that's fine. We spend so much time searching for transformational change in one easy step, but can we all just admit that were looking for the easy way out here? Just because you can't change everything at once doesn't mean you can't get better. In many cases, most cases in fact, you are only going to see a very small increase from each action. One workout builds a very small amount of muscle. That is what is to be expected. You're not doing it wrong if you get very tiny results. Most strategies deliver tiny results and require consistent over a long period of time. In the book, Harris makes a comment about therapy only working a little bit: “The limit isn't your therapist. The limit is therapy itself.” It makes a small difference, but it still makes a difference. The key is to embrace these daily marginal gains rather than dismissing them because they are small.
2) Homo habilis likely created the first tools 2.4 million years ago. What was the role of tool use in shaping human cognition?
When you see something the light rays seen by your eye are converted into nerve impulses. There is no image in your head. Just impulses that describe it to your brain – like writing could describe how a chair looks even though the words on the paper look nothing like the chair itself.
Newtonian time’s most fatal flaw is determinism—the present is determined by the past.
For every artist there is always a tension between sex (what you want to do) and cash (what pays the bills). As soon as you accept this your career will move ahead faster.
Habituation effect decreases pleasure with repeated cycles, but it can fade over time. “Variety is the spice of life” can be false depending on timing. When considering options available to you during a single session (like many appetizers at one meal) variety is good. When considering options spaced out over time (like what to order at your favorite restaurant each month) go with your top pick every time because the habituation effect will decrease between each session and you'll get full enjoyment each time.
gradually I realised that I wouldn't work for people I didn't like.
Total perspective is an optical illusion. We must operate with partial knowledge.
What really got me started again was an advert for a play of mine in the paper, a play called The Martian. I had never written such a play, so I phoned up Bryan King, who directed the theatre. ‘We've been trying to find you,' he said. ‘We need a play for next week, does the title The Martian suit you?' I wrote the play, and it was well received. Since then I've deliberately put myself in this position.
5) How did language evolve?
Young people, women and men, often use the possession of beauty or wealth as permission to be uninteresting, undisciplined, and ill-informed.
Conversation starters: http://www.masterminddinners.com/ice-breakers/
To learn is to change. Dedicate yourself to lifelong learning.
Strategy 4: Get in the flow. Items that are most frequently bought are at eye level and on the displays at the ends of aisles. You post a sticky note on the mirror to remind yourself in the morning. Amazon adds recommendations beneath the items you are browsing. Netflix does the same with shows. Home delivery prescriptions coming with a message on the final refill that says on top of the cap: “Last refill. Call your doctor. New Rx needed.” These are all examples of injecting reminders into the normal flow of the user.
Life will follow the path it began to take, and will neither reverse nor check its course. It will cause no commotion to remind you of its swiftness, but glide on quietly. It will not lengthen itself for a king’s command or a people’s favour. As it started out on its first day, so it will run on, nowhere pausing or turning aside. What will be the outcome? You have been preoccupied while life hastens on. Meanwhile death will arrive, and you have no choice in making yourself available for that.
Energy is critical. Yes, doing things for others and living a life of meaning is important. But without energy you can't do your best work. “If you want to make a difference for years to come, you have to put your health and energy first.”
“Mortality doesn't limit us only in time. It limits us, as well, in what we hope to understand.”
We should question our emotions because they are not always right.
Because investing is as much an art as a science, investors need a margin of safety. A margin of safety is achieved when securities are purchased at prices sufficiently below underlying value to allow for human error, bad luck, or extreme volatility in a complex, unpredictable, and rapidly changing world. According to Graham, “The margin of safety is always dependent on the price paid. For any security, it will be large at one price, small at some higher price, nonexistent at some still higher price.”
“According as circumstances are favorable, one should modify one’s plans.”
Education: when school funding is determined by how many high test scores we put out, what students actually learn is merely a footnote.
Nobody really knows what happiness feels like for others (and there are lots of research-backed reasons why), so that means we can’t say definitely whether someone in a situation that might seem bad to us (like being a conjoined twin) is actually less happy than we are. In fact, it’s entirely possible they are just as happy or even more so.
Mastery reveals so much more to learn as you continue the journey. The destination is two miles farther away for every mile we travel.
The best people hire the best coaches. Harvey McKay had 20 coaches. A speech coach, writing coach, humor coach, etc.
In animals the pattern of eye contacts often establishes dominance.
Why keep working once you have achieved a certain financial level of success? Because you can be happy while accomplishing things, not while resting and doing nothing. If you loved your wife and kids yesterday, should you just stop at that? Or should you build upon it? Same way with your work and legacy.
You will only begin building wealth when you start to realize that a part of all the money you earn is yours to keep. That is, pay yourself first. You always pay others for goods and services. Pay yourself as much as you can. Save money.
“A candle loses nothing by lighting another candle.” Many things in life, and especially relationship-building and success, are not fixed pie situations.
All winners are trackers. You cannot improve something until you measure it.
Using a penetration strategy is recommended for experience goods. These are products which require a consumer to gain some experience with them in order to understand their true value. A low price at launch motivates more customers to give the product a try, and can create a multiplier effect if customers have a positive experience and start to comment on or even evangelize about the product.
Duchamp believed art should not follow tradition. “Tradition is the prison in which you live.”
We repeatedly enlarge our instruments without enlarging our purpose. We have developed more complex ways to pursue basic human needs.
In a way, you could say mental toughness or heroism or other qualities of character are merely the outcome of what the situation demands.
Nature loves difference because it is what allow selection to focus on the strong and eliminate the weak.
The Profit Parabola: “The total profit earned by all players in a market goes up, peaks, and comes back down to zero.” (i.e. Get in on the first half when profit is rising, not the last half.)
It seems arrogant to doubt tradition too much, too think that your supposedly brilliant mind could develop a better solution in 30 or 40 years than humankind has developed over thousands of years of working together. For this reason, it’s quite possible that we discount how useful and powerful religion can be.
An idea is nothing more or less than a new combination of old elements.
Avoid deception. Ask yourself whether a reasonable person armed would feel deceived by the way you are presenting information or nudging behavior if they knew everything you did.
The compound effect is the strategy of reaping huge rewards from small, seemingly insignificant actions.
Inescapable situations will trigger our psychological immune systems, which then promote our brain’s ability to deliver a positive outlook and happiness from an inescapable situation.
Whenever possible, you should try to communicate value using hard data, especially in a business-to-business situation.
People usually expect the future to be like the past and underestimate the potential for change.
The problem many of these socialization issues run into is what Karl Popper cited: you can’t prove it, but more importantly you can’t disprove it. You can’t call something science if there is no way to test whether or not it is false.
“We need 3 to 5 interactions to make up for each negative one.”
You cannot make men equal by passing laws.
Make eye contact and smile at people. This simple habit that will make you feel more connected and much better each day.
Imagination’s three shortcomings are: 1) Imagination tends to add and remove details, but people do not realize that key details may be fabricated or missing from the imagined scenario. 2) Imagined futures (and pasts) are more like the present than they actually will be (or were). 3) Imagination fails to realize that things will feel different once they actually happen—most notably, the psychological immune system will make bad things feel not so bad as they are imagined to feel.
“Remember that nobody accepts randomness in his own success, only his failure.”
“To give the short version, I've learnt that every human being, with or without disabilities, needs to strive to do their best, and by striving for happiness you will arrive at happiness. For us, you see, having autism is normal — so we can't know for sure what your ‘normal' is even like. But so long as we can learn to love ourselves, I'm not sure how much it matters whether we're normal or autistic.”
The more general knowledge you have, the more opportunity you have for creating new relationships and connections between ideas.
Being dependent on only one person or one solution for success is your fault. Winners bring in success from many different avenues.
What we need is to activate the good intentions that people already have.
Give away ALL the credit.
When you realize more of your potential in any endeavor (even a small one), it can change the rest of you in many ways.
One of the most striking things I’ve noted over the last thirty-five years is how brief most outstanding investment careers are.
We learned that things invented on the spur of the moment could be as good or better than the texts we laboured over.
It’s easier to look wise than to talk wisdom. Say less than the other fellow and listen more than you talk; for when a man’s listening he isn’t telling on himself and he’s flattering the fellow who is.
Love your kids because kids are lovable, not because some expert prescribes it. You can neither perfect nor ruin your kids, they are not yours to perfect or ruin. Just love them.
Garbage in, garbage out. Don't waste your time watching TV, eating junk, reading useless stuff, consuming negative stories, and more.
Suddenly we understood that every inflection and movement implies a status, and that no action is due to chance, or really ‘motiveless'.
High returns can be unsatisfying if others do better, while low returns are often enough if others do worse.
“My thinking was changing all the time.”
Don’t select people who are competitors. You want the whole room to feel collaborative.
 On artists being egotistical and already thinking they know everything: “I hate to argue in general. You don't argue with artists, you just say words and they say words, and there is absolutely no connection.”
Frances Hesselbein, CEO of the Girl Scouts. Claimed to be greatest executive by Peter Drucker.
When we imagine the distant future, we tend to imagine things in generalities and gloss over the details. When we imagine things in the near future (like tomorrow), we tend to think in concrete details.
Common mistake 1: setting your sights too low.
A man can’t do what he pleases in this world, because the higher he climbs the plainer people can see him.
Cool example of ritual: some surgeons wash their hands and put on their gowns in the same fashion before each surgery. It’s the pattern and ritual of it that sets their mind in the right place for performance.
The truth is, much in investing is ruled by luck.
It is vital to realize that although Diamond is discussing long time frames of hundreds or thousands of years, the core idea can be applied to short time spans of individual behavior as well. Indeed, large long term differences only occur because short term differences are repeated over and over again. Small environmental differences led to small changes in individual behavior, which resulted in significant differences when repeated for thousands of years.
International travel, reading books, and seeking out masterpieces from all fields are some of the best ways to increase the quality of your input.
People will only do something and change when it is in their own best interest and aligns with our values.
The wise lender always has a guarantee of repayment should the investment go poorly.
Posture implies a status, then you perceive the world quite differently, and the change is probably permanent. In my view, really accomplished actors, directors, and playwrights are people with an intuitive understanding of the status transactions that govern human relationships.
Don’t select people at opposite extremes of that commonality (i.e. Don’t have someone running a $100M startup and someone just starting their first venture.)
Homeostasis works to keep things as they are even if they aren’t very good.
Expose yourself to ideas you disagree with and actually try them out.
As a story progresses it begins to establish other routines and these in their turn have to be broken.
Particular bits of knowledge are just “rapidly aging facts.” What matters are the underlying principles and methods.
Finding something important and meaningful in your life is perhaps the most productive use of your time and energy.
Profit First is a cash-management system.
On travel: Seeing the world is like charity—it covers a multitude of sins, and, like charity, it ought to begin at home.
Nature likes large litters and the struggle for survival that ends up selecting the strongest few.
Scientists have developed a term for the consequence of all our multitasking: continuous partial attention.
How many of us truly grasp the simple fact that we will die before it is thrust into our face?
Because the opportunity cost of illiquidity is high, no investment portfolio should be completely illiquid either. Most portfolios should maintain a balance, opting for greater illiquidity when the market compensates investors well for bearing it.
The single most crucial factor in trading is developing the appropriate reaction to price fluctuations
Our brains “fill in” all sorts of information each day. Our predictions are influenced by our experiences. We make assumptions about things that we predict based on the previous experiences we have had or heard about before.
Always do the math yourself. Too many people take numbers from unreliable sources.
After acclimating to the speed of my new system, it became obvious to me that I had covered more ground in terms of time-distance than many of my associates. In other words, while we had all experienced the same few years, I felt like I had aged, or changed, by decades.
“Get a life, a real life. Not a manic pursuit of the next promotion.”
Durant defines civilization as social order that promotes cultural creation, so you need order and personal freedom / creative liberty. These appear to be at odds with one another, but it is often a tense, delicate balance between the two. If social order is too strong, freedom is restricted. If social order is too low, cooperation is not enabled to the degree to create civilization.
Learning how to focus and prioritize your thoughts effectively based on finely honed personal values is perhaps the greatest and most important struggle in life.
If we don't have the opportunity to predict our future it is more scary than if we can predict s bad future (variable shock study).
Synesthesia occurs when someone experiences the combining of senses. For example, the number 7 might seem red or chicken might taste “pointy.”
many buyers and sellers of securities are motivated by considerations other than underlying value and may be willing to buy or sell at very different prices than a value investor would.
Practice is often used as a description of what we do. Instead, we can look at practice as something we have, something we are defined by.
Step 4: your idea will come back to you with a flash of insight, only after you have stopped straining.
Resistance is proportionate to the size and speed of the change, not to whether the change is a favorable or unfavorable one.
We often refer to the human mind as a single entity. In reality, it is a collection of many processes that work in concert with one another. It is a system of thinking with various mental feedback loops.
Absolutely never skip twice. Missing two days of a habit is like habit suicide.
If we have a lot of time, it tends to be filled with busyness. If we are crunched for time, we use that time efficiently.
“One of imaginations shortcomings is that it takes liberties without telling us it has done so.”
Problems are inevitable, but what they mean is flexible. We get to control what our problems mean to us based on how we choose to think about them and how we choose to measure them. The way we measure success influences how we view the problems we face.
This means that every business has only three profit drivers: price, volume, and cost.
the actual risk of a particular investment cannot be determined from historical data. It depends on the price paid.
Your brain processes 11 million bits of information per second via the five senses. This was calculated by counting the number of receptors on each sense organ and nerve signals being sent to the brain. Your eyes alone process 10 million pieces of information per second. Yet, you can only consciously process 40 of them (and that's a high-end estimate). The vast majority of life lives in the nonconscious mind.
A comedian is someone paid to lower his own or other people's status.
Most men get cross-eyed when they come to size themselves up, and see an angel instead of what they’re trying to look at. There’s nothing that tells the truth to a woman like a mirror, or that lies harder to a man.
Do not feel depressed that life may only have meaning insofar as man puts into it. It is remarkable that we can put any meaning into life at all. The thing that is rare is the capability to even invent meaning for ourselves, for such a task appears impossible for all other animals.
Isolation is a key factor preventing creativity and innovation from spreading because most people and societies get their ideas from outside societies. So constant connection to others and trading of ideas and resources is essential for technological and creative progress.
“If you ever find a man who is better than you are – hire him. If necessary, pay him more than you would pay yourself… If you always hire people who are smaller than you, we shall become a company of dwarfs. If, on the other hand, you always hire people who are bigger than you, we shall become a company of giants.” —David Ogilvy
Human nature changes, but it changes at an incredibly slow, geological pace. We can say with reasonable certainty that human nature has been virtually unchanged in the last 2,000 years and quite possibly far longer than that. Human nature is strongly linked to biology. These are the intrinsic traits that we have and they change very slowly through evolution.
Companies get into financial trouble for at least one of three reasons: operating problems, legal problems, and/or financial problems.
In the field of battle, as in all things, you will perform as you practice; so practice hard.
Long life expectancy is one reason technology might develop and spread faster in some locations rather than others. A longer life increases the surface area you have to test ideas and allows you to take on longer projects that you might otherwise avoid with limited time.
Switchboard Profit: Act as a power broker between buyers and sellers. Only works well if you can get 15 percent of the market or more because deals flow in your direction given your network on both sides of the deal.
Just because you can do what you want does not mean you have free will. Why? Because you are not consciously choosing what you want. You simply want it. You can’t explain why you want it, but you do. And so choosing to do what you want (or choosing one want over another) does not mean you have free will because your wants have been given to you not determined by you.
There is a huge advantage in having many tiny customers. You can fire any individual client as long as you keep your customers happy in general.
The way you live your normal day is full of triggers for possible habits.
I don’t know anything that a young business man ought to keep more entirely to himself than his dislikes, unless it is his likes. It’s generally expensive to have either, but it’s bankruptcy to tell about them.
The key secret to the art of pricing luxury goods is mastering “limited editions.” The supplier must strictly abide by its own limit; otherwise it risks losing its credibility and reputation. The limited number of units determines the scarcity and thus the value of the luxury good.
“Attack him where he is unprepared. Appear where you are not expected.”
Montell Williams has an add-in principle where he focuses on adding something in to his life rather than what he is cutting out or sacrificing.
Our world is stunningly complex, but we are so engulfed in this complexity that we take it for granted. We are blind to it.
We live in more luxury today than ever before. The things we have today our ancestors thought existed for just the wealthy. And yet, somehow, we are rarely grateful for all this wealth.
You should save at least 1/10th of what you earn. More if you can afford to do so.
If education is the measure of progress then we have progressed more than ever before. Education is the transmission of as much of human heritage and learning as we can fully achieve.
Idea: what if you treated work like practice? At practice each period is planned. Hell, each minute is planned. And then breaks are planned as well.
“To the individual, character is destiny. To the organization, culture is destiny.” —Tony Hsieh
“Giving up is when you're in a contest and you acknowledge that you've lost. Acceptance is when you graduate to a different way of looking at the situation.”
Wallace’s Problem: The human brain reached its present size about 300,000 years ago, yet many of our modern attributes like tool making, fire, and perhaps even language appeared only about 75,000 years ago. Why did it take so long for all of this latent potential to blossom? And why did it blossom so suddenly?
When we buy a new home, it isn’t really costing us $300,000. What it really costs is the time spent working to pay the monthly mortgage.
There is a inefficiency during the eating process. The nutrient transfer is much less than 100 percent and typically around 10 percent. For example, it takes 10,000 pounds of corn to create a 1,000 pound bull.
If I believe I’m a nice guy, I’ll avoid situations that could potentially contradict that belief. If I believe I’m an awesome cook, I’ll seek out opportunities to prove that to myself over and over again. The belief always takes precedence.
The cortex of most other mammal brains is mostly smooth and flat whereas the human cortex has grown so much that it has developed many folds and valleys to increase surface area (the walnut-like appearance).
Sacks makes a brilliant point when talking about the treatment of his schizophrenic brother: medicine should not merely be about treating symptoms, but also about the meaning and freedom and social well being of the patient.
There are many successful businesses but few successful families.
Civilization requires a delicate balance of social impulses with animal impulses.
We don’t always control what happens to us. But we always control how we interpret what happens to us, as well as how we respond.
For writing habits: what you write about and the quality of writing are not important. Following the habit is important.
“True compassion is about not bruising the other person’s self-respect.”
Truly, I believe, Curius Dentatus used to say that he preferred real death to living death; for the ultimate horror is to leave the number of the living before you die.
Like many fantastic writers, Sacks has no throttle on his writing tendency. He often behins with the intention of adding a footnote or penning a few paragraphs and suddenly that small idea expands into the biggest section of the book. I see this over and over with top artists. Once the faucet starts flowing they can't turn it off. Instead, the act of writing unleashes a fire hose of thoughts and inspiration. I think it is a sign they love their work beyond measure.
Experience modifies the brain by strengthening or weakening the synapses that link neurons together.
There are two types of people: those who find it easier to add new habits into their life and those who find it easier to cut habits out of their life. (Note: you may find it varies by habit. Attack your habits from both sides.)
Focus on your strengths every day. People who do are 6x more likely to find meaning in their job.
Darkness is simply the absence of light. You can’t push darkness away. You can’t hide from it. Similarly, you can’t hide from depression, anxiety, self-hate, and more. And you don’t need to. The only thing you need to do is turn a light on. To let the sun shine in through the window. Whenever you feel like you are in darkness, just let light in through the window. You don’t need to escape or destroy the darkness. Just let in the light.
Study by Lepper, Greene, and Nisbett found that children (around the age of 3) who were rewarded for drawing were less likely to draw during free time. Presumably, they applied the discounting principle without knowing it. (“I drew with the pens and was rewarded, thus I must have been drawing because I was rewarded and not because I actually like drawing.”) This discounting principle holds up in adulthood as well where we often find that people actually are less likely to follow through on behaviors they previously enjoyed if they start receiving external rewards for them.
Three indicators of a healthy business: Operational expense, inventory, and throughput.
All of the history of humankind is a short chapter in the history of biology. And all of biology is a short chapter in the history of the planet. And the planet is a short chapter in the history of the universe.
Only the man below the average desires equality. Those who are conscious of being above average desire freedom. In the end, superior ability has its way.
“You need to surround yourself with people who are batteries, not black holes.”
This has implications for how we judge criminals and interpret actions. If we understand that it is very possible to be dealt a bad hand in life — bad genetics, bad parents, bad experiences — then we begin to realize that even criminals have a deeper story that influences their actions. In a world like this, crimes, even heinous ones, are not easily attributed to free will and bad ideas. It’s a more compassionate view of our fellow humans. “The urge for retribution depends on our not seeing the underlying causes of human behavior.”
You don't have to be the first to do something, but you should be the best at it.
You cannot have freedom without order.
Dealing with the fact of death is unsettling. Yet there is no other way to live.
The peregrine falcon is the swiftest, most adept animal I have ever seen. It is worth noting that, like many birds, the falcon’s bones are hollow. Travel light.
The key elements of great sleep habits are complete darkness and silence.
Lesson: avoid debt at all costs of you want to remain free.
There is definitely a point where you can become too popular. Your daily life is hindered. Your relationships suffer. People struggle to understand your troubles. Celebrity has its drawbacks.
Superior value is a must: Premium pricing will work over time only if a company offers superior value to customer.
A simple approach to becoming better: do good, be good. By acting in ways that are helpful and caring toward others, we will view ourselves as more helpful and caring.
Operating at activity levels far beyond the normal is 10X action and execution. It will take you far.
SETH KLARMAN: This is why it is all-important to look not at investors’ track records but at what they are doing to achieve those records. Does it make sense? Does it appear replicable? Why haven’t competitive forces priced away any apparent market inefficiencies that enabled this investment success?
The concentration of wealth in a small portion of the population is a pattern that repeats itself throughout history. The most valuable talents and skills are confined to a few people, which means the most valuable wealth is confined to a few as well. This pattern shows up again and again.
“One day, in retrospect, the years of struggle will strike you as the most beautiful.” -Sigmund Freud
You have to be obsessed. Nobody has ever accomplished something incredible without obsession.
Share the things you are planning with other people because anticipation increases well being. Give people the chance to anticipate great experiences. (Planning a vacation can often lead to more happiness than the vacation itself.)
Brain Shortcut 3: hyperbolic discounting. We give more weight to long-term benefits when they are in the future and more weight to immediate pleasure when we are in the moment. This leads to a cycle of making earnest plans, procrastinating and choosing something outside the plan in the moment, making more earnest plans for the future, and so on. (I believe this is the same idea as time inconsistency.)
“If a man has reported to you that a certain person speaks ill of you do not make any defense to what has been told you, but reply, “The man did not know the rest of my faults for he would not have mentioned these only.”
When you miss a habit once, sticking with the next occurrence of that habit should become the top priority in your life.
On the perils of intelligence: I accepted the idea that my intelligence was the most important part of me. I tried to be clever in everything I did. In the end, I was reluctant to attempt anything for fear of failure. My first thoughts never seemed good enough. Everything had to be corrected and brought into line.
Emotions are “lubricants of reason.” We actually need to feel things to make decisions.
There should be at least one commonality around all guests (entrepreneurs, artists, etc.)
“Nothing which gives comfort [to someone in need of comfort] should ever be despised.”
Good profit models are easy to brainstorm and hard to execute.
There are 4 levels of learning: Awareness, Awkwardness, Application, Assimilation
an investor’s portfolio management responsibilities include maintaining appropriate diversification, making hedging decisions, and managing portfolio cash flow and liquidity.
One common theory for why people pursue leadership is because of “social emotions” which cause others to be influenced by a person due to small, almost imperceptible physical signals like charisma, gestures, and gait.
If you beat yourself up every time you miss a habit, you are basically ruining the whole purpose of the experience. Habits are supposed to make your life better. Hating yourself for missing a habit introduces negativity that completely offsets the positive benefits. (Note: we could use a finance metaphor here. Getting a new credit card to earn a bunch of frequent flier miles is pointless if you don't pay off the balance each month. The negatives offset any positive gain. Same situation here with habits.)
Lottery ticket players: serious lottery players think success is random. Successful people think success is within their control and thus don't play the lottery. Both mindsets are delusional in their own way, but the successful approach seems to work better overall.
Profit maximization is the only sensible goal for pricing.
The 10X Rule: You must set targets for yourself that are 10X more than what you think you want and then take 10X the action you think is required to get there.
If you are in debt, live on 70% of what you make. Save 10% for yourself. Use the remaining 20% to repay your debts.
Practice, practice, practice. The early years of Martin's career were poor and unsexy, but they were filled with tons of practice. It was by performing his routines in public five or six times per day and by constantly adapting material from friends that he developed stage confidence and a unique routine.
Strategy 2: Lock in good intentions for the future. Use pre-commitment and implementation intentions to secure good behaviors. Remove all of your TVs from your home. Throw out all sweets and candy. Voluntarily add your name to the “do not gamble” list. Take the drug antabuse to make yourself feel sick if you drink alcohol, etc.
Most people feel like they are working – rather than chasing passion – because the payoff isn't large enough.
The whole future lies in uncertainty: live immediately.
Create “only” practices. What is something only you are doing?
The rise of indigenous food production in certain areas was the result of a few factors. First, certain areas had plants better suited to domestication. This led people to domestic earlier in those regions. Second, because of this early start, these people eventually domesticated more difficult plants. Evidence seems to indicate that all people's are capable of food production and even modern hunter gatherers seem to be naturally moving that way.
The sanity of the individual lies in the continuity of his memories. The sanity of the group lies in the continuity of its traditions. Break away from either too fast and chaos follows.
Value investing, the strategy of investing in securities trading at an appreciable discount from underlying value, has a long history of delivering excellent investment results with very limited downside risk.
Transaction Scale Profit: Specialize in high paying, highly profitable markets. (Think: a real estate agent who only sells $1M+ homes.)
Every master visualizes their success.
You are living as if destined to live for ever; your own frailty never occurs to you; you don’t notice how much time has already passed, but squander it as though you had a full and overflowing supply – though all the while that very day which you are devoting to somebody or something may be your last.
Most real-world problems are more complex than we think.
The most important determinant of whether investors will incur opportunity cost is whether or not part of their portfolios is held in cash. Maintaining moderate cash balances or owning securities that periodically throw off appreciable cash is likely to reduce the number of foregone opportunities.
Profit is not an event.
Mindfulness seems to be about awareness of the self. You recognize and acknowledge the things going on around you and the emotions you are feeling. Rather than let the emotion drive everything, you step outside of it and see it from afar.
“All of us want to do well, but if we do not do good too then doing well will never be enough.”
“If they will face death, there is nothing they will not achieve.”
If we measure life by distance rather than time, some people may travel great distances on a given day while others can’t remember a single significant thing they did.
Interesting definition of natural selection: the progressive series of chance variations that enhance the organism's ability to pass on its genes to the next generation.
The frontal lobe is responsible for planning and anxiety — two key future-oriented functions.
All of the meaning in our life is shaped by our innate desire to never truly die. Our physical bodies will die, but we cling to the idea that we can live on through religion, politics, sports, art, and technological innovation.
Premium pricers shy away from special offers: They are hesitant to offer promotions and special offers. If the promotions they offer are too frequent or too steep, these instruments can endanger the premium price position.
Many successful people can live stressful and miserable lives if all they do is compare upwardly.
Humans are part of the animal kingdom, descendants of apes, but also transcendent and unique among the animal kingdom. We are both.
We like to daydream because the mere dream itself can be a joy.
Spending more time working toward a shared mission will add meaning to your life.
How it is possible for neural circuitry to embody meaning is one of the great unsolved mysteries of neuroscience.
We should also make ourselves flexible, so that we do not pin our hopes too much on our set plans, and can move over to those things to which chance has brought us, without dreading a change in either our purpose or our condition, provided that fickleness, that fault most inimical to tranquillity, does not get hold of us.
Nobody achieves the impossible without thinking they can.
“He wasn't trying to tell you how to live as much as he was trying to figure it out from himself.”
Fascinating: Freud didn't believe experiments and the scientific method could reveal insights about the nonconscious mind. He thought only careful clinical observation could do that. Which might explain how he ended up with so many unscientific theories.
There is a practice effect associated with acting like the person you want to be. The more you practice it, the better you become.
We have observed time and again that the introduction of additional alternatives can significantly increase sales and shift demand toward higher priced products.
“Why should man work to live, after all? The poor thing has been put on earth without his permission to be here. He’s forced to be here… That’s our lot on earth, we have to work to breathe. I don’t see why that’s so admirable. I can conceive of a society where the lazies have a place in the sun. My famous thing was to start a home for the lazies — hospice des paresseux. If you are lazy, and people accept you as doing nothing, you have a right to eat and drink and have shelter and so forth. There would be a home in which you would do all this for nothing. The stipulation would be that you cannot work. If you begin to work you would be sacked immediately.”
Knowing the answer to, “How do you feel about me?” does not matter when it comes to getting better. What matters is, “How can I get better?”
Every task I can think of is aided by an awareness of breath. It is the connective tissue of the universe, binding all living creatures together. By focusing on our breath, we are able to more adeptly inhabit our bodies and function on instinct.
It’s possible that things that are vices today were once virtues.
The game of upward comparison: “Satisfaction and income are almost entirely relative to ones comparison group.”
We can't change for the long-run without following up. Follow up shows your colleagues that you care about getting better and that you're taking the process seriously.
“Consider what it would actually take to have free will. You would need to be aware of all the factors that determine your thoughts and actions, and you would need to be in complete control of these factors.”
Share your truth. Whatever your truth is, live it. Share it.
Other sciences tell us how we might behave. History tells us how we have behaved.
Duchamp was trying to understand through his work, and sometimes through not working, how to live life in a way that was going to be satisfying.
“Nothing in biology makes sense, except in light of evolution.” -Theodosius Dobzhansky
The 10,000 hours study by K. Anders Ericsson has a hidden finding most people ignore: the top performers slept over 8 hours on average.
It is very dangerous for an individual to think that — even with 30 or 40 years of studying — he can judge and overcome the collective wisdom of the human race. Old ideas are very powerful.
Natural selection can only select for expressed abilities, not latent ones.
Emotions give us energy and they are actually critical to life in the day-to-day world. In other words, the goal here is not to become a robot who can analyze everything with perfect logic.
“Once-in-a-lifetime” market extremes seem to occur once every decade or so—not often enough for an investor to build a career around capitalizing on them. But attempting to do so should be an important component of any investor’s approach.
We often talk and think about what we have done, but what really matters is that we are there. That we show up at all. It's a shared sense of community and connection that matters most, regardless of the cause.
Bill Gates is another who is moving so fast he has potentially traveled the same distance in his life as the combined distance of millions of people.
A price threshold is a price point which triggers a pronounced change in sales whenever it is crossed.
You must constantly have an income that keeps your purse full.
“Quality isn't Job One. Being totally fucking amazing is Job One.”
Confrontation is always preferable to dishonesty, or injustice.
Every knight holds human equality as an unwavering truth. A knight is never present when men or women are being degraded or compromised in any way, because if a knight were present, those committing the hurtful acts or words would be made to stop.
One must understand willingness to pay at the individual level as narrowly as possible, in order to take advantage of it through a differentiated price structure
In dealing with the future, we must think about two things: (a) what might happen and (b) the probability that it will happen.
The pain of failure had led me to understand that in neurosurgery technical excellence was a moral requirement. Good intentions were not enough, not when so much depended on my skills, when the difference between tragedy and triumph was defined by one or two millimeters.
I don’t think much of a business that doesn’t make money.
Too many people focus on achievement without fulfillment.
Duplicate the thoughts and actions of successful people and you too will become successful.
Piggybacking is when you use pleasure in the present moment to pull people into behaviors that are better over the long term. One example was making toothpaste pleasant to use. One way to do this is to change the experience (like the toothpaste example). Another way to do it is with temptation bundling (Katy Milkman’s strategies).
It can be useful to think of happiness by using blood pressure as a metaphor. Sometimes blood pressure is maintained at a lower level (like when you sleep) and other times it is maintained at a higher level (like when you are walking around). There is no on perfect blood pressure because the best level depends on what is required for the situation. However, it is advantageous for blood pressure to never get too low or too high. Happiness is similar. We can experience waves and troughs of happiness and sadness, but it’s best to not stay at this level for days or weeks. There are mechanisms in place that prevent you from experiencing prolonged periods of extreme happiness and extreme sadness, and the psychological costs that would accompany prolonged emotional reactions. It is probably not good for us (from the perspective of evolutionary survival) to stay in a state of prolonged happiness or sadness.
Idea: I also wonder how much other areas of the brain dampen signals to a given area and when they are damaged (like in autistic children) reduced dampening leads to greater creativity.
Sanity is a matter of interaction, rather than of one's mental processes,
There’s a vast difference between having a carload of miscellaneous facts sloshing around loose in your head and getting all mixed up in transit, and carrying the same assortment properly boxed and crated for convenient handling and immediate delivery.
“The art of war teaches us to rely not on the likelihood of the enemy not coming, but on our readiness to receive him.”
Spend time listing the positive impact your work does. Attach meaning to the small things you do and “connect the dots between your efforts and a larger purpose.” It's important to understand how you contribute value.
Desmond Morris, in The Human Zqo (Cape, 1969; Corgi, 1971) gives ‘ten golden rules' for people who are Number Ones. He says, ‘They apply to all leaders, from baboons to modern presidents and prime ministers.' They are: 1. You must clearly display the trappings, postures and gestures of dominance. 2. In moments of active rivalry you must threaten your subordinates aggressively. 3. In moments of physical challenge you (or your delegates) must be able forcibly to overpower your subordinates. 4. If a challenge involves brain rather than brawn you must be able outwit your subordinates. 5. You must suppress squabbles that break out between your subordinates. 6. You must reward your immediate subordinates by permitting them to enjoy the benefits of their high ranks. 7. You must protect the weaker members of the group from undue on. You must make decisions concerning the social activities of your 9. You must reassure your extreme subordinates from time to time. 10. You must take the initiative in repelling threats or attacks arising from outside your group.
The hardest thing of all is to learn to love the journey, not the destination.
There is no direct pipeline to the adaptive nonconscious. It must be inferred by taking a careful look at cues from your own behavior and others reactions.
There is only one thing for which a knight has no patience: injustice. Every true knight fights for human dignity at all times.
One benefit of learning slowly: it forces you to look deeply at the process and you discover incremental steps that you might otherwise gloss over if progress came easily.
Sacks would get obsessed with one or two pieces of music and play them again and again. (So do I!)
It's not about the success you receive. It's about what you are going to create with the short amount of time you have left on this planet.
My biggest takeaway was that when it comes to many everyday circumstances Higashida “gets it,” but he can't act on it. Perhaps I was just ignorant about autism, but I feel that we often assume that autistic people are “out of it” and aren't really following what's going on. (And how would we know when we have no outward or physical indication otherwise?) But he does understand. He gets context and subtlety. He knows what is happening even if he can't take appropriate action.
Love is the end goal. It is the music of our lives. There is no obstacle that enough love cannot move.
Leadership is not forcing people to follow. Rather than the bee going out searching for honey, it’s being the flower and allowing the bees to come to you.
The influence of geographic factors diminishes as technology grows. Man, not the earth, makes civilization.
When another cyclist rides directly behind the first, they get caught in this particle trail and experience a large reduction of resistance while simultaneously being pulled forward by the front rider’s momentum diffusion. Riding in the slipstream allows a rider to keep pace while using approximately thirty percent less energy.
Eliminating unnecessary expenses will bring more health to your business than you can ever imagine.
Interesting insight on art collectors, but probably customers in general: “Collectors tend to feel things. They are feelers, not intellectuals.” In other words, people buy things based on how it makes them feel.
We do not think, but use heuristics to make decisions.
The best way to get approval is to not need it.
The only aspect of your life that fortune does not have control over is your behavior.
Rhinovirus and sleep study: those not getting efficient sleep were 5.5x more likely to get sick when exposed to the Rhinovirus.
In any situation in life you will find delights and relaxations and pleasures if you are prepared to make light of your troubles and not let them distress you.
A business team may have many viable options, but can choose only one. These decisions involve so many factors and face so many market dynamics that black-and-white certainty is rare.
All entertainment is, or is about to be, old fashioned. There is always room for something new.
You should feel no shame if your pursuit of a difficult goal fails.
Track your behavior for at least one week.
A Canadian study on attitudes to mental illness concluded that it was when someone's behaviour was perceived as ‘unpredictable' that the community rejected them.
It is very possible that the crosswiring of adjacent areas of the brain was selected for by evolution because it enabled those people to be more creative (and thus increase the odds of survival) with the unharmful side effect that some people would experience synesthesia.
On his tendency to eat a lot whenever food was around: “In the absence of internal controls, I have to have external ones. I have fixed routines for eating.”
Lots of decision making happens “under the radar.”
“I will love you forever. So long as sex maintains its current level.”
Previously we thought laws were dictated by God. Now it is clear that they are dictated by fallible humans.
The way to grow your business is to just focus entirely on your current customers. Just thrill them and they will tell everyone else.
Each person lives in their own perceived reality. Stephen Covey expressed, “We don’t see the world as it is, but as we are.”
an analysis of cash flow would better capture the true economics of a business. By contrast, nonrecurring gains can boost earnings to unsustainable levels, and should be ignored by investors.
There is a difference between learning and studying. Learning leads to knowledge. Studying a topic means you are invested in it and try it out. The world already has tons of knowledge. You don't need to learn more. What you need is to study, to practice, and to take action on the knowledge you have.
We follow rules not because they are the best options, but because they make things fast and easy.
Around 11,000 years ago all human societies were hunter gatherers.
Science is speculation. This is important to remember. Scientists are simply creating well-formed and well-educated conjectures about the world. But they are still conjectures that can be proved incorrect by one random event.
The power of getting in the flow is best when they user can act upon the reminder immediately. In other words, it should be a hot trigger.
Domesticated animals differ in multiple ways from their wild ancestors. For example, many domesticated animals are different sizes and have smaller brains than their wild ancestors.
“I feel that things of great importance have to be slowly produced.”
In the long run, the market gets it right. But you have to survive over the short run, to get to the long run.
It's a shame everyone else is such an idiot. Of course, to someone else, we are the idiot.
Even if you want to be big, you don't have to act like a big boring business.
Money is the foundation. Without enough money, we cannot take our message, our products, or our services to the world. Without enough money, we are slaves to the businesses we launched.
If you aren't better, work harder.
Customer complaints are not to be avoided. They are problems you can solve.
(Note: This is a great way to think about why we go along with the crowd, “the comfort of consensus.”)
His favorite opener: Thorns, Roses, and Buds. “Something that is going well, something that has the potential to turn into something good, and something that is going poorly.”
Some salesmen think that selling is like eating—to satisfy an existing appetite; but a good salesman is like a good cook—he can create an appetite when the buyer isn’t hungry.
Morals are the way society exhorts behavior from its members.
You might be much happier as a million dollar business than as a billion dollar business.
Again, do you call those men leisured who spend many hours at the barber’s simply to cut whatever grew overnight, to have a serious debate about every separate hair, to tidy up disarranged locks or to train thinning ones from the sides to lie over the forehead.
Manson’s “do something” principle sounds a lot like the philosophy behind the 2-minute rule. Do something now, even if it’s really small, and let good actions cascade as a result.
Consistent, high quality is a must: This prerequisite comes up time and again. Successful premium suppliers maintain high and very consistent quality levels. Their service must also meet the same requirements.
First you need to acknowledge your bad habit. Then you need to develop a specific plan to solve the problem.
Typically, we use big data to change behavior by targeting specific populations and tailoring recommendations to them. Which segment should receive a coupon? And so on. These choices are often made from a marketing and persuasion standpoint. By realizing that most people fail to act because of forgetfulness and procrastination (not a lack of desire), you can open up new opportunities for using big data.
“When you shoot to impress, your eyes divide. You see two targets,”
The authors of the pseudo-plays assumed that writing should be based on other writing, not on life.
The end of Chapter 18 shares multiple interesting examples of peoples who were largely similar genetically because of similar ancestors, but developed very different societies and technologies due to the their individual environments.
Only please customers, not investors. Never forget that absolutely everything you do is for your customers.
One study: people unlock their phones 110 times per day.
Within some of these regions there is a special class of nerve cells called mirror neurons. These fire not only when you perform an action, but also when you watch someone else perform an action.
Doing work and making money are not the same thing. Not all work leads to making money. Much of it is wasted.
3) Why was there a sudden explosion in human cognition around 60,000 years ago? Widespread clothing and shelters show up around this time. (Jared Diamond refers to this as “the great leap.”)
Psychological sciences will always be imperfect because we are trying to observe someone else's subjective experience, but it's the best we've got and the closest an outside observer can get to understanding the inside of someone else's mind.
Avoiding where others go wrong is an important step in achieving investment success. In fact, it almost ensures it.
When a company tries to figure out the price it can achieve, only the subjective (perceived) value of the customer matters. The objective value of the product or other measures of value, such as the Marxian theory that value is defined by the human labor time invested, do not matter intrinsically. They matter only to the degree that the customer thinks they matter and is willing to a pay a price in return.
Princeton theology students research study and the story of the Good Samaritan. Goal obessions: we are so focus on shortsighted goals and the task in front of us that we miss the bigger point. Use this as a jumping off point for talking about goals in life. Is working really the point?
Idea: Technology overpowers environment as time goes on. This trend, however, started as soon as man was able to fashion tools, which was a form of technology.
teach that a master-servant scene is one in which both parties act as if all the space belonged to the master. (Johnstone's law!) An extreme example would be the eighteenth-century scientist Henry Cavendish, who is reported to have fired any servant he caught sight of! (Imagine the hysterical situations: servants scuttling like rabbits, hiding in grandfather clocks and ticking, getting stuck in huge vases.)
Redraw the box in your mind to create a reference frame that embraces the way things actually are and allows you to see them in a new way.
“Isn't it clear that the person who compromises his health in the name of making money is cutting himself a really lousy deal?”
“You can change your life and yourself through effort and discipline. But you have whatever capacity you have for effort and discipline is what you have at this moment. And not a scintilla more. Or less.”
“People now spend more time sitting than sleeping, 9.3 hours per day.”
Social treadmill effect: you get rich, move to a better neighborhood, surround yourself with more successful people, and feel poor again.
YESWARE for Gmail. It confirms that an email has been opened.
Not all behavior is good or bad. Some behaviors are simply neutral.
I’m not going to be lured by a great opportunity when it’s the wrong opportunity.
Wieskrantz’s studies on blindsight offer an interesting look at nonconscious sight. The patient was able to point at a spot on the wall correctly time after time despite saying that he could not see the spot at all.
The idea that conscious thoughts cause behavior is vastly overrated. Instead, it is often the case that nonconscious stimuli cause both you actions and the conscious thoughts you use to justify them.
Maintain a better balance of proteins to carbohydrates throughout the day. And reduce sugar.
“The man who has lived the most is not he who has counted the most years but he who has most felt life.” —Jean-Jacques Rousseau
Gradually, industry changed the structure of human culture and morality. People left the home and tribe to work in factories and live in cities, etc.
How do value investors deal with the analytical necessity to predict the unpredictable? The only answer is conservatism. Since all projections are subject to error, optimistic ones tend to place investors on a precarious limb. Virtually everything must go right, or losses may be sustained. Conservative forecasts can be more easily met or even exceeded. Investors are well advised to make only conservative projections and then invest only at a substantial discount from the valuations derived therefrom.
“Because ensuring the ability to survive under adverse circumstances is incompatible with maximizing returns in the good times, investors must choose between the two.”
Specialty Product Profit: Develop new niche products and create them with above average materials, then charge a premium price.
My personal rule is that investors should value businesses based on what they themselves, not others, would pay to own them.
There are 7 strategies we can use to turn the good intentions we already have into consistent behaviors.
Minor stalemates in life can often be solved by choosing randomly. In many cases it doesn't really matter so long as you choose something and move forward.
The adaptive nonconscious mind does an excellent job of sizing up the world, setting goals, initiating action, and warning people of danger.
Duchamp makes a distinction between someone as a person and their “essential quality” as a profession. For example, he says many art collectors are nice people, but that the essential wuality of an art collector is to be a parasite on the artist.
We hear a lot about “worst-case” projections, but they often turn out not to be negative enough. I tell my father’s story of the gambler who lost regularly. One day he heard about a race with only one horse in it, so he bet the rent money. Halfway around the track, the horse jumped over the fence and ran away. Invariably things can get worse than people expect.
Because of the intent-behavior gap, we (marketers and business people) focus TONS of energy on persuading people’s intent to buy a given product or act in a given way. Nease argues that this logic is flawed because we are spending lots of time and money trying to market to an intention the user already believes in. They don’t need to be persuaded to believe in the value of education or in the productivity boost of better time management or in the health impact of eating better. They already have those good intentions. Now, they need to act on them.
When police officers or first responders are interviewed about how and why they acted in a particular way during an emergency they often say, “My training kicked in.” I like this idea of training yourself to be mindful, aware, compassionate, and so on. These are traits that can be trained and then will automatically reveal themselves when needed (assuming you’ve practiced enough).
Accepting your experience of life as being great and wonderful is the single greatest thing you can do for your happiness.
New Product Profit: There is a profit explosion at the beginning of a product's life.
The faster someone moves toward a desired destination, the slower time moves for them.
Avoid survivorship bias. Don't just see success. See all the failures that led to the eventual success.
I want to say right here that whenever any one offers to let you in on the ground floor it’s a pretty safe rule to take the elevator to the roof garden.
Our knowledge of any past event is incomplete. Most history is guessing and the rest is prejudice.
Assignment for yourself: write down all the ways in which you have been a contribution to the world around you in the last week. There is no space for your failures or missteps. You only get to list how you contributed in a positive way.
Most people are more concerned with what their team members and coworkers think than if an idea is interesting and useful. Why? Because it hurts to be rejected by the people we know, so we seek their approval.
A good wife doubles a man’s expenses and doubles his happiness, and that’s a pretty good investment if a fellow’s got the money to invest.
A corollary to the importance of compounding is that it is very difficult to recover from even one large loss, which could literally destroy all at once the beneficial effects of many years of investment success.
Disparaging yourself in order to rouse compassion in others is not humility.
“No plan survives first contact with customers.” -Steve Blank
The first step to changing our nonconscious inclinations is to change our behavior. Act your way into a new way of being.
Social norms messaging can shift behavior is a positive way. For example, showing people how they compared on energy consumption to their neighbors led to improvements in energy consumption. You have to be careful using this strategy though. Social norms mean some people are “in the group” and some people are “out of the group.” That “out of the group” segment can often react negatively to social norms messaging, which nullifies the positive impacts.
It is reasonable to assume the adaptive nonconscious is an older system from an evolutionary perspective. Conscious thought evolved later in human history.
The human brain and body seem to have a default tendency for harmony. We feel tension that needs to be resolved if there is a mismatch between our conscious mind and nonconcious body. (Extreme examples: transsexual man trapped in female body or phantom limb.)
Dan Martell’s idea: he sits in the middle of the table so that he can act as “conversation cop” and pull people in as needed. He also tries to place the most interesting or extroverted person in the middle of the group, so conversation doesn’t skew to one side.
To investors stocks represent fractional ownership of underlying businesses and bonds are loans to those businesses.
You must not wait for the inevitable storms of life before you ready your mind. Thought precedes action. How we handle times of peace and calm will determine our behavior in moments of crisis.
A notable feature of value investing is its strong performance in periods of overall market decline. Whenever the financial markets fail to fully incorporate fundamental values into securities prices, an investor’s margin of safety is high.
We all look at our version of reality through rose colored lenses, but that version still needs to feel credible. If it's too good, then we will reject it.
Jigoro Kano, the founder of Judo, asked to be buried in his white belt after death. What an awesome symbol: the ultimate master forever embracing the mark of a beginner.
When a person has no problems, the mind automatically finds a way to invent some.
One of the great things about investing is that the only real penalty is for making losing investments. There’s no penalty for omitting losing investments, of course, just rewards. And even for missing a few winners, the penalty is bearable.
Martin began as a magician but discovered that what he loved was not magic, but performance. That's when he set his sights on becoming a comedian.
The Law of Attraction is simply directing your attention toward something that was already there.
No one person can be good at everything. All the great artists and entrepreneurs figure out ways to get around their limitations. There is no reason being bad at some aspect of your art should prevent you from sharing the art entirely.
The people that have moved the needle of humanity live on forever. The time they have expanded for others is their contribution to humanity—their footprint on evolution.
It is inevitable that life will be not just very short but very miserable for those who acquire by great toil what they must keep by greater toil.
When figuring out what you should do each day begin by asking, “How can my time make a difference for others?”
Multi-Component Profit: Same product, several businesses. People will pay different prices for the same thing in different situations (think: Coke in the grocery store vs. Coke in a nice restaurant).
All paths to profit begin with price.
It is often easier to amend your own beliefs than change an organization. Thus, you convince yourself to work somewhere you don't really want to work or do something you don't really believe in.
Formal theory won't get you nearly as far as an incredibly rapid systematic process of trial and error.
You’ll read a good deal about “love at first sight” in novels, and there may be something in it for all I know; but I’m dead certain there’s no such thing as love at first sight in business. A man’s got to keep company a long time, and come early and stay late and sit close, before he can get a girl or a job worth having.
Risk and return must instead be assessed independently for every investment.
Life is composed of a series of coincidences over which we have no control. Once we are presented with such coincidences, we gave choices. How we respond, the actions we take in the face of coincidences, makes all the difference.
You don't need more knowledge. You need a new plan of action.
Happiness is found in solving problems, not avoiding them.
value, investors who buy at a price below net-net working capital are protected by the approximate
Fascinating famous Swiss study of the amnesia patient who couldn't remember doctor's name but did remember him pricking her hand with a pin.
War is, paradoxically, the driver of much technological change and cultural change that leads to long periods of peace afterward.
Chopsticks study: smiling, even when you don't feel like it, you experience less stress.
Asking people why they do what they do (for example, in a customer survey or focus group) can be a misleading way to get behavior or — at best — incomplete. People are only telling you the 50 bits of conscious thoughts that impact what they do. Everything else that impacts their behavior simply isn’t on their mind and won’t be mentioned.
Normal education is designed to reduce spontaneity and make things orderly and understood. Johnstone’s theater improvisation teaching techniques were designed to do exactly the opposite.
Prices determine how much money you make.
You need to create a groove that is deeper than those unhappy and unhelpful grooves you’ve laid down over the years.
Relative Market Share Profit: Companies with higher market share tend to be more profitable.
The higher you go the more your problems are behavioral. Interpersonal behavior is the difference between being great and near great.
Cooperation is the ultimate form of competition.
It is easier to bear and simpler not to acquire than to lose, so you will notice that those people are more cheerful whom Fortune has never favoured than those whom she has deserted.
The saying “under commit and over deliver” is stupid. Instead, over commit and figure out how to show up at a higher level.
The only fundamental driver of willingness to pay is the perceived value in the eyes of the customer.
A systematic optimization of price and product using a freemium model typically increases revenues by about 20 %, according to Simon-Kucher & Partners ’ experience.
Your goals are a compass, not the buried treasure. The goal is not the destination or where you end up, but rather the compass that guides the journey.
There are four levels of organization in society: bands (5-80 people), tribes (100-1000 people),  chiefdoms (1000 to tens of thousands of people), and states (50,000 or more people).
In the late 1960s, Walter Mischel noticed that the many ways of analyzing personality only predicted behavior to a modest degree at best. Meanwhile, the social situation provides much stronger clues.
Change doesn’t have to take a long time, it happens the instant we decide.
There are those too who suffer not from moral steadfastness but from inertia, and so lack the fickleness to live as they wish, and just live as they have begun.
One reason farming communities developed immunity to diseases that wiped out hunter gatherer populations is that some diseases (like measles) are “crowd diseases.” They require a large population to sustain themselves because they act quickly: you either die or develop immunity. In order for the disease to sustain itself there must be enough new babies born to contract the disease from those who have already developed immunity. Only agricultural communities could grow to the required population size.
What is the point of having countless books and libraries whose titles the owner could scarcely read through in his whole lifetime? The mass of books burdens the student without instructing him, and it is far better to devote yourself to a few authors than to get lost among many.
Each moment is a life. Life is renewed every time we are walloped by beauty, every time we are shaken up by gratitude and love.
When you mistreat others, feel guilty. When you mistreat yourself, feel compassion.
Sivers sold his business, which he spent 10 years growing, for $22 million.
Take a picture of the group!
Look up servo loop.
Homogeneity breeds weakness. Science (and life) needs many different styles and viewpoints.
Most ambitions are either achieved or abandoned; either way, they belong to the past.
“I sent you to reap what you have not worked for; others have done the work, and you are sharing the fruits of their labor.” -The Bible
Idea: I’m not so sure we need to make a hard division between the conscious and nonconscious mind. It might help us understand and discuss the two systems, but in reality, they are both part of the same body. Humans are constantly taking in information. Some of it is known to us and some of it is unknown.
Goal obsession is not a flaw, it is a creator of flaws.
“Turn off your cell phone. Keep still. Be present.”
We're all giving status signals, and exchanging subliminal status challenges all the time.
Our minds prefer symmetrical faces. Even minor deviations in symmetry are seen as undesirable. There is an evolutionary explanation for this. Parasitic infestations During infancy can cause small variations in symmetry. So, biological health is somewhat tied to symmetry.
“I try to remind my group each week that we are all idiots and know nothing, but we have the good fortune of knowing it.”
When a seller packages several products together and charges a total price less than the sum of the individual product prices, it is called price bundling. Bundling is a very effective way to differentiate prices.
Some men learn the value of money by not having any and starting out to pry a few dollars loose from the odd millions that are lying around; and some learn it by having fifty thousand or so left to them and starting out to spend it as if it were fifty thousand a year. Some men learn the value of truth by having to do business with liars; and some by going to Sunday School. Some men learn the cussedness of whiskey by having a drunken father; and some by having a good mother. Some men get an education from other men and newspapers and public libraries; and some get it from professors and parchments—it doesn’t make any special difference how you get a half-nelson on the right thing, just so you get it and freeze on to it.
Our society is obsessed with equality and fairness, but there is nothing about nature that states equality must be the rule. In fact, it is far more natural to have inequality in some cases.
Wolpe relaxed his phobic patients and then presented them with a very dilute form of the thing that scared them. Someone terrified of birds might be asked to imagine a bird, but one in Australia. At the same time that the image was presented, the patient was relaxed, and the relaxation was maintained (if it wasn't maintained, if the patient started to tremble, or sweat or whatever, then something even less alarming would be presented). Relaxation is incompatible with anxiety; and by maintaining the relaxed state, and presenting images that gradually neared the centre of the phobia, the state of alarm was soon dissipated—in most cases.
“Truthfully, my mistakes don't seem to have mattered very much. They were dumb, not evil, and dumb is part of every life.”
Jayson prefers dinners of 4-6 people. In a group of 5, you may want to sit at the end and play more of a facilitator role. If you have 6 people, you may want a roundtable setup. And you’ll definitely want to play a facilitator role because one or two people may tend to dominate the conversation.
The concept of alternative histories is particularly interesting. If you were to relive a set of events 1000 times, what would the range of outcomes be? If there is very little variance in your alternative histories (i.e. You chose to become a dentist and you will probably make more or less the same amount of money and live a similar lifestyle all 1000 times), then you are in a relatively non- random situation. Meanwhile, if there is a very wide range of normal results when considering 1,000 variations (entrepreneurs, traders, etc.), then it is a very random situation.
When things are going well and prices are high, investors rush to buy, forgetting all prudence. Then, when there’s chaos all around and assets are on the bargain counter, they lose all willingness to bear risk and rush to sell.
You should never trust an old man to be the judgment of youth because they would just cut off the bold things youth would do before they could do them.
Brain Shortcut 2: Avoid losses. All losses have a reference point and our brains are wired to feel pain if we just miss that reference point. Examples: Wharton study found the professional golfers make more par putts (avoid bogey) than birdie putts (gains) even though both count for one stroke. Students are more likely to retry SAT if they narrowly miss a round number. Baseball players change strategy near end of season if close to batting .300. The key here is that the losses are close to the reference point. Losses that are far away don't cause the same pain and motivation. Winning a silver medal is more painful than bronze because you narrowly missed gold. With proper design, you can utilize this function of loss aversion to motivate good behaviors.
What if we were to measure our entire lives as we measure light-speed—as distance traveled rather than time elapsed? How would each day look, if rather than passing through 24 hours, we measured how far we moved that day?
The climb to the top is a never-ending upward spiral with new problems always surfacing and new processes that you must fall in love with. You are never allowed to stop climbing because the entire point is to love the climb. If you ever stop loving the climb, the results will never come.
“The intention to do one thing and not another does not originate in consciousness. Rather it appears in consciousness. As does any thought or impulse that might impose it.”
“We know that determinism in every sense relevant to human behavior is true. Unconscious neural events determine our thoughts and actions, and are themselves determined by prior causes of which we are subjectively unaware.”
If you desire to do great things, then remember that you must give things your full attention — not just a mild effort — and leave many other things alone for the time being.
Being ignored is actually worse than hearing a negative comment. We often think that not telling someone bad news is preferable, but ignoring people is the worst possible option. We often assume the worst when we hear nothing — not to mention feeling lonely.
“Such an abundant production can only result in mediocrity. There is no time to make very fine work.”
Graham Greene once said that life was lived in the first twenty years and the rest was just reflection.
It is clear that genetics, culture, and experience all play a role in the formation of the conscious and nonconscious mind.
Meditation will make you more resilient, but it is not a “cure all” that fixes your problems or relieves all stress in your life.
Net present value would be most applicable, for example, in valuing a high-return business with stable cash flows such as a consumer-products company; its liquidation value would be far too low. Similarly, a business with regulated rates of return on assets such as a utility might best be valued using NPV analysis. Liquidation analysis is probably the most appropriate method for valuing an unprofitable business whose stock trades well below book value. A closed-end fund or other company that owns only marketable securities should be valued by the stock market method; no other makes sense.
In the long run, differences between people yield to the environment.
There are famous studies done with fMRI techniques which show that our brains will indicate the choice we are going to make 700 milliseconds before we are aware that we are going to make the choice. Other studies have found even larger discrepancies of 7-10 seconds.
when a stock is selling at a discount to liquidation value per share, a near rock-bottom appraisal, it is frequently an attractive investment.
Fascinating reason new ideas get sabotaged within organizations: if new business models catch on they often require people with new skills and that means any big wig in the current business will lose status. So they consciously or unconsciously sabotage new ideas because they are inherently threatening to the career they have spent years building. Yet another reason you must be constantly willing to reinvent yourself.
There are only two types of ideas. Those that have been proven wrong and those which have yet to be proved wrong. (Feynman said something similar.)
“Think of life as a terminal illness.”
It is best to always assume that it is your fault. We are quick to claim to be the victim, but not quick enough to claim responsibility. (Note: when we lose our job, we assume it's the economy. When we don't get a job, we assume it's because we don't have the right network. We make all sorts of assumptions. If you're going to assume something, assume it's your fault. There is always something more you could have done.)
Most investors think quality, as opposed to price, is the determinant of whether something’s risky.
The child learns through their hands in early life. So perhaps standing on two feet was the method through which man became intelligent.
The process of vision is carried out through a series of processes and feedback loops in the brain. This occurs in such a way that multiple visual options are presented, but only one wins out – the final image you see. In this sense, vision and hallucination are closely related. We are always “hallucinating” and our brain selects the one hallucination that seems to most closely match reality based on the external stimuli we receive.
There is a moment for action, and with a clear mind that moment is obvious.
There is always one “right” price or price structure and a multitude of “wrong” ones.
The primary goal of value investors is to avoid losing money.
An investment must be purchased at a discount from underlying worth.
The 3 big negative habits are: 1) drugs and alcohol, 2) addiction to stimulation, 3) negative friends.
When less money is available to run your business, you will find ways to get the same or better results with less. By taking your profit first, you will be forced to think smarter and innovate more.
Habits allow you to stick with behaviors that would require a lot of willpower as a one-time attempt, but only need a little willpower to remain a habit.
The goal is not to reduce cost, but to increase throughput. This has huge implications because nearly everyone is focused on reducing costs.
I realized that the questions intersecting life, death, and meaning, questions that all people face at some point, usually arise in a medical context.
If people comment on your level of action, then you're doing something right.
Writing daily, dancing, and organization habits are some of the best ways to increase the quality of you output.
The greatest way to develop general knowledge on a subject is to get genuinely interested in something. Living in a curious way and becoming fascinated with things is a fantastic way to live and it will ensure you never run out of ideas.
The adaptive nonconscious learns patterns easily. It is designed to scan our environment and detect patterns.
Bowerbirds create very detailed nests in an effort to court a mate. They are even original artists with different birds (within the same species) having different aesthetic tastes and styles. Another interesting example of how beauty might have some fundamental principles that extend outside the human concept of art.
“The odds of being completely engaged in your job increases by 250% it you work on meaningful projects each day.”
Value investing requires a great deal of hard work, unusually strict discipline, and a long-term investment horizon.
If you're not going to follow through on a habit, it is better to not start it at all and focus on a habit you can actually stick to instead.
Nonconscious processes, though generally beneficial, are not perfect.
On seeking praise and reward for your work: “That's another chapter of life, the chapter of ambition. But you have that in business too. You have that everywhere.”
The behavior of institutional investors, dictated by constraints on their behavior, can sometimes cause stock prices to depart from underlying value.
In theory there’s no difference between theory and practice, but in practice there is. YOGI BERRA
“It takes a village to raise a child.” But only because you need a village to have a large enough play group. The bulk of child socialization occurs within the play group with their peers.
Interesting side note: scientists are always competing to discover the “earliest human remains” or the earliest XYZ. As a result, every few years there is a new “earliest” discovery. Only one can actually be the earliest, of course.
My first thought: “yes, but what if you believe in the ‘wrong' God?” Should you play a numbers game and believe in the God most people believe in? Or, can we safely assume that of the infinite number of possible Gods humans could have designed it is unlikely that any of the ones we worship are actually the God? So, just believe that a higher power exists? Whew. Tough call here.
Low-Cost Business Design Profit: The lower the costs of running your business, the higher your profit will be. You don't need high revenues to make high profit with a low-cost business. This is one of the reasons why digital businesses are so attractive.
Is there an evolutionary reason why parenting should be hard? It doesn't seem so. In fact, parenting should be easy and pleasurable. This would ensure we would want to parent our offspring. Maybe if parenting is a chore, you're working too hard at it.
Since no investor is infallible and no investment is perfect, there is considerable merit in being able to change one’s mind.
The Isolation Principle. There appears to be some aspect of isolation in the brain that can lead to enhanced creativity. For example, when autistic children have damaged or poorly functioning areas of the brain it often opens up the ability for one area (like the right parietal lobe) to receive more attention and results in remarkable creativity (like drawing).
The goal of religion and morals and ethics and really any shared belief system is at least partially to overcome the impulses of our hunter-gatherer, reptilian brain. We try to overcome our animal instincts with social instincts. We are casting votes for a new identity that we hope will overpower the natural identity we have.
Rewards will always come to someone who commits to the practice, but the rewards are not the goal. The practice is the goal.
If you are worried about making a mistake, imagine that a 500-pound cow will fall on your head.
To be deadly serious is to suffer tunnel vision. Humor not only lightens your load, it broadens your vision.
Sacks once abducted a patient from the neurology ward and took her on a motorcycle ride to honor the final request of her dying life. He probably should have been fired, but wasn't because he was also incredibly valuable to the department. His experience shows the importance of possessing rare and valuable skills. “In general, I was something of an embarrassment to the neurology department, but also something of an ornament: the only resident who had published papers and I think this might have saved my neck on several occasions.”
He who fears death will never do anything worthy of a living man. But he who knows that this was the condition laid down for him at the moment of his conception will live on those terms, and at the same time he will guarantee with a similar strength of mind that no events take him by surprise. For by foreseeing anything that can happen as though it will happen he will soften the onslaught of all his troubles, which present no surprises to those who are ready and waiting for them, but fall heavily on those who are careless in the expectation that all will be well.
Don’t fear suffering. The strongest steel is forged in the hottest fire.
If the goals you are pursuing do not require wormholes, your approach to life is far too small. The highest pursuits available are those that literally require exceptions to the rules, because such aims cannot be done conventionally.
But what if we did measure time as a distance? How would our lives look? What if rather than focusing on how long something took, we focused on how far we went?
Negative emotions are a sign that something is going unaddressed. They are a call to action. Positive emotions are the reward for taking the correct action.
The imperialist and capitalist drive is so strong and so pervasive that it has become the primary cause of most wars, pollution, starvation, species extinctions, and genocides.
“Shoot for nothing. When an archer shoots for a prize, he gets tight.”
How do you decide what to do with your life when you’re not sure how much life you have left? Maybe in the absence of certainty we should just assume we’re going to live a long time. Maybe that’s the only way forward.
“Wealth is a great deal more enjoyable if you've already taught yourself that you can have a good time without it.”
If your product delivers 20 % more value than the competitors’ products, you should collect 10 % of that difference in price. If you demand more—or demand it all—the customer actually never gets to enjoy the difference in value. If your value difference is 20 % and your price difference is 20 %, the customer comes out of the deal empty-handed despite the greater value you provide. You offset the entire advantage for the customer by setting the product’s price too high
Thus, to slow time, one only needs to set shorter timelines. If the goal is to get to Hawaii in 15 years, reduce that timeline to 15 months and voilà, put on your flower-shirt.
I learned that evening that rain falls equally on all things.
If there is no reason to do anything, if life is pointless, then there is also no reason to not do anything. What do you have to lose? You’re going to die anyway, so your fears and embarrassments and failures don’t mean anything. You might as well try.
Progress is an improvement in the means that we use for achieving the same old ends. It’s possible that our progress is only of means and not of ends. Do we merely achieve the same desires of 10,000 years ago, but through new, modern means.
Once-in-a-lifetime opportunities aren’t really that rare.
“A clever general, therefore, avoids an army when its spirit is keen, but attacks it when it is sluggish and inclined to return.”
SETH KLARMAN: This is where it is particularly important to remember the teachings of Graham and Dodd. If you look to the markets for a report card, owning a stock that declines every day will make you feel like a failure. But if you remember that you own a fractional interest in a business and that every day you are able to buy in at a greater discount to underlying value, you might just be able to maintain a cheerful disposition. This is exactly how Warren Buffett describes bargain hunting amid the ravages of the 1973 to 1974 bear market.
When we feel that we’re choosing our problems, we feel empowered. When we feel that our problems are being forced upon us against our will, we feel victimized and miserable.
“I promised myself that I wouldn't have a bad day for the rest of my life. If someone was wasting my time, I'd excuse myself and walk away. If a situation bothered me or refused to get resolved, I'd shrug and move on.”
The top 1 percent of third world households account for 70 to 90 percent of all private financial wealth and real estate ownership in their country.
Despite turbulence and other conditions keeping the plane off course 90% of the flight, most flights arrive in the correct destination at the correct time. The reason for this phenomenon is quite simple—through air traffic control and the inertial guidance system, pilots are constantly correcting. Essentially, the plane is on a straight course and keeps getting nudged a degree off course here and pushed a degree or two off course there. When immediately addressed, these course corrections are not hard to manage. However, if a pilot only occasionally checked the course the aircraft could potentially become so far off course that the requisite corrections would take substantial time and resources to execute.
Some of the complex traits that embody human nature: ambition, empathy, and foresight.
Social evolution is an interplay of custom with origination.
Idea: this boldness, in fact, is the only way that humankind advances. Most ideas we propose in our boldest moments are wrong. How could they not be? It’s not as if we are easily capable of thinking up something brilliant in our narrow window of time on earth. However, every now and then, the bold youth develops an idea that completely redefines the world and if we are to make progress, if we are to become better, we must be bold enough and delusional enough to believe that we can have those ideas.
“Meditation is the super power that makes all the other precepts possible.”
The number of securities that should be owned to reduce portfolio risk to an acceptable level is not great; as few as ten to fifteen different holdings usually suffice.
If a task is perceived to be unimportant, it will take enormous amounts of time to complete. Conversely, if a task is perceived to be important, it will get done soon—sometimes immediately, depending on how important and urgent.
The fragmentation of Europe was a key in enabling Columbus to cross the Atlantic. He was turned down by four different kingdoms before finally convincing the king and queen of Spain to fund his trip. Meanwhile, Chona had the technology to explore the world by ship, but their dictator at the time did not want to do so. In this way, one person prevented an entire made of people (with the technology) from succeeding. A little fragmentation is good. Too much centralized power means one person can handcuff the creativity of many.
Laughter is a whip that keeps us in line. It's horrible to be laughed at against your will.
People with dull lives often think that their lives are dull by chance. In reality everyone chooses more or less what kind of events will happen to them by their conscious patterns of blocking and yielding. A student objected to this view by saying, ‘But you don't choose your life. Sometimes you are at the mercy of people who push you around.' I said, ‘Do you avoid such people?' ‘Oh!' she said,'I see what you mean.'
“The average person doesn’t seem herself as average.” One example: 90 percent of motorists consider themselves to be safer than average drivers. Rather than being caused by pure selfishness, this could be an indication of our tendency to believe we are unique and different from others (in good and bad ways).
It is the lack of pecking-order that makes most crowd scenes look unconvincing. The ‘extras' mill about trying to look ‘real',
“A man is rich in proportion to the number of things he can afford to let alone” —Henry David Thoreau
Idea: perhaps our natural wiring to ensure our own survival at all costs is why we are so moved by the act of sacrificing yourself for another. Think: Hodor in Game of Thrones.
Money and power follow attention.
All people behavior differently in different situations. This is true even of babies.
Behavior automaticity (forming habits) is one example of how a behavior can go from conscious to nonconscious and we can't say precisely how.
“Cast a shadow rather than living in one.”
The world is “one great blooming, buzzing confusion.” -William James
Cycle Profit: Adjust rates based on the cycle. (Think: Travel industry rates for low, mid, and high season.)
“50 bits design” refers to the 10 million bits of information our brains process and that only 50 bits of that information is conscious thought.
If progress is real, it is not because we are any richer or wiser than those of the past, but because we are born at a higher level and further up the pedestal of our heritage. We are born with the fruits of a larger portion of human heritage.
To beat the market you must hold an idiosyncratic, or nonconsensus, view.
Create a To-Stop list rather than a To-Do list.
Each of us could have the tally of his future years set before him, as we can of our past years, how alarmed would be those who saw only a few years ahead, and how carefully would they use them!
The pain we feel from a loss is greater than the happiness we feel from a gain, even if the magnitude of the loss and gain themselves is equal.
One of the cleverest tricks to boost sales is to create the perception of scarcity.
Second-level thinking is deep, complex and convoluted. The second-level thinker takes a great many things into account: • What is the range of likely future outcomes? • Which outcome do I think will occur? • What’s the probability I’m right? • What does the consensus think? • How does my expectation differ from the consensus? • How does the current price for the asset comport with the consensus view of the future, and with mine? • Is the consensus psychology that’s incorporated in the price too bullish or bearish? • What will happen to the asset’s price if the consensus turns out to be right, and what if I’m right?
In economic terms, the most important role price plays is in creating a balance between supply and demand.
Caution can help us avoid mistakes, but it can also keep us from great accomplishments.
How to meditate: sit somewhere comfortable, keep a straight spine, focus on a spot, and bring your focus back to your breath whenever you lose it.
The primary geographic axis of North and South America is north-south. That is, the land mass is more longitudinal than latitudinal. The same for Africa. But for Europe and Asia, the primary axis is east-west. Interestingly, this positioning and shape matters greatly because it appears that agriculture and innovations spread more rapidly along east-west axes than along north-south axes.
“Everybody has their own private Mount Everest they were put on this earth to climb. You may never reach the summit; for that you will be forgiven. But if you don't make at least one serious attempt to get above the snow line, years later you will find yourself lying on your deathbed, and all you will feel is emptiness.”
Botox study: hindering the frowning muscles led to reduced rates of depression weeks later.
Application for mental models: Many scientists let the most expensive equipment drive their research and not the most interesting questions. If your lab spends $1 million on a state of the art brain imaging machine, then you tend to get pressured to use it at all times. Every scientific problem gets forced through the lens of one machine. Consider how often we do this with our thinking and our decision making. How often do we let one identity (politics, religion, capitalism, etc.) dictate all of our thinking? (See Paul Graham's “Keep your identity small.”) How often does the highest paid person's mental model win out? (See: HiPPOs.) Be careful to not let investments overpower mental models.
We do not need a “perfect” family or the “ideal” community. The one we have is good enough with which to begin our work.
“A problem that can be fixed by money … is not a problem.”
Make time to just sit. You need relaxing time.
“Just about everyone is working all the time, but we're not making any money.”
If I return safely home from tomorrow’s battle, all the better; but should I not, then turn to these pages whenever you might look for my voice in guidance. I do not want you children to use my untimely death, or any setback that life may deliver, as an excuse not to take responsibility for yourselves.
There are mighty few people who can see any side to a thing except their own side.
In simplicity lies truth. In simplicity lies power.
Make sure you know when you've failed. Measure your progress.
The tricky thing about terminal illness (and life, probably) is your values are constantly changing. You try to figure out what matters to you and then you keep figuring it out.
As long as this root cause remains unaddressed or unresolved, any changes companies make are just doctoring with symptoms rather than finding lasting cures. The path to rational, reasonable, profitable prices often requires the elimination of excess capacity.
My attitude is like Edison's, who found a solvent for rubber by putting bits of rubber in every solution he could think of, and beat all those scientists who were approaching the problem theoretically.
Worry about the possibility of loss. Worry that there’s something you don’t know. Worry that you can make high-quality decisions but still be hit by bad luck or surprise events.
Now we come, as come we must in anything of real consequence, to a seeming contradiction, a paradox.
Humility is the ability to see yourself in the context of a much larger world.
A business is a reflection of the creator.
Put the fat kid in front. Reverse the order so that the processes go from slow to fast.
People are more resilient than they realize.
The anti-mastery mentality is focused on quick fixes. Heart surgery rather than diet and exercise. Lottery tickets rather than retirement savings.
Care about your customers more than yourself. Your company should be willing to go out of business if it's best for your customers.
If there is a difference between what you say and what you do, then your behavior is the winner.
This is how science works: begin with simple, tractable questions that can be answered and will pave the way to the big questions.
Life isn’t about avoiding suffering. The defining characteristic of an organism is striving.
Your brain has 100 billion nerve cells, but only a small subset can be active in any given instant. (How many, exactly?)
If you get the raw end of a business deal or if someone steals from you or if some small misfortune befalls you — don’t fret over it. Such is the price of living in tranquility and not allowing every small setback to ruin your life. It is much better to live this way than to try and squeeze every ounce out of each opportunity for you to get more or get what you are owed.
What’s past is past and can’t be undone. It has led to the circumstances we now face. All we can do is recognize our circumstances for what they are and make the best decisions we can, given the givens.
Buy life insurance. Provide in advance for the protection of your family.
Our response to failure should be, “I am not a failure, but I have made a mistake.”
Anytime you watch someone doing something, the neurons your brain would use to do the same thing become active as if you yourself were doing it.
Johnstone banished aimless discussion from meetings and turned them into enactment sessions. It was what happened that mattered, not what anybody said about it.
Be patient. You've spent years repeating bad behaviors. It's going to take years to build good ones.
Nease studied “decision analysis” at Stanford, which is essentially an engineering approach to economics and rational decision making.
What is your entertainment vs. education ratio? The top 20% of people spend their time focused on education.
Too many people spend their life pursuing things that don't actually make them happy.
If you find yourself doing something extraordinarily well in a random situation, then keep doing what's working but limit your downside. There is nothing wrong with benefitting from randomness so long as you protect yourself from negative random events.
Interestingly, the male brain may prefer blondes over brunettes because it is easier to identify certain ailments like jaundice in a fair blonde complexion than in brunettes. In other words, it's easier to judge if a blonde is a healthy mate.
Our reasons for why we do the things we do are really just conjectures. That's a hard idea to accept. We want to believe we understand ourselves and our motives better than a stranger would, but that doesn't always appear to be the case.
The PKU example showcases how the same problem can appear completely genetic or completely environmental under different conditions.
The Contagion Effect in relationships explains why the people around us influence our own behaviors. (NEJM obesity study, smoking, etc.)
Automatic thinking has five defining features: nonconscious, fast, unintentional, uncontrollable, and effortless.
Have something to say. Say it. Stop talking.
The more exposed we are to opposing viewpoints, the more we seem to get upset that those other viewpoints exist. This seems like a logical trend to me because before the internet and our hyper-connected modern world, people didn’t have as much likelihood of running into ideas that disagreed with their own. Today, alternate ideas are far more likely to cross your radar screen.
People who can adjust away from this natural, self-centered setting are often described as “well-adjusted.”
It is only when investors shun high-risk investments, thereby depressing their prices, that an incremental return can be earned which more than fully compensates for the risk incurred. By itself risk does not create incremental return; only price can accomplish that.
Pascal: “the optimal strategy for humans is to believe in the existence of God. For, if God exists, then the believer will be rewarded. If God does not exist, the believer will have nothing to lose.”
Scientific ideas can never be proven. They can only be disproven.
Dave Ramsey: personal finance is 80 percent behavior.
But putting things off is the biggest waste of life: it snatches away each day as it comes, and denies us the present by promising the future.
If you're struggling to find time and space for old and new habits, then let your old habits slide while you build the new ones. Once the new habit becomes routine you will be more likely to fall back into the routine with the old habits because you already had it mastered previously.
One piece of feedback said he was, “The most serious booking error in the history of Los Angeles music.”
Most people don't care enough about profitability.
The Russians have a saying which sums this up: “In every market there are two kinds of fools. One charges too much, the other charges too little.”
Writing evolved independently in a few areas, but was spread via idea diffusion in most cultures and locations.
“The goal of this audiobook is to help you understand why we do what we do and to equip you with practical tools and a set of principles that you can use to change behavior for the better.”
“If you have anything to work out with your parents, do it now. One day it will be too late.”
Successful people believe they are in control. They don't see themselves as victims of the world.
“Supreme excellence consists in breaking the enemy’s resistance without fighting.”
Everlasting misfortune does have one blessing, that it ends up by toughening those whom it constantly afflicts.
Idea: even Plato said that “a certain portion of the population” did not believe in God. So there were probably many proposals and creations that went against God. Many wild gambles that failed. But it was only after science was created that we had a wild gamble that proved worthy of the battle.
If you believe that science provides no basis for God, then you are almost obligated to conclude that science provides no basis for meaning and, therefore, life itself doesn’t have any.
The best teachers are the ones who have discovered how to involve each student actively in the process of learning.
Conventional self-help advice which tells you to visualize success and think about the type of person you want to be only reinforces the idea that you are not that thing.
The human brain is wired for inattention and inertia.
Premium pricing means offering higher value and demanding a premium price in return.
Humans will always be nobler than the universe. Despite dying after a mere blip of time, we know of our existence while the universe knows nothing of its longevity.
The most dangerous investment conditions generally stem from psychology that’s too positive.
Habit, routine, and too much consistency numb our minds and pave the road for us to sleepwalk through our lives.
The natural default setting is to think I am at the center of the world and my immediate needs and feelings are what should determine the world’s priorities.
The largest hurdle in freemium models is getting customers over this initial price barrier, or getting them to cross the “penny gap .” The challenge for the publishers is to draw customers away from the “free” culture and to establish their digital content as a paid experience.
If your behavior is conventional, you’re likely to get conventional results—either good or bad.
This is the experience of the successful. To them, life is normal. Not worrying about time, money, or volatile relationships is just how life is. The newness has long since worn off. However, even they have moments where they wake up and cannot believe how far they have come.
Psychologists have found that the ability to experience joy has a ceiling effect.
Use the opt-out approach only when there will not be a ton of people wanting to opt-out.
What happened to Paul was tragic, but he was not a tragedy.
Entrepreneurial Profit: Operate lean and avoid all the wasted resources that major corporations can afford to have. We can't afford to “subside non-entrepreneurial behavior.”
The essence of boredom is to be found in the obsessive search for novelty. Satisfaction lies in mindful repetition, the discovery of endless richness as subtle variations on familiar themes.
“It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it.” -Aristotle
When you act or speak spontaneously, you reveal your real self, as opposed to the self you've been trained to present.
People who think “I will be happy when…” are speeding up their time rather than slowing it down. In other words, they believe that once they accomplish a certain task or goal, only then will time slow. If we could learn how to get to where we want instantaneously, we could learn the truth that happiness is now. Time can slow now.
“It was easy to be great. Every entertainer has a night when everything is clicking. These nights are accidental and statistical. Like lucky cards in poker, you can count on them occurring over time. What was hard was to be good. Consistently good. Night after night. No matter what the abominable circumstances.”
The aim of this book is not originality, but inclusiveness.
Your life is your responsibility, and you always have the choice to do your best.
Take profit first. You can’t grow out of your profit problem. You need to fix profit first, then grow.
One of the central needs of humans is to control things. Enacting control over your own life is a source of pleasure.
Almost without exception, those who are masters are dedicated to the fundamentals of their calling. At the same time, they are the ones most likely to challenge their previous limits.
The more we know, the more we may earn. The person who seeks to know more of their craft is capable of earning more.
When choosing a slipstream to enter, it is crucial to be mindful. Destinations, as well as paths, must be chosen wisely.
It is hard to get a sense of the quality of one’s own age. We usually know more about a previous age’s achievements than their faults. Meanwhile, we usually know more about our faults and downplay our achievements. This makes comparison between ages difficult.
Main lesson: you can do a lot worse than questioning your flaws. We often get so defensive about these things, but what do we really have to lose? Usually, very little.
Alfred Russell Wallace independently discovered natural selection. He deserves more credit than he gets.
History as it is usually lived is different from history as it is usually written. By definition, historians focus on the exceptional.
Good ideas have self-expanding qualities. When someone sees it, they naturally tell you what should be added and how to make it better.
Gratitude is acknowledging there are people in your life who have done things for you that you couldn't do for yourself.
It is the framework of scarcity — the belief that it exists — that causes divisions between people, not actual scarcity.
Always ask yourself, “What is in it for this person?” Why would they want to attend this dinner?
You simply cannot create investment opportunities when they’re not there. The dumbest thing you can do is to insist on perpetuating high returns—and give back your profits in the process. If it’s not there, hoping won’t make it so.
Be the gatekeeper of your network: If you’re asked to do introductions, then always get “double opt-in” from both people. There should be a strong and compelling outcome to each intro. Ask people, “What is your desired outcome from this connection?”
It is the act of choosing your values and living by them that makes you great, not any outcome or accomplishment.
In the long run, the war against mastery, the path to patient, dedicated effort without attachment to immediate results, is a war that can’t be won.
“You cannot be really good at your work if your work is all you are.”
Tracking your progress and missteps is key for long-term success.
Being mindful doesn’t change the problems in your life. You still need to take action, but the key is that mindfulness allows you to respond rather than react to the problems in your life.
Reason 1: Continental differences in the plants and animals available for domestication. The differences are vast. Europe and Asia had the best prospects, then Africa, then the Americas, then Australia. The improved agricultural aspects led to larger populations and larger armies in Europe and Asia.
Idea: pursuing the path to mastery requires a certain type of mindset and willingness to work. This is likely influenced by genetics just as our physical abilities are influenced by genetics. People often say something to the effect of, “I’ve seen so many talented athletes with God-given ability who just didn’t want to work hard. They faded away.” These statements are overlooking the fact that psychological abilities are largely fixed too. The odds that someone has the peak physical abilities (“God-given talent”) AND the peak mental abilities (willingness to work hard) are incredibly low. Thus, you would expect the people to perform the best who are very high on mental abilities and high enough on physical abilities.
Everything is a myth. It’s not only impossible, it’s ridiculous. You can’t have it all.
Graham was only interested in buying at a substantial discount from underlying value. By investing at a discount, he knew that he was unlikely to experience losses. The discount provided a margin of safety.
The environment of ancient Polynesian society heavily dictated the lifestyle and behaviors. The many islands have widely varying landscapes and climates. Whether or not cultures developed weapons and became skilled at warfare, whether they became hunter gatherers or farmers, whether they acted more tribal or more hierarchical was largely determined by the environment in which these people lived.
Small choices + consistency + time = significant results.
We all have invisible doors in our direct proximity that will transport us decades into our best futures.
People who might be perfectly happy with their lot in isolation become miserable when they see others do better.
Durability bias: we don't realize just how resilient we are. People have a far greater ability to bounce back than they assume.
Don't follow the pack. Lead the pack.
Professional tennis is a “winner’s game,” in which the match goes to the player who’s able to hit the most winners: fast-paced, well-placed shots that an opponent can’t return.
Nobody wins when you diminish the importance of success.
How a knight lives is what is important, not on which particular afternoon he was born or on which specific morning he might die.
If you start out thinking there is a “good” and a “bad” approach to anything, then you are clouding you judgment. You have to release your attachment to certain sides of the argument and start with a blank slate if you want to discover the truth.
Learn things yourself. It will take longer, but it is nice to be self sufficient. There is joy in learning and doing.
How much does one minute cost on your mobile phone plan? How much do you pay for 1 kWh of electricity? How much does your daily commute cost you? It is hard to answer these questions spontaneously, because for many goods and services, prices have many dimensions.
There are different levels of processing within the brain. Wilson refers to them as the low road and high road. Kahneman calls them System 1 and System 2. The point is the same: we have a collection of processes that respond quickly and automatically. And we have a collection of processes that respond slowly, thoughtfully, and often adjust the reactions of the fast processing level.
How can investors be certain of achieving a margin of safety? By always buying at a significant discount to underlying business value and giving preference to tangible assets over intangibles. (This does not mean that there are not excellent investment opportunities in businesses with valuable intangible assets.) By replacing current holdings as better bargains come along. By selling when the market price of any investment comes to reflect its underlying value and by holding cash, if necessary, until other attractive investments become available.
“Big Data,” the analysis of large amounts of data about transactions on an individual basis, opens up fantastic new opportunities for person-specific price differentiation. Interesting here is the question of whether consumers should occasionally order a very inexpensive product, in order to convey a high level of price sensitivity to the seller. This could trigger advertisements for special offers and attractive prices—a new kind of cat-and-mouse game.
“Anything systematized becomes sterile very soon.”
Actively practicing something is very different from passively learning.
“By increments so exquisitely gradual that they might have passed unnoticed, I could have ended up being totally untrue to myself and living a life I hated.”
There are three steps to gently return himself to self-love each day: 1) Mental loop, 2) Meditation, 3) One Question.
The seven varieties of intelligence: linguistic, musical, logical/mathematical, spatial, bodily/kinesthetic, intrapersonal, interpersonal.
From nature’s standpoint, we are all born unfree and unequal.
Even when a company does achieve high margins, it still needs to sell enough units to make a high profit.
Hundreds of thousands of years ago, the world was local and linear. Humans were hunter gatherers, with limited goals, living in limited space. Consequently, our brains have evolved to think locally and linearly. However, today’s world is global and exponential.
“Pricing is guesswork. It is usually assumed that marketers use scientific methods to determine the price of their products. Nothing could be further from the truth. In almost every case, the process of decision is one of guesswork.”
The conductor can lead the most powerful orchestra in the world, but does not make a sound. His or her only power is in getting the players to produce the beautiful sound they are capable of.
Do not complain of all the bad things that have happened to you. It is not of interest to others.
“Experience is what you got when you didn’t get what you wanted.”
Vision is so incredibly powerful for living creatures that it evolved separately in different species.
The biggest business problem is obscurity.
Their research revealed two success guidelines, which they referred to as “better before cheaper” and “revenue before cost.”
The ability to think about and plan for the future endows human with a tremendous survival advantage, but can be a two-edged sword if our conscious decisions conflict with our nonconscious desires.
Those who cannot easily forgive will not collect many friends. Look for the best in others and yourself.
“Work hard. Keep at it. Live simply and quietly. Remain humble. Stay positive. Create your own luck. Be nice. Be polite.”
Persons under 30 should never trust the economic, political, and moral ideas of other persons under 30.
A true pro gets paid, but doesn’t work for money. A true pro works for love.
What if you don’t believe it? Doesn’t matter. Your role is to lay down the pathway for doing it. Connect the neurons and your body and mind will respond automatically.
Experience Curve Profit: Experience in serving the market results in lower transaction costs and, eventually, higher profit.
A corporate liquidation typically connotes business failure; but ironically, it may correspond with investment success. The reason is that the liquidation or breakup of a company is a catalyst for the realization of underlying business value. Since value investors attempt to buy securities trading at a considerable discount from the value of a business’s underlying assets, a liquidation is one way for investors to realize profits.
The time other investors spend delving into the last unanswered detail may cost them the chance to buy in at prices so low that they offer a margin of safety despite the incomplete information.
When used as prescribed, the pill has a failure rate (i.e. unintended pregnancy) of only 1%. But in the real world, people delay getting prescriptions, forget to take it, etc. and the failure rate jumps to 9%. Meanwhile, implantable contraceptives (known as “long-acting reversible contraceptive methods”) have a failure rate in the real world of less than 1%. That is, they make contraception happen automatically everyday in the future once the decision to use them have been made. This technological fix makes the right behaviors automatic by shifting it to a one-time decision that bypasses our daily inattention and inertia.
Premium pricers invest heavily in communication: They know that they have to make the value and advantages of their products perceptible and understandable to consumers. Remember: only perceived value counts.
On mastery in relationships: In today’s world two partners are rarely willing to live indefinitely on an unchanging plateau. When your tennis partner starts improving his or her game and you don’t, the game eventually breaks up. The same thing applies to relationships.
Education’s a good deal like eating—a fellow can’t always tell which particular thing did him good, but he can usually tell which one did him harm.
If it feels like it’s you versus the world, chances are it’s really just you versus yourself.
“We’re more likely to look for and find a positive view of things we’re stuck with than of things we’re not.”
Pricing is about how people divide up value.
You don't really know what you want until you start doing it.
Customer satisfaction is not nearly as big of a problem as “non-customer satisfaction.” People not knowing you exist and not buying your product is the real issue.
A margin of safety is necessary because valuation is an imprecise art, the future is unpredictable, and investors are human and do make mistakes.
Demosthenes: “Nothing is easier than self-deceit. For what each man wishes, that he also believes to be true.”
When you listen to someone make them feel like they are the only person in the room. Devote your attention to them.
You were born owning nothing and with nothing you will pass out of this life. Be frugal and you can be generous.
When you make a mistake, don’t make the second one—keeping it to yourself. Own up. The time to sort out rotten eggs is at the nest.
Let our sons and daughters be punished when they break the law, but let us believe in them when they open their hearts.
“You are neither possession nor speech.” If you have more money, then you’re just richer than someone not better than them. If you are more eloquent than someone, then you are just better spoken not a better person.
Maintain physical fitness. It contributes enormous energy to our lives.
Skewness and expectations: you can't just look at the odds of something happening, but also the payoff you receive if it works (and the cost of it failing). A bet on something very unlikely can be smart if the payoff is large and you have rules to limit the many small losses that are likely.
Even relatively safe investments entail some probability, however small, of downside risk. The deleterious effects of such improbable events can best be mitigated through prudent diversification. The number of securities that should be owned to reduce portfolio risk to an acceptable level is not great; as few as ten to fifteen different holdings usually suffice.
The technique of disseminating heritage and absorbing it has grown incredibly over time. Culture is developing a tighter strangle hold on our behavior than ever before. One way to explain this is to say that there is far more to learn and inherit than there was even 100 years ago. The wealth of human knowledge increases with each passing year and endows a slightly greater advantage to those born today than those born yesterday.
Small insight: during his rise to fame Martin was always surprised by the size of his crowds. One possible interpretation was that he was relatively unaware of how many people each venue could hold, which meant he didn't handle the booking and business side of things. This seems obvious, but it is a critical point: he was 100 percent focused on his craft.
Ancient Eastern wisdom: “Before enlightenment, chop wood and carry water. After enlightenment, chop wood and carry water.”
Meditation helps you shut down your monkey mind for a moment.
The striking differences in the histories of peoples on different continents have been due not to differences among the peoples themselves, but to differences in their environments.
If you create goals for yourself that have friction with your values, you're going to self-sabotage or feel guilty about your progress. For example, if your family is a high priority, but you set high financial goals for yourself then there is friction between those two goals. (Note: this is basically identity-based habits. You can't have friction between your identity and your goals.)
Geography is the matrix of history. If you live on the coast, you will almost inevitably become an addict of the sea.
“As I continued to work, my material grew. I came up with odd little gags, such as, “How many people have never raised their hands before?” I was now capable of doing two different 25-minute sets per evening in case some of the audience stayed for the second show.”
Subject lines in invitation emails are really important. Some examples: 1) “Hey Tim, I’m in town…” 2) “Adam told me to reach out to you…” 3) “Jon, I’m doing a dinner with a group of entrepreneurs…”
The five keys to mastery: Instruction, Practice, Surrender, Intentionality, and The Edge.
Self-esteem, by itself, is overrated. It doesn’t help to feel good about yourself unless you have a good reason for feeling that way. The struggle makes self-esteem useful, not the participation trophy.
It's a difficult standard to demand that you can actually implement ideas and not merely share them (there have been many brilliant philosophers and scientists who have had great ideas they didn't personally use), but is an idea really that great if you can stick to it? Obviously, everyone has different skills and circumstances, so maybe someone can use your idea even if you can't. But generally speaking, I think you should be able to live out the ideas you share.
As a resident, my highest ideal was not saving lives—everyone dies eventually—but guiding a patient or family to an understanding of death or illness.
In matters of great importance, trust your own gut. Don’t be fooled, and don’t be hurried. There is plenty of time to make mistakes.
Expectations about how the value lasts will have a decisive influence on a customer’s willingness to pay for luxury goods, consumer durables, and cars.
Fascinating: before Freud and behaviorism, clinical psychology books didn't even talk about parental impact on children. It wasn't until Freud that parental nurture exploded onto the scene.
Only quit habits when you no longer want to quit. The time when you have lots of emotional benefit from quitting is the beginning.
You have to choose what you pay attention to and choose how you construct meaning from experience.
Successful price differentiation requires the ability to separate customers effectively according to their willingness to pay
Absolute-performance-oriented investors, by contrast, are willing to hold cash reserves when no bargains are available. Cash is liquid and provides a modest, sometimes attractive nominal return, usually above the rate of inflation. The liquidity of cash affords flexibility, for it can quickly be channeled into other investment outlets with minimal transaction costs. Finally, unlike any other holding, cash does not involve any risk of incurring opportunity cost (losses from the inability to take advantage of future bargains) since it does not drop in value during market declines.
Civilization is made possible by self-restraint. It is clear that freedom is made possible by boundaries of some sort. If we cross those boundaries, we have chaos not civilization.
Pursuing something only reinforces that you lack it in the first place.
Each day, the author listens to a 7-minute piece of music that he likes and thinks, “I love myself.”
Counterintuitive insight by Baumeister regarding evil: some of the worst criminals often felt good about themselves. Low self-esteem was not always associated with evil acts.
For most investors absolute returns are the only ones that really matter; you cannot, after all, spend relative performance.
The four drivers of self-interest: money, power, status, popularity.
The men who can manage men manage the men who can manage only things and the men who can manage money manage all.
Calendar habits: the critical component of a calendar habit is getting everything on the calendar. If you don't keep every single event on the calendar then you can't trust it and that defeats the purpose.
Avoid trying to reach other people cold. Get warm intros. It will massively improve the success rate of invitations. Always check FB and LinkedIn for common connections. (Also, ask your network for help with intros.)
“You have to find a way of working that makes it dead easy to take full advantage of your inspired moments. They never hit at a convenient time, nor do they last long.”
“What the wise man does in the beginning, the fool does in the end.”
It’s all right when you are calling on a girl or talking with friends after dinner to run a conversation like a Sunday-school excursion, with stops to pick flowers; but in the office your sentences should be the shortest distance possible between periods.
People like to think they are a little special. Without this bit of vanity, we might find it harder to push forward. In a way, delusion is a motivator.
The laws of money are like the laws of gravity: assured and unchanging.
The obsessive pursuit of the wrong goals—customer counts, revenue, and market share —leads even the sharpest managers to neglect the effects that discounts and promotions have on profits.
The regions of the brain are not cleanly divided in their roles and functions, but rather work together in a remarkable fashion. They are strongly linked and some regions can even take over functions for damaged areas. There is much redundancy among the brain areas.
Most of us are pretty average at most things we do. Even if you’re exceptional at one thing, chances are you’re average or below average at most other things.
The Toaster Project was when one man tried to build a toaster from scratch and realized the insane levels of complexity required.
When profit comes first, it is the focus, and it is never forgotten.
There is comfort in consensus; those in the majority gain confidence from their very number.
Value investing is the discipline of buying securities at a significant discount from their current underlying values and holding them until more of their value is realized.
Price is likely to serve as an indicator of quality when buyers are uncertain about a product’s underlying quality. This happens when they are confronted with a product that is entirely new to them or one which they rarely buy.
Every advance in agriculture and food production is eventually nullified by the increase in number of mouths to feed.
Reach up in your relationships. Find people better than you.
“It’s only when we can’t change our experience that we look for ways to change our view of the experience.”
There is nothing wrong with losing. The problem is losing more than you plan to lose. You need clear rules that limit your downside. (“If any investment loses one million dollars then our firm sells immediately.”)
This book offers a startling reminder that debt is the new form of prison. Entire countries are handicapped by their debt to the United States and other major players.
“Savor obscurity while it lasts. Once you make it your work is never the same.”
Treasury bills are the closest thing to a riskless investment; hence the interest rate on Treasury bills is considered the risk-free rate.
The only intelligent response to the ongoing gift of life is gratitude.
Your thoughts and actions are the reason you are where you are right now.
An added attraction of investing in riskarbitrage situations, bankruptcies, and liquidations is that not only is one’s initial investment returned to cash, one’s profits are as well. Another way to limit opportunity cost is through hedging. A hedge is an investment that is expected to move in a direction opposite that of another holding so as to cushion any price decline. If the hedge becomes valuable, it can be sold, providing funds to take advantage of newly created opportunities. (Hedging is discussed in greater depth in chapter 13.) Conclusion The primary goal of value investors is to avoid losing money. Three elements of a value-investment strategy make achievement of that goal possible. A bottom-up approach, searching for low-risk bargains one at a time through fundamental analysis, is the surest way I know to avoid losing money. An absolute-performance orientation
A man who does big things is too busy to talk about them.
an analysis of cash flow would better capture the true economics of a business
By identifying where the most attractive opportunities are likely to arise before starting one’s quest for the exciting handful of specific investments, investors can spare themselves an often fruitless survey of the humdrum majority of available investments.
I imagine many people could have achieved wisdom if they had not imagined they had already achieved it, if they had not dissembled about some of their own characteristics and turned a blind eye to others.
There are three ways to test ideas about peak shift (and other supernormal stimuli). 1) Galvanic skin response (GSR) tests, 2) recording nerve impulses from single nerve cells in the visual area in the brain, 3) utilizing your “laws” or hypotheses to create more reliable, consistent, or successful results.
Mastery is practice. Mastery is staying on the path.
Democracy has done less harm and more good than any other form of government.
In many ways, children do not imitate their parents. They don't drive cars, light matches, leave home whenever they please, and so on. You'll also notice many kids of immigrants don't have accents while their parents do.
Create time alone with yourself. When seeking the wisdom and clarity of your own mind, silence is a helpful tool. The voice of our spirit is gentle and cannot be heard when it has to compete with others. Just as it is impossible to see your reflection in troubled water, so too is it with the soul.
You can’t do the same things others do and expect to outperform.
People care a lot about the bio on an author's page.
To push my own progress, I chose to surround myself with people several decades (literally) older than me. I made friends with people who were near retirement or already retired. I began to see movies with them, hang out at their houses, and engage in their same activities. I wanted to learn now what took them an entire lifetime of experience to learn. I gradually reduced my time with people my own age, recognizing they were at best, in the same boat I was in, and therefore had less experience and wisdom to offer.
View work as the original social network. Just how negative and positive emotions can spread virally online, they can do the same in the office.
Momentum is huge. Objects in motion tend to stay in motion.
“Twice, then quit.” The first time you want to quit, don't. Push through. The second time you want to quit, don't. Push through again. The third time you want to quit, then you can stop.
In learning anything, first you should learn the principles, then you should learn the method.
In general, you should put little stock in correlation research and trust experiments much more. (Most child psychology research is correlational. Child psychologists usually look for trends rather than setting up experiments.)
After 12 years of performing, he finally reached the point where he could afford to only do one show per night rather than three, four, or five shows per night scattered across town.
It is very possible that religion has enabled humans to collaborate all throughout history and make civilization possible.
We drastically underestimate the fact that children are born different. We do not appreciate the genetic differences enough.
Know, then, that every condition can change, and whatever happens to anyone can happen to you too.
It’s frightening to think that you might not know something, but more frightening to think that, by and large, the world is run by people who have faith that they know exactly what’s going on. AMOS TVERSKY
All significant learning is composed of brief spurts of progress followed by long periods of work where if feels as if you’re going nowhere.
“It is the act of an ill-instructed man to blame others for his own bad condition.” Your opinion of things is what makes them good or bad. You are responsible for your own opinions, thoughts, and feelings.
Identify your triggers for your bad habits: the who, what, where, and when that prompts you to start your bad habits.
The image here is of the efficient-market-believing finance professor who takes a walk with a student. “Isn’t that a $10 bill lying on the ground?” asks the student. “No, it can’t be a $10 bill,” answers the professor. “If it were, someone would have picked it up by now.” The professor walks away, and the student picks it up and has a beer.
According to Tomkins, the legacy of Duchamp is about freedom from tradition and dogmas of any kind.
Mirror neurons also allow you to imitate the skills of others, which makes it possible for us to inherit the skills and culture of others.
All beliefs are wrong—some are just less wrong than others.
Throughout the industrial revolution in Great Britain, moths of darker colors became more likely to survive because the surrounding environment become dirtier and covered in soot, smoke, and debris. Thus, it was more likely that dark-colored moths would survive than light-colored moths. As the environment changed, so did the evolution of moths. A fascinating example of evolution on a small scale.
The brain has multiple layers of communication between neurons. If you see someone experiencing pain but your skin receptors do not experience pain, then your body knows it is not happening to you and so you empathize with that person rather than actually feel their pain.
Harris acknowledges that, although free will does not exist, we can create a framework for our choices which makes certain outcomes more likely than others. For example, you can remove all candy from your house to reduce the odds of eating sweets. Whether you feel the urge to eat sweets, however, is not something you have control over. Your “wants” simply are. They are not things you control.
Continue to explore and grow! Even when things are good.
If you don't see yourself as particularly creative, then that is a self imposed limitation. Only you can decide if you carry that limitation around with you forever.
Phase transitions can occur in society as well. The rise of the Internet, new political orders, etc.
Most people overestimate how terrible traumatic events will actually be. For example, quadriplegics and earthquake victims generally rate themselves as much happier than people would ever imagine.
Jack had enthusiasm, and enthusiasm is the best shortening for any job; it makes heavy work light.
The liquidation value of a business is a conservative assessment of its worth in which only tangible assets are considered and intangibles, such as going-concern value, are not.
I might then begin to insert a tentative ‘er' at the beginning of each of my sentences, and ask the group if they detect any change in me. They say that I look ‘helpless' and ‘weak' but they can't, interestingly enough, say what I'm doing that's different. I don't normally begin every sentence with ‘er', so it should be very obvious. Then I move the ‘er' into the middle of sentences, and they say that they perceive me as becoming a little stronger.
The reality is that past security price volatility does not reliably predict future investment performance (or even future volatility) and therefore is a poor measure of risk.
When we receive our monthly statement and see that long list of transactions, the effect of any individual transaction gets watered down. This also hurts less.
Overall, heredity accounts for approximately 50 percent of behavioral differences among people. Environment accounts for the other 50 percent.
There were some remarkable brain studies conducted in Australia, which used TMS (transcranial magnetic stimulation) to deactivate parts of normal people's brains for a few moments. Almost instantly they could draw better or perform mathematical feats. This supports The Isolation Principle.
Horsemanship—virtually every task I can think of is aided by an awareness of breath. It is the connective tissue of the universe, binding all living creatures together. By focusing on our breath, we are able to more adeptly inhabit our bodies and function on instinct.
Many teachers think of children as immature adults. It might lead to better and more ‘respectful' teaching, if we thought of adults as atrophied children. Many ‘well adjusted' adults are bitter, uncreative frightened, unimaginative, and rather hostile people. Instead of assuming they were born that way, or that that's what being an adult entails, we might consider them as people damaged by their education and upbringing.
When people are unsure of how they feel, they often understand their emotions based on their bodily responses in that moment (think: love on the bridge study).
Rule #6: Don’t take yourself so damn seriously.
The three bones in the inner ear of mammals – the malleus, incus, and stapes – actually evolved from the jaws of reptiles, which have three bones in their jaw rather than the one bone (mandible) in mammals. It's fascinating how many functions in the body would never have been designed that way from scratch, but just resulted from “works for now” evolutionary adaptations.
The more value you place on your own happiness, the more likely you are to feel lonely. If you spend your time seeking your own happiness then you end up feeling more shallow or self-absorbed. Meaning, however, makes you feel better by giving yourself to a cause bigger than yourself.
Stocks are cheapest when everything looks grim.
Sellers have some leeway in setting prices. This leeway can be substantial if the product is innovative or even unique.
But there is one critical difference: investments throw off cash flow for the benefit of the owners; speculations do not.4 The return to the owners of speculations depends exclusively on the vagaries of the resale market.
People will say, “success isn't everything.” No shit. Of course success isn't everything. But it is important. And diminishing that importance with saying like “success isn't everything” gives you an excuse to limit your vision of success for yourself and the actions you take.
As much as we want to “keep it simple, stupid” … It is precisely the simplification of issues that are actually very complex, which can be dangerous.
“Because I was generally unknown, in the smaller venues I was free to gamble with material.”
The author, Bob Nease, was an engineer and this book was a result of many experiments not only on himself, but also on large populations.
“You must assume that we, your readers, are bright and attentive, even if we have lost the tiniest bit of ground in the last few years. So we are going to catch you if you try to fake it.”
Seek out feedback and learn from your mistakes as you go along.
Suppose Mozart had tried to be original? It would have been like a man at the North Pole trying to walk north, and this is true of all the rest of us. Striving after originality takes you far away from your true self, and makes your work mediocre.
According to one research study, doubling your income only increases happiness by 9 percent.
Most theories are stated in a way that doesn’t even allow them to be tested or proven wrong. This isn’t really science. It’s just conjecture. Science requires you to state a hypothesis (or theory) and then develop an experimental way of testing to see if it is confirmed or refuted.
Life is very short and anxious for those who forget the past, neglect the present, and fear the future.
Identical twins raised on the same home are no more alike than identical twins raised in different homes. Both sets of twins have small personalities and small differences. It appears genetics accounts for nearly all the differences.
Prices are the central hinges of a market economy. Think about it: every dollar of revenue and profit that a company generates is the direct or indirect result of a price decision.
Your friends love you for who you are right now. Good ideas alter the power balance in relationships because they mean you become something new. You friends may not want to grow with you. This is why good ideas are always initially resisted.
Any goal you set is going to be difficult to achieve, so why not set them higher from the beginning?
Caricatures are an example of supernormal stimuli in human art. Caricatures amplifying the features of a given face. Also, many female sculptures have exaggerated breasts and hips, which seems to be preferred by our brains.
Cereal crops alone account for more than half of the food consumed by modern humans.
“Consider education not as a painful accumulation of facts and dates and reigns, nor merely the necessary preparation of the individual to earn his keep in the world, but as a transmission of our mental, moral, technical, and aesthetic heritage. As fully as possible to as many as possible for the embellishment of man’s understanding, control, and enjoyment of life. The heritage that we can now more fully transmit is richer than ever before. It is richer than that of Pericles, for it includes the Greek following that followed him. Richer than Leonardo’s for it includes him and the Italian renaissance. Richer than Voltaire for it embraces all the French enlightenment and its ecumenical dissemination.” -Will Durant
“Making an employee work and profiting from that work are two different things.”
information generally follows the well-known 80/20 rule: the first 80 percent of the available information is gathered in the first 20 percent of the time spent. The value of in-depth fundamental analysis is subject to diminishing marginal returns.
This is what my students do all the time. I ask them for an idea and they say ‘. .. oh . . . aahh . .. um …' as if they couldn't think of one. The brain constructs the universe for us, so how is it possible to be ‘stuck' for an idea? The student hesitates not because he doesn't have an idea, but to conceal the inappropriate ones that arrive uninvited.
Good idea: having dinner with the family each night is a form of practice, one that you can commit to just as passionately as practicing your craft.
The deciphering of the genetic code in the 1950s marked the birth of modern biology.
Definition of mastery: the mysterious process during which what is at first difficult becomes progressively easier and more pleasurable through practice.
When trying something new, do it on a scale where failure is survivable.
Qualia (your subjective experience) and the self are different things, but you can’t get qualia without a self.
Interesting: we seek to make sense of and explain extreme negative and positive events in our lives, but in the process of doing so we reduce the novelty, surprise, and emotional power of the event. Gradually the extraordinary becomes ordinary and loses its emotional impact.
The body has reflexes that protect it from attack. We have a ‘fear-crouch' position in which the shoulders lift to protect the jugular and the body curls forward to protect the underbelly. It's more effective against carnivores than against policemen jabbing at your kidneys, but it evolved a long time ago. The opposite to this fear crouch is the ‘cherub posture', which opens all the planes of the body: the head turns and tilts to offer the neck, the shoulders turn the other way to expose the chest, the spine arches slightly backwards and twists so that the pelvis is in opposition to the shoulders exposing the underbelly—and so on. This is the position I usually see cherubs carved in, and the opening of the body planes is a sign of vulnerability and tenderness, and has a powerful effect on the onlooker. High-status people often adopt versions of the cherub posture. If they feel under attack they'll abandon it and straighten, but they won't adopt the fear crouch. Challenge a low-status player and he'll show some tendency to slide into postures related to the fear crouch.
Unlike return, however, risk is no more quantifiable at the end of an investment than it was at its beginning. Risk simply cannot be described by a single number.
In this kind of life you will find much that is worth your study: the love and practice of the virtues, forgetfulness of the passions, the knowledge of how to live and die, and a life of deep tranquillity.
Experience and awareness are closely related but not the same. Experience refers to partaking in an event. Awareness refers to being cognizant that the event is happening.
Humans have an incredible capacity for language. It is one of the traits that separates us most clearly from the rest of the animal kingdom.
Medicine and technology nullify natural selection by keeping the unfit alive.
By 1979, he was already booked for the next two years.
I'd argue that a director should never demonstrate anything to an actor, that a director should allow the actor to make his own discoveries, that the actor should think he'd done all the work himself. I objected to the idea that the director should work out the moves before the production started. I said that if an actor forgot a move that had been decided on, then the move was probably wrong.
One interesting take on why the decline of religion is quite bad: if religion is the shared belief that unifies a civilization and that belief system dies, then what will hold the civilization together?
Should Nature demand back what she previously entrusted to us we shall say to her too: ‘Take back my spirit in better shape than when you gave it. I do not quibble or hang back: I am willing for you to have straightway what you gave me before I was conscious – take it.’ What is the harm in returning to the point whence you came? He will live badly who does not know how to die well. So we must first strip off the value we set on this thing and reckon the breath of life as something cheap. To quote Cicero, we hate gladiators if they are keen to save their life by any means; we favour them if they openly show contempt for it. You must realize that the same thing applies to us: for often the cause of dying is the fear of it.
A person choosing to spend large portions of time in an unsatisfying job in order to make ends meet is on a fast track to his deathbed.
You don’t need to play the measurement game. You can play the possibility game. You can live in The Possibility World.
“When you see an object, it seems that you see it as an entire thing first, and only afterwards do its details follow on. But for people with autism, the details jump straight out at us first of all, and then only gradually, detail by detail, does the whole image float up into focus.”
Write shitty first drafts.
The perfect size for your business? It will happen naturally, when you take your profit first.
Ramachandran conducts an interesting exercise in class where people must rank three drawings of a horse. One drawn by an autistic seven year old is often preferred to one down by Leonardo DaVinci. (The three pictures.)
It is not that we have a short time to live, but that we waste a lot of it. Life is long enough, and a sufficiently generous amount has been given to us for the highest achievements if it were all well invested.
“Even if I’m dying, until I actually die, I’m still living.”
People who spend on other people end up happier AND it makes someone else happy too.
There is a link with status transactions here, since low-status players tend to accept, and high-status players to block. High-status players will block any action unless they feel they can control it.
Many futures are possible, to paraphrase Dimson, but only one future occurs.
Daily absorption in your work is more important than your paycheck.
Those who use blame as a reason for not achieving success will never be successful. Victim thinking doesn't benefit you.
Every life, every society, and every species is an experiment. It all ends in death eventually.
Human nature is the fundamental feelings and tendencies of humankind.
People who are terrified of what others think about them are actually terrified of all the negative things they think about themselves being reflected back at them.
The basic reality is competition. If you are not competing in life, what would you develop? A certain degree of competition is necessary not only for progress, but also for survival.
You should think carefully about getting more insurance / shielding yourself from events that — although unlikely — could be catastrophic. You essentially want to insulate yourself from terrible random accidents.
Our natural setting is to be deeply and literally self-centered. There’s no experience you’ve had that you were not at the absolute center of. We see the whole world through this lens.
Like other aspects of personality, self-esteem is tied to the social context through which it was acquired. A person can feel good about herself with friends and bad about herself at home, or vice versa.
But the tennis the rest of us play is a “loser’s game,” with the match going to the player who hits the fewest losers. The winner just keeps the ball in play until the loser hits it into the net or off the court. In other words, in amateur tennis, points aren’t won; they’re lost.
It is easy to stray but a continuous effort to remain disciplined.
Successful investing requires thoughtful attention to many separate aspects, all at the same time. Omit any one and the result is likely to be less than satisfactory.
The messages are modified by the receivers.
“The big things in life are best understood by way of small things.”
Customer acquisition is the primary objective, not customer satisfaction.
The more uncomfortable the answer, the more likely it is to be true.
Idea: The contributions and improvement of humankind is the story of humankind. Our story is the story of collective learning. So, let me tell you a story.
3 keys to bring fully charged: meaning, positive interactions, and energy.
William James believed that emotions are created by experiences and bodily reactions. It is the experience that triggers the emotion.
10,000 steps per day is a good baseline target of movement for most people.
Common mistake 2: underestimating how much action is required.
There are still many important questions about the evolution of the human mind that remain unanswered. Here are Ramachandran’s five big unanswered questions about the evolution of the human brain:
Superiority makes every man feel its equal. It is courtesy without condescension; affability without familiarity; self-sufficiency without selfishness; simplicity without snide.
Backsliding is a universal experience. Everyone resists a significant change whether it is for worse or for better.
You can’t fool all of the people all the time, but you can fool enough of them to rule a large country.
We believe firmly that “if we avoid the losers, the winners will take care of themselves.”
The parents have limited control over the child within the peer group, but one way they can influence peer group status is by making sure their children look normal and attractive. Normal and attractive means wearing the clothes other kids are wearing, getting braces, or going to the dermatologist to treat acne.
I would not deny that one has to yield sometimes – but by a gradual retreat, and holding on to our standards and our soldier’s honour.
His first album sold 1.5 million copies in 1977.
What something cost in the past is not necessarily a good measure of its value today.
There is nothing inherent in a security or business that alone makes it an attractive investment. Investment opportunity is a function of price, which is established in the marketplace.
The Theory of Constraints: Step one: identify the systems constraints. Step two: decide how to exploit the constraints. Step three: subordinate all other processes to the above decisions. Step four: elevate and improve the systems constraints. Step five: if in a previous step a constraint has broken, return to step one.
Before you do any kind of outreach to a big name, question your motives. Why this person? Are there other people who could help you reach the same outcome? “It would be much easier to reach a silver medalist than Michael Phelps.”
When you commit to something 100%, all of your future choices are already made—no matter how attractive the circumstances
an investor is more likely to do well by achieving consistently good returns with limited downside risk than by achieving volatile and sometimes even spectacular gains but with considerable risk of principal.
Parenting is a job where sincerity and hard work do not guarantee success. Through no fault of their own, good parents sometimes have bad kids.
If you are able to not give a fuck about the pain your goals require, then you become unstoppable.
Value investing encompasses a number of specialized investment niches that can be divided into three categories: securities selling at a discount to breakup or liquidation value, rate-of-return situations, and asset-conversion opportunities.
Do the good you have the power to do.
When everybody owns everything, nobody takes care of anything.
The greatest ability of the human brain is to imagine, to see the world as it has never been before.
Your goals are like a rudder on a boat, they provide direction. (Goals as rudder versus a dock?)
Science tells us that humans are animals, another type of beast. But, importantly, we don't feel that way. We feel like angels who aspire to become something more than a mere animal. So, perhaps we are both an animal and an angel.
The ability to be obsessed is not a disease. It is a gift.
Everybody worships. We just get to choose what to worship.
Careful observations of natural experiments (things happening in the real world) can lead to fascinating and useful insights.
Commitment, in its own way, offers a wealth of opportunity and experiences that would never otherwise be available to you, no matter how many surface level experiences you pursued.
We have “psychological immune systems” which often get triggered when we experience particularly traumatic events. These systems protect us from events that we would assume would be intensely painful and thus we are able to recover from them better than we often assume we would.
The size of a population in a region is a strong predictor of the complexity of the society.
Right after Martin became famous, he was driving through Beverly Hills with his mother and said, “Get out and walk down the street so I can watch people look at you.”
Teaching people, whether in a classroom or otherwise, is a form of show business.
All sorts of studies in behavior have proven that we often attribute the actions we take to incorrect causes. We reason backwardly and create all sorts of causes for our actions. In this case, Harris is arguing that we don’t merely do this sometimes, but all the time. He says that free will is an illusion and we do not fully understand what really drives our actions.
Bernoulli’s calculation for happiness: multiply the odds of getting what you want by the utility of getting what you want (i.e. probability x pleasure). Each successive dollar provides a little less pleasure than the one before it. “The determination of the value of an item must not be based on its price, but on the utility it yields.” The problem is that it’s nearly impossible to predict the utility we will get from our choices because of the many biases we have.
Sacks says that in the 70s and 80s everyone was talking about Skinner's stimulus and response theory, but not many people thought about what came between stimulus and response. That is, the mind and how it processes those stimuli and responses.
Success by others is an indication that something is possible. It should inspire you.
The occupation of Australia was an incredible feat. It was the first use of water craft and range extension by humans.
Challenge traditions and established ways of thinking.
Sadly, people today not only spend the time they have, they also spend away their futures. To accrue debt is to sell away our future time.
The meaning we construct out of life is a matter of personal, intentional choice. It’s a conscious decision.
Oddly, with discipline, structure, and order, you will find there is freedom.
Each day, keep in mind that death can be close to you. You will not take your time for granted.
Understanding and anticipating the power of correlation—and thus the limitations of diversification—is a principal aspect of risk control and portfolio management, but it’s very hard to accomplish. The failure to correctly anticipate co-movement within a portfolio is a critical source of investment error.
Sacks took many drugs during his twenties and during one hallucination he called his friend Carol to say he was about to die. She asked, “What have you just taken?” He responded, “Nothing! That's why I'm so scared.” She paused then asked, “What have you stopped taking?” And they got to the bottom of the problem. I thought Carol's line of questioning was brilliant. She inverted the question, during a tense and emotional moment, and got a totally different answer.
Poverty never spoils a good man, but prosperity often does. It’s easy to stand hard times, because that’s the only thing you can do, but in good times the fool-killer has to do night work.
Profit-Multiplier Model: Take one skill and make money from it in many ways. (e.g. Disney turns movies into tee shirts, amusements parks, toys and more.)
The brain and free will: Your brain has to inhibit yourself from imitating everything you see, so there are some inhibitory circuits that cut off those actions. This might be how free will occurs. You are presented with many options and your brain ignores all but one of them.
He spends much of his day feeling like a failure and knows he screws up often.
One way to improve investment results—which we try hard to apply at Oaktree—is to think about what “today’s mistake” might be and try to avoid it.
Limiting the amount of success you desire is a violation of the 10X Rule.
The mark of an unhealthy relationship is when two people try to solve each other’s problems in order to feel good about themselves.
Put a lot of effort into personalizing your approach. People respond to effort.
Money ought never to be the consideration in marriage, but it always ought to be a consideration. When a boy and a girl don’t think enough about money before the ceremony, they’re going to have to think altogether too much about it after;
It will become more and more difficult to implement differentiated prices for identical products and services. Customers are simply too well informed and when in doubt they can buy the product elsewhere at a lower price.
“It is a military axiom not to advance uphill against the enemy nor to oppose him when he comes downhill.”
It is not the least bit coincidental that adults who commit suicide with firearms nearly always shoot themselves in the head.
You can order whatever you want. If we’re ordering wine, always order by the glass.
Success is doing a half dozen things really well, repeated five thousand times.
A good many young fellows envy their boss because they think he makes the rules and can do as he pleases. As a matter of fact, he’s the only man in the shop who can’t. He’s like the fellow on the tight-rope—there’s plenty of scenery under him and lots of room around him, but he’s got to keep his feet on the wire all the time and travel straight ahead.
Step 2: work over the materials in your mind. Mentally “chew” your new material by looking at the facts from different angles and experimenting with fitting ideas together.
Jack Nicklaus had a repeated pre-shot routine that he did the same way over and over again. A psychologist tracked his pre-shot time for every shot at a tournament and it never wavered by more than one second. Set yourself up for success.
Price setting requires a thorough understanding of two things: how your customers perceive your value and the profit level you need to sustain or improve that value.
Observations of our own behavior can be a major window into ourselves and why we act the way we do. The problem is we often infer the wrong reasons for our behavior. Namely, we drastically underestimate the power of the situation.
If we want to change our adaptive nonconscious one method is to start deliberately acting like the person we wish to be.
The second biological lesson of history is that life is selection.
Prices get the least attention, but have the greatest impact.
Everyone has the opportunity to be lucky. If you live in a free society, you are lucky.
It is vitally important for investors to distinguish stock price fluctuations from underlying business reality.
The efficient-market hypothesis takes three forms.3 The weak form maintains that past stock prices provide no useful information on the future direction of stock prices. In other words, technical analysis (analysis of past price fluctuations) cannot help investors. The semi-strong form says that no published information will help investors to select undervalued securities since the market has already discounted all publicly available information into securities prices. The strong form maintains that there is no information, public or private, that would benefit investors. The implication of both the semi-strong and strong forms is that fundamental analysis is useless.
I’ve never been one who could get a great deal of satisfaction out of dreams.
Idea: In order for a group to let social instincts override the instincts of each individual, we need powerful beliefs and concepts. If we were just a horde of unconnected individuals we would never cooperate. This is where law and religion and capitalism come into play. They are ideas powerful enough to unite us despite our individual instincts.
The 7 simple rules of money: 1) Start thy purse to fattening: save money. 2) Control thy expenditures: don't spend more than you need. 3) Make thy gold multiply: invest wisely. 4) Guard thy treasures from loss: avoid investments that sound too good to be true. 5) Make of thy dwelling a profitable investment: own your home. 6) Ensure a future income: protect yourself with life insurance. 7) Improve thy ability to earn: strive to become wiser and more knowledgable.
There are five critical steps that everyone follows whenever they produce a new idea.
Most people are so focused on technical details that they can't see the bigger picture. Don't bother “checking the numbers” instead “check your assumptions.
Moving past fear is freeing.
According to Taleb, the book's most popular chapter was Chapter 11, the one in which he compressed all the literature on the topic of miscalculating probability.
No activity can be successfully pursued by an individual who is preoccupied.
It's not surprising that great African sculptors end up carving coffee tables, or that the talent of our children dies the moment we expect them to become adult. Once we believe that art is self-expression, then the individual can be criticised not only for his skill or lack of skill, but simply for being what he is.
Installed Base Profit: Initial sales margins are slim, but money is made on the follow up sales. (Think: revenue from cars vs. revenue from car repairs.)
On the path to improvement: the general progression is always the same. To take the master’s journey, you have to practice diligently, striving to hone your skills, to attain new levels of competence. But while doing so, you also have to be willing to spend most of your time on a plateau, to keep practicing even hen you seem to be getting nowhere.
If parents treat different children in different ways, are they simply responding to genetic differences in the children? Or are they causing differences by the different treatment they give each child?
One of the earliest meanings of the word “patient” is “one who endures hardship without complaint.”
When a very high-status person is wiped out, everyone feels pleasure as they experience the feeling of moving up a step.
As long as you can’t please both sides in this world, there’s nothing like pleasing your own side.
An intention tremor is an example of an oscillating feedback loop in the human body. (Thinking in Systems makes the point that delays in feedback loops lead to oscillations in systems.)
Martin doesn’t brag about his relationships with a variety of women, but one thing is pretty clear: women love men who are funny.
Most days, if you’re aware enough to give yourself a choice, you can choose to look differently at life. If you’ve really learned how to think, how to pay attention, then you will know you have other options.
We are pecking-order animals and that this affects the tiniest details of our behaviour.
How can you get an unfair advantage?
The one key that makes all of this work is this: make the vow. Make the commitment and make it on paper. Make the vow to yourself to live your truth. Write down whatever it is that speaks to you. The words don’t matter. Just make sure it comes from you and it is in your own words. That’s how the magic will happen.
Instead of perpetuating these revenue-based plans, I strongly recommend that companies switch to profit-oriented incentive plans. In making that switch, companies do not need to sacrifice simplicity or confidentiality. One simple approach is to link the commission or incentive to the level of discount. The lower the discounts a salesperson grants, the higher his or her commission.
People will travel a long way to visit a ‘view'. The essential clement of a good view is distance, and preferably with nothing human in the immediate foreground.
“Value investing” is one of the most overused and inconsistently applied terms in the investment business.
“School never ends. The classroom is everywhere.”
Profit must be baked into your business. Every day, every transaction, every moment. Profit is not an event. Profit is a habit.
“If there is no onlooker there is no art, is there? The artist looking at his own art is not enough. He has to have someone look at it. I give to the onlooker more importance than the artist, almost, because not only does he look, but he also gives a judgement.”
In the 1960s and 1970s, the decisions of a few Chinese leaders resulted in the schools closing in the country for five years. Crazy how so much centralized power is still playing a huge role.
We make a mistake by separating our “free will” from our neural processes. The neural processes that support consciousness and nudge our actions are just as much a part of us as our conscious actions. The machinery that drives our actions is just as real as the actions themselves.
I wanted you to form good mental habits, just as I want you to have clean, straight physical ones.
Innovation is the foundation: In general, innovation provides the foundation for a successful, sustainable premium price position. This applies to groundbreaking innovations as well as continual improvements, such as Miele ’s under the motto “Forever Better.”
Don’t ask yourself what you want out of life. It’s easy to want success and fame and happiness and great sex. Everybody wants those things. A much more interesting question to ask yourself is, “What kind of pain do I want?” What you are willing to struggle for is a greater determinant of how our lives turn out.
“The act of writing is itself enough. It serves to clarify my thoughts and feelings. The act of writing is an integral part of my mental life. Ideas emerge, are shaped, in the act of writing.”
Your power to influence your children’s friendships drops significantly over time. Once they are 10 years old, you have very little influence over their peer group.
The sooner you adjust your spending to what your earning capacity will be, the easier they will find it to live together.
Darkness is essential for stand up success. Audiences don't laugh when they are in the light.
Without a little agony, none of us would bother to learn a thing.
There is always a way to get to where we want to go almost instantly.
When you are presenting multiple options to someone, you should offer them in order of decreasing effectiveness. That is, the most effective option is covered first. Then, the second most effective. And so on. This ensures that the entire conversation is framed around the topic of effectiveness and, thus, the person you are talking to can make a decision for what they want while always knowing what works best. Offering alternatives in a different order often colors the conversation and frames it around something besides effectiveness. For example, the conversation might be framed around the option you are currently using or around the option you are most familiar with already.
On getting intimate knowledge of a product: most people stop too soon. If the surface differences are not striking, we assume that there are no differences. But if we go deeply enough, or far enough, we nearly always find that between every product and some consumers there is an individuality of relationship which may lead to an idea.
Plan for failure. Figure out why you missed a habit and plan solutions in advance.
We can divide history into three stages: hunting, agriculture, and industry.
Some fellows can only see those above them, and others can only see those under them, but a good man is cross-eyed and can see both ends at once.
Remember, a friend does not need you to impress him. A friend loves you because you are true to yourself, not because you agree with him. Beware of grand gestures; the real mettle of friendship is forged in life’s daily workings.
The cortex is especially well developed in dolphins and primates.
The music group Radiohead released its album In Rainbows online in 2007 with a “pay what you want” model. The album was downloaded over one million times, with 40 % of the “buyers” paying an average price of $6 apiece.
Sometimes stories themselves become so predictable that they become routines.
Every movement, every inflection of the voice implies a status.
“Meanwhile, the competition is at home, working their asses off.”
Since they are acting against the crowd, contrarians are almost always initially wrong and likely for a time to suffer paper losses. By contrast, members of the herd are nearly always right for a period.
Life is long if you know how to use it.
The fewer the priorities in our lives the better.
“We lose 28% of our time each day.”
You cannot decide your next mental state, thought, or action until it arises. Where is the freedom in that process?
Don’t get stuck in one slipstream just because it worked in the past. What got you here, won’t get you there.
In many situations it is better to try and fail than to not try at all. Not so with habits. It is better to try a small one and stick with it than to try a big one and fail. (Note: this is because all the benefit of habits comes from the long-term consistency.)
Investors are more likely, therefore, to find inefficiently priced securities outside the Standard and Poor’s 100 than within
It took Duchamp about one month to finish one of his most famous works, Nude Descending a Staircase No. 2.
It isn’t so much knowing a whole lot, as knowing a little and how to use it that counts.
Freud, despite his faults, was correct that the modern brain is largely unconscious and that the conscious self is but a small slice of our whole world.
The hard part is discipline, patience, and judgment.
Risk means uncertainty about which outcome will occur and about the possibility of loss when the unfavorable ones do.
“A man’s wealth is not in the coins in his purse. It is in his income.”
Goal obsession is the blindness of goal pursuit at the expense of more important things.
You will hear many people saying: ‘When I am fifty I shall retire into leisure; when I am sixty I shall give up public duties.’ And what guarantee do you have of a longer life? Who will allow your course to proceed as you arrange it? Aren’t you ashamed to keep for yourself just the remnants of your life, and to devote to wisdom only that time which cannot be spent on any business? How late it is to begin really to live just when life must end! How stupid to forget our mortality, and put off sensible plans to our fiftieth and sixtieth years, aiming to begin life from a point at which few have arrived!
We may never know where we’re going, but we’d better have a good idea where we are.
You are not imaginatively impotent until you are dead. You are only frozen up.
The Heinsenberg Principle reveals that at the subatomic level even our most basic sense of cause and effect breaks down.
Google's 20 percent time is another example of peer monitoring because good side projects will gain the interest of peers.
There are no experts. There are only learners.
The real value of education has nothing to do with grades or degrees and everything to do with simple awareness—awareness of what is so real and essential, so hidden in plain sight all around us, that we have to keep reminding ourselves of it over and over.
You have to put in the hours. Skill, natural talent, etc. matters less and less as you work more and more hours. In the long run, the people who work hardest, longest win.
The three obstacles that prevent us from learning from our mistakes are 1) denial, 2) self-destructive behavior, 3) remembering past mistakes as triumphs.
The differences in how we view our work can just be a result of the stories we tell. You can tell a negative version of the story or you can tell a positive version. Which true version do you want to believe?
Do not put your money in investments which do not pay a dividend, but also do not invest in risky places that seem too good to be true.
Let no one rob me of a single day who is not going to make me an adequate return for such a loss.
Growth is an endlessly iterative process. When we learn something new, we don’t go from “wrong” to “right.” Rather, we go from wrong to slightly less wrong. We shouldn’t seek to find the ultimate “right” answer for ourselves, but rather, we should seek to chip away at the ways that we’re wrong today so that we can be a little less wrong tomorrow.
Niche products grow and usurp incumbents precisely because they appeal only to a few users and seem inferior to incumbents. They get ignored long enough to grow into a serious threat.
Losing money or a business never dominated your ability to take action.
Strategy 1: Active choice. This strategy interrupts the user during a process or workflow and asks them to make an active choice about their preferences. For example, PetSmart interrupts the checkout process to ask users if they want to donate to “help save homeless animals.” Through that strategy alone, they raised over $40 million in a year. This is an interesting indication that there was a lot of latent demand to donate for homeless animals. People didn’t need to be convinced, they simply needed to be asked at a moment when they had the power to act. The rest of the time, the issue of donating simply wasn’t on their radar (even though the desire / intention was there). It’s important to note that this strategy asks you to make processes less seamless for the user, but the interruption occurs at an important and well-considered moment.
“How long will it take me to master Aikido?” a prospective student asks. “How long do you expect to live?” is the only respectable response.
Idea: the body is just a collection of many systems or feedback loops and the vast majority of the systems are nonconscious (digestive system, for example). There is at least one conscious system, which is our conscious mind.
All alphabets in the modern world evolved from one original alphabet, either in idea or actual written form, developed in the Middle East.
Out-of-favor securities may be undervalued; popular securities almost never are. What the herd is buying is, by definition, in favor. Securities in favor have already been bid up in price on the basis of optimistic expectations and are unlikely to represent good value that has been overlooked.
Rid yourself of average thinking and average action.
Striving for success is fine as long as you realize that the outcome is not under your control. Be as ambitious as possible, but let go of the result. This makes it easier for you to be resilient and bounce back if the result is poor.
There are only two possible outcomes whenever you compare yourself to another, vanity or bitterness, and both are without value.
Customer-Solution Profit: Know your customers incredibly well and create a solution specifically for them.
Diversification, after all, is not how many different things you own, but how different the things you do own are in the risks they entail.
Beautiful irony: fall in love with yourself and naturally express yourself and the world will beat a path to your door to fall in love with you.
As the French say, “ le prix s’oublie, la qualité reste.” Loosely translated, that means that the quality you bought endures long after you have forgotten the price.
You can reverse this process. You can create your own focused mental loops. Repeat, “I love myself” again and again and again. Lay the pathway for that loop to run over and over. Eventually, it will take hold whether you believe it or not.
The imitative majority follows the innovative minority. History is largely the battle of a few minorities, the winner of which is then lauded as the victor by the majority.
Apologize, apologize, apologize. Just step up and make the apologies you need to make.
Mirror neurons are incredibly important and are an area of huge research focus right now. They may be central to social learning, imitation, and the cultural transmission of skills and attitudes.
The ultimate result of the industrial revolution was the replacement of religious entities with secular ones.
In every age, the forces of the individual seem to overpower the forces of the group. When all else fails, people will do what serves them best. They will do what ensures their survival.
How to choose the perfect restaurant. Get a restaurant that is vegetarian and paleo friendly.
Certain people are moving so fast that they can arrive at destinations in moments that would take most of us decades.
Marrying the wrong girl is the one mistake that you’ve got to live with all your life.
Humans are inherently flawed. The cognitive biases that we have are simply a result of how our brains work. Sometimes these biases help us rather than hurt us. But they are always a result of how we are built. That makes them particularly difficult to avoid.
No one individual can ever hope to hold a candle to the insights of humanity as a whole. It is a fool's errand to think your ideas will be capable of battling such proven concepts.
Investors who want some objective measure of risk-adjusted return—and they are many—can only look to the so-called Sharpe ratio.
He set a rule to be home every day by 6pm to see his kids and stuck to it nearly his entire career despite helping to run a multimillion dollar company.
What good is money when you don’t have time?
There is a fantastic story that Higashida tells about learning to wave goodbye to a friend. People kept telling him that he was doing it incorrectly, but he didn't understand why until someone had him look in a mirror. He finally realized that he was waving goodbye to himself with his palm facing toward his own face rather than his palm facing away and toward the other person. He was simply mimicking what he saw when someone waved goodbye to him (the other person's palm), but couldn't fully translate what he saw into the correct behavior.
Rule 2: Activating a resource and utilizing are source aren't synonymous.
“I mistrust rigid definitions. They're the beginning of dogma, and dogma is the start of narrow-mindedness.”
Duchamp believed slower work resulted in better work. “I produced so little and everything I produced took me quite a long time.”
Meditation is like doing focused reps for your mind. Focus on the breath, lose your focus, bring it back to the breath, repeat. This is the whole game. Keep bringing your mind back to the breath.
“I do meditation because it makes me 10 percent happier.”
If it's not a hit, switch. Success comes from consistently improving and inventing. Don't waste years pursing anything other than a hit.
If the nose of a plane is pointed just one percent off course when it leaves LA for New York, it will end up in Delaware once it gets to the east coast.
Most challenges are an impediment to a particular thing, but not to your will or to you as a person. “Going lame is an impediment to your leg, but not to your will.”
It's better to value old, distilled thoughts than “new thinking” because for an idea to last so long it must be good. That is, old ideas have had to stand the test of time. New ideas have not. Some new ideas will end up lasting, but most will not.
One of the best strategies parents have at their disposal for influencing their kids is to move to a different school district. This often hurts kids who rely on their peer group for good standing, but if the kid is beaten down by other kids and his status amongst peers is zero, then he has very little to lose.
The role of accident was essential for the progress of humankind, but now, suddenly that is changing. Culture was the first way we began overpowering the role of accident. (Think the education system and teaching humans.) Technology is the second (and faster) way we are overpowering the role of accident in genetic evolution and the progress of humankind. Now you can be dealt a poor genetic hand (think learning disability) and our culture and our technology can still help you to survive.
Mirror neurons appear to be wired from birth to some degree. A newborn baby, just a few hours old, will often echo its mother by sucking its tongue out when watching its mother do it.
Most inventions are not a result of necessity, but rather the result of tinkers and curiosity.
One of the book’s key points: although children do learn things from their parents, they do not only learn things from their parents.
Physical mail only shows up once per day and then we process it. But email is something we check all the time. (How can you blockemail and only answer once per day?)
Quantification often lends excessive authority to statements that should be taken with a grain of salt.
Much of what we call intelligence is the result of individual education, opportunity, and experience.
Humans mature at a glacial pace compared to most animals. What do we gain from this vulnerable period that would seem to decrease our odds of survival? The answer is culture.
Surround yourself with people who are familiar with money, who work with it each day, and who make lots of it.
The goal of a freemium model is to use the free price to attract the largest number of potential customers. The company hopes that if the user becomes comfortable with the basic functionality, he or she will have a growing interest in paying for a version which is more powerful, and more advanced, or offers additional functionality. Freemium fits very well to experience goods, whose full value only becomes apparent when customers have had a chance to use the good.
Sleep training is a completely cultural construct and a product of our modern society. Babies never slept in separate rooms until recently. In hunter gatherer societies, a crying baby would never be left alone. It was always with the tribe. It is not natural to let your baby cry. It is natural to let it sleep with the parent.
You can trust a woman’s taste on everything except men; and it’s mighty lucky that she slips up there or we’d pretty nigh all be bachelors.
Biology so clearly drives behavior. Damage to the basal ganglia, for example, can lead to Parkinson's and a shuffling gate. This new behavior (a shuffling walk) is not a choice on the patient's part. It is simply a consequence of changes in the neurological structure of the brain. We are quick to admit the influence of biological factors on behavior in cases like these, but we too often overlook them otherwise.
Qualia is the word for your unique sense and perception of the world. It refers to how things seem to you. Examples: the pain of breaking your leg or the color of a sunset. Qualia refers to your subjective experience of the world.
Kings and lords used to surround themselves with dwarfs and cripples so could rise by the contrast. Some modern celebrities do the same.
You cannot arrive at the fullest measure of success until you crush the spirit of procrastination within you.
Self-esteem is a function of ones status in their peer group. Low status in the peer group can wreck a person’s personality.
Quality time is an interesting concept. Most kids prefer to spend quality time with their peers, not their parents. And yet, parents are supposed to feel guilty if they don’t spend enough time with their kids.
When it comes to happiness and sadness, only recent events matter. This is especially true for adolescents who can return to their baseline mood within 45 minutes after a spike of extreme happiness or extreme sadness.
I'm keeping my head still whenever I speak, and that this produces great changes in the way I perceive myself and am perceived by others.
Rule 1: The capacity of any non-bottleneck process isdeteimed by something else in the system other than its own capacity.
“Not only are we not as free as we think we are, we do not feel as free as we think we do… Thoughts and intentions simply arise in our mind. What else could they do?”
Instead of focusing on how you measure up, focus on how you contribute to the world around you. Contribution is not measured based on other people. It’s only measured based on what you put into the world around you. That’s it. If you add something, you contributed.
At times when interest rates are unusually low, however, investors are likely to find very high multiples being applied to share prices. Investors who pay these high multiples are dependent on interest rates remaining low, but no one can be certain that they will. This means that when interest rates are unusually low, investors should be particularly reluctant to commit capital to long-term holdings unless outstanding opportunities become available, with a preference for either holding cash or investing in short-term holdings that quickly return cash for possible redeployment when available returns are more attractive
Sacks was an incredibly multidisciplinary thinker and physician. I love that. The greatest thinkers see the relatedness between concepts.
Fifty Bits Design assumes the best in people. There is no trickery or deception. It assumes people want the best and then simply presents them with better options and improves their ability to act on the good intentions they already have.
During his weightlifting days, he favored stiff-legged deadlifts to improve his back strength.
Because there’s an infinite amount of things we can now see or know, there are also an infinite number of ways we can discover that we don’t measure up, that we’re not good enough, that things aren’t as great as they could be.
The higher you go in an organization, the more your suggestions become interpreted as orders.
He went into the cable television business because, in 1982, it's best years were still ahead. “The industry was essentially a government-subsidized monopoly, financed by huge tax breaks. It was young and fragmented–there was big money to be made in the process of consolidation.”
There must be consequences for failure.
You can smell the ocean for nearly anywhere in Great Britain. What happened? They took to the sea and became the finest naval seamen in history.
“Anything is possible, but not everything is possible” —Tyler Rex
Under normal circumstances, managers tend to show a preference for a “lower prices, constant volume” alternative, but this tendency becomes more pronounced in a time of crisis. The effort to keep sales and capacity utilization up, and keep people at work, takes precedence. But in a time of crisis, that can be precisely the wrong approach.
Often the value of a product depends on how quickly it becomes available or how quickly a customer can access it.
Tony Robbins' no man's land concept is when you're not really happy about your life, but you're not unhappy enough to do anything about it. You want to avoid this complacency.
This reminds me of what Bryan Harris said about product launches. At any given time, your product is like number 150 on someone’s to-do list. They simply aren’t aware. The goal of a great product launch is to skyrocket your product up into the top 10 of your customer’s to-do list. They can only act once they are aware.
Interesting self-sabotage insight: many people worry that if they meditate they will lose their edge and no longer be competitive or driven.
Specialist Profit: Lower costs because of better knowledge. Higher price because of better knowledge and stronger reputation.
Think your way through difficulties: harsh conditions can be softened, restricted ones can be widened, and heavy ones can weigh less on those who know how to bear them.
One collection of evidence for the difference in spread along geographic axes is the spread of domesticated crops. Many crops spread across Asia with one domestication, while crops like cotton or squash were domesticated in multiple individual areas throughout Mesoamerica. This is because the crop spread too slowly for one domestication to takeover the region.
Duchamp believed that the monetary influence on art could “melt genius away” and that it ruined the creation of art. In his opinion, the best way to make something great was to completely remove the possibility of making money on it. In other words, go underground and work in private.
We are controlled by everything around us and in us, but neither one of those two is the whole story.
Step 1: gather new material. This includes specific material (related to the product or task) and general material (fascination with a wide range of concepts).
Do not speak ill of others. A knight does not spread news that he does not know to be certain, or condemn things that he does not understand.
Investors must be willing to forego some near-term return, if necessary, as an insurance premium against unexpected and unpredictable adversity.
Write out, in plain language, the behavior you intend to follow.
Strive to become a man of leisure who can afford to sit with ideas, think properly about them, and gradually provide something of value.
With momentum, you can continue succeeding with less work. It's easy to keep things running once you have momentum.
Value investing is simple to understand but difficult to implement.
“The life of every man is a diary in which he means to write one story, and writes another; and his humblest hour is when he compares the volume as it is with what he vowed to make it.” —J.M. Barrie
“Taking action is key. Moving in a new direction can free you.”
I began to think of children not as immature adults, but of adults as atrophied children.
The habit of searching for relationships between facts becomes of the highest importance in the production of ideas.
We have 3 habitual responses to everything we experience: 1) We want it. 2) We reject it. 3) We zone out. Mindfulness is a fourth response. Viewing what happens in the world without an emotional response about it.
It is interesting how Martin is convinced the success of his comedy act was largely dependent on the current events of the time (his act balanced the seriousness of the Vietnam War, in particular). On the one hand, I think he undersells himself as a comedian. I'm confident he could be funny in any era. On the other hand, I appreciate his acknowledgement of luck and timing in his success.
Even when a company has little ongoing business value, investors who buy at a price below net-net working capital are protected by the approximate liquidation value of current assets alone. As long as working capital is not overstated and operations are not rapidly consuming cash, a company could liquidate its assets, extinguish all its liabilities, and still distribute proceeds in excess of the market price to investors.
Book end your days. You can always ensure how your day starts and ends. Finish your most important tasks first. Review your day each evening.
Interesting: two doctors discovered autism independently and, incredibly, they both named the condition “autism.”
What are you willing to tolerate? If you tolerate people being late that is what you'll get. If you tolerate earning less than what you're worth, that's what you'll earn. (This is similar to Mark Manson's idea of “what kind of pain do you want?” Except here it is applied to the negative forces in our life whereas he applies it to our goals and ambitions.)
Start with a small ask. Your only goal is to get a discussion going. “Hey Steve, I’m hosting a dinner with a group of entrepreneurs, are you interested?”
Birth order is one factor that produces very different micro-environments for each child to develop in. Any differences in personality are known as birth order effects. Interestingly, researchers have found no link between birth order and behavioral differences.
Remember that everyone is just trying to do their best and be happy. Just like you.
The best teachers strive to point out what a student is doing right just as frequently as what they are doing wrong. The idea of a teacher rarely giving praise and teaching through strict criticism is a myth.
“People of our generation seemed to agree it was more important to live fully than to live in a straight line.”
The rate of change increases and inventions cause acceleration to go ever faster.
The first thing I do when I meet a group of new students is (probably) to sit on the floor. I play low status, and I'll explain that if the students fail they're to blame me. Then they laugh, and relax, and I explain that really it's obvious that they should blame me, since I'm supposed to be the expert; and if I give them the wrong material, they'll fail; and if I give them the right material, then they'll succeed. I play low status physically but my actual status is going up, since only a very confident and experienced person would put the blame for failure on himself. At this point they almost certainly start sliding off their chairs, because they don't want to be higher than me. I have already changed the group profoundly, because failure is suddenly not so frightening any more. They'll want to test me, of course; but I really will apologise to them when they fail, and ask them to be patient with me, and explain that I'm not perfect. My methods are very effective, and other things being equal, most students will succeed, but they won't be trying to win any more. The normal teacher-student relationship is dissolved.
Never forget that you can make your role anything you want. You can hire for everything else.
A parent’s behavior toward a child impacts how the child behaves in the presence of the parent or in contexts that are associated with the parent.
there is only one valid rule for selling: all investments are for sale at the right price.
You must especially avoid those who are gloomy and always lamenting, and who grasp at every pretext for complaint. Though a man’s loyalty and kindness may not be in doubt, a companion who is agitated and groaning about everything is an enemy to peace of mind.
A servant's primary function is to elevate the status of the master.
Finland's 45/15 break time … Covered by Tim Walker.
Ludwig Wittgenstein said a book should consist of examples. And Sacks used this method in his books. The examples of the patients in his books really connected with readers. (You should do the same in your own writing.)
Imagining should be as effortless as perceiving.
Build for yourself a mountain of gold first, then you can enjoy as many banquets as you wish without worry. Don’t spend your money as soon as you earn it.
There is a limit to how much honest feedback most leaders want to hear.
Past market data has very limited relevance for predicting future behavior
Understanding ultimate causes is essential to understanding human behavior.
Ramachandran ran an experiment where subjects bit a pencil horizontally, so it shaped their mouth somewhat like a smile. While in this position, their brains would register someone’s frown, but would not imitate someone else’s smile. The hypothesis was that the mirror neurons which would fire while looking at and imitating someone else’s smile were already busy with the own person’s smile (or similar shape), thus they did not fire. In some ways, this link between imitation and action reminds me of Brene Brown’s idea that it is much harder to be closed off emotionally if you are active physically. It’s like if the body is moving, the activity in your neurons makes it harder to “close off” emotional pathways.
Our brains are extremely sensitive to losses, the group, and the present.
Any new habit has to work inside your current life and lifestyle. The gym can't be out of the way. It has to be on the way.
Psychological defenses operate frequently in the nonconscious because that way we don't even realize distortion is occurring (if you realized, you could correct for it).
Good practice is not stressful, it is free flowing. (You get in flow.)
I tell improvisers to follow the rules and see what happens, and not to feel in any way responsible for the material that emerges. If you improvise spontaneously in front of an audience you have to accept that your innermost self will be revealed. The same is true of any artist.
It’s not what a man does during working-hours, but after them, that breaks down his health.
A change in standards often occurs for people as they experience more of life, but happiness rarely does. What was once special is now the norm.
All consuming toil is usually the price of genius.
It's a good idea to become completely accountable to yourself.
The concept of free will is pervasive in our world.
The older your habits are and the deeper their roots, the harder they are to change.
In my view the man who falls on the banana skin is funny only if he loses status, and if we don't have sympathy with him.
The difference between the number one golfer and number ten golfer is just 1.9 strokes. The difference prize money is huge.
Martin became so famous that he couldn’t go outside without tons of hoopla and, interestingly, his romantic life vanished. He couldn’t interact with people in a normal way and just spent his time shuttling from show to hotel room and back. He went into a depression. “This was the loneliest period of my life.”
Local Leadership Profit: Be everywhere and then every store is like a billboard (Starbucks, Walmart, etc.)
James Altucher: “I don’t do a post now unless I’m worried about what people will think about me.”
If you seem to be a person of importance to some people, ignore them. Realize you know nothing. If you accept that you are a person of importance, it becomes harder to learn.
Humans are the only species to use neural plasticity to such an extreme degree. You've probably noticed how reliant humans are on their parents compared to say, how a baby giraffe can walk within hours of being born. This is not a weakness, but rather a strength because it allows humans to maintain remarkable brain plasticity during the first ten years of life.
In short: businesses should avoid “pay what you want ” systems.
He said, “While I teach you about the ways of war, I want you to know that the real struggle is between the two wolves that live inside each of us.” “Two wolves?” I asked, seated on an old log near the fire. My eyes were transfixed by the flames twisting uncomfortably in the night air. “One wolf is evil,” he continued. “It is anger, envy, greed, arrogance, self-pity, guilt, resentment, inferiority, deceit, false pride.” He paused, poking the embers of our fire with a long stick he’d been carving. “The other is good. It is joy, love, hope, serenity, humility, loving-kindness, forgiveness, empathy, generosity, truth, compassion, faith.” I considered that for a minute, then tentatively asked, “Which wolf will win?” Sparks danced towards the stars as the old man stared into the glare of the flames and replied: “Whichever one you feed.”
During a dark time in his life when he was feeling incredibly stressed and even depressed, the author kept repeating to himself day and night, “I love myself.”
Duchamp on staying perpetually young: “You must remember, I am ten years older than most of the young people.”
He kept repeating it until it surprised himself doing it automatically. “Imagine the feeling of catching yourself loving yourself without even realizing you were doing it.”
For being an extremely thrifty guardian of his time he never found anything for which it was worth exchanging.
Don't hope for a life without problems. Hope for a life with good problems.
The same principle applies to renting, not just to purchases. In general, it is more advantageous for a lessor to offer a new tenant several months of free rent instead of a discounted price per square foot.
This book seeks to answer the question, “Why did the rate of progress differ so much for cultures on different continents?”
War, or the threat of war, is the primary factor in the amalgamation of human societies throughout history. It is how cultures merge.
Cocktail Party Effect: tons of people are talking, but you tune them out and focus on your conversation. Then, someone nearby mentions your name in conversation and you suddenly pick up what they are talking about. Were you listening the whole time? You must have been because you heard your name, but you felt fully engaged in the first conversation. Your brain is pulling in tons of information, but only consciously thinking about some of it. This is selective attention.
Never make a big decision without first walking a mile.
Profit is not an event. Profit is not something that happens at year-end or at the end of your five-year plan or someday.
Value investors invest with a margin of safety that protects them from large losses in declining markets.
It doesn't matter how stupidly you interrupt a routine, you will be automatically creating a narrative, and people will listen.
Choice is at the center of all success and failure. It is what we choose that makes the biggest difference. Too often we sleepwalk through our choices. We default to choices that our society and culture tells us we should do.
You alone are responsible for your situation.
History followed different courses for different peoples because of differences in their environments not because of biological differences in the people themselves.
A clear mind is one that is swept clean of business at six o’clock every night and isn’t opened up for it again until after the shutters are taken down next morning.
You may be young in years, but you are closer to death than you think.
What if you don’t love yourself or even like yourself? Just remain open to the possibility of loving yourself. The rest is easy.
One fascinating explanation of synesthesia is that two adjacent areas of the brain are crosswired which leads to increased crosstalk between, say, colors and numbers.
There is no guarantee of success once you introduce your habits into the outside world. But, you can control your behavior, so focus on the process not the results.
We decry slavery, but our global empire enslaves more people than the Romans and all other colonial powers before us.
We can define progress as the increasing control of the environment by life.
Science deals largely with the external world. It has almost nothing to do with the internal world. What is consciousness? How can we answer this question with science?
Be very conscious of the synergy of the group.
His discussion of happiness in bleak circumstances on pages 140-141 is a personal anecdote that resonates with the science shared in Stumbling on Happiness by Dan Gilbert.
Nobody will save you or make you successful.
Physiological arousal can be interpreted in a variety of ways and our interpretation of the arousal depends on what we believe caused it. But our beliefs can be mistaken and thus we think we’re experiencing one thing when, in fact, we are experiencing something else. We can be wrong about our own experiences.
Scientific theories are not “truth” themselves, they simply explain a lot of natural processes.
What would have to change to make this possible?
We can view evolution as going through two avenues: biological, which takes a very long time and cultural, which is shockingly fast by comparison. Ideas evolve much faster than bodies do.
Leverage magnifies outcomes but doesn’t add value. It can make great sense to use leverage to increase your investment in assets at bargain prices offering high promised returns or generous risk premiums. But it can be dangerous to use leverage to buy more of assets that offer low returns or narrow risk spreads—in other words, assets that are fully priced or overpriced. It makes little sense to use leverage to try to turn inadequate returns into adequate returns.
Interesting theory: a high percentage of artists and creators have been reported to have synesthesia. It's quite possible that the cross linkage between neurons that leads to synesthesia also enables artists to create metaphors and connections between ideas in an easier fashion than most people.
Never marry a poor girl who’s been raised like a rich one. She’s simply traded the virtues of the poor for the vices of the rich without going long on their good points. To marry for money or to marry without money is a crime. There’s no real objection to marrying a woman with a fortune, but there is to marrying a fortune with a woman.
“The shorter the response a prospect needs to give, the better.”
Avoid injury. Most people get injured because of goal obsessiveness. Pay attention to the signals your body gives and negotiate with them—but don’t override them or ignore them.
As you grow into maturity, do not concern yourself with aging. A rose is striking in full bloom only because it will never be so again, but a budding rose is also stunning, as are the dark petals of autumn. It is the fact that time is passing that creates its preciousness.
The positives behind stocks can be genuine and still produce losses if you overpay for them.
Everyone wants to be a knight; wanting is no great accomplishment.
Status is a confusing term unless it's understood as something one does. You may be low in social status, but play high, and vice versa.
All multidimensional price structures contain some form of price differentiation, because the fixed price gets allocated across different volume levels. An advantage of these systems is that a company makes the same price offer to all customers, but each customer pays a different amount according to his or her own actual usage.
The only way to be comfortable with death is to understand and see yourself as something bigger than yourself, to contribute to some much larger entity.
The key to a good life is not giving a fuck about more; it’s giving a fuck about less, giving a fuck about only what is true and immediate and important.
Technology finds most of its uses after it has been invented rather than being invented to solve a foreseen need. The phrase, “necessity is the mother of invention” is generally incorrect. (Even though some examples, like the Manhattan Project, exist.)
“Few swim in riches and the majority drown in poverty, pollution, and violence.”
It is best to “bundle losses and enumerate gains.” Amazon Prime is a good example. They bundle all of the losses (shipping fees) into one yearly cost. Then, they enumerate gains by showing you the “free shipping” options every time you purchase. This matches with the philosophy of “stacking the pain” that I learned in business school.
Putting off an easy thing makes it hard, and putting off a hard one makes it impossible.
If you loved yourself truly and deeply, would you limit your life to what you previously thought possible? Nope. You would blow your own socks off.
The Pax Romana was perhaps the greatest achievement in the history of governance.
Make sure the bottleneck only works on good parts by performing quality control before parts go into the bottleneck. You can't afford to waste time within the bottleneck.
Perhaps the reason companies don't stay at the top is simply because the only way to go is down. It's really hard to stay at the top and perhaps being a Fortune 100 company relies on many factors outside your control and not simply running a good company. When those factors change, so does your incredible success.
Eliminate starting procrastination. If you want to procrastinate on some future part of work, that's fine. But you're not allowed to procrastinate starting the behavior. You have to start right now – don't delay, plan, strategize, research, etc. Of course, if you get started you probably won't want to procrastinate later because you'll have built momentum.
My own findings show that it makes no sense to set prices at $9.90 or $9.95. If you want to remain below a price threshold, then you should set your price as close to the threshold as possible, which means $9.99 in this case.
Step 1: Mental Loop
50 bits design assumes most people have good intentions and seeks to find strategies to activate those good intentions.
There is no value in suffering when it is done without purpose.
Value investing is, in effect, predicated on the proposition that the efficient-market hypothesis is frequently wrong.
If the majority of abilities are contained within a minority of men (that is, if a few people have more valuable skills than most others), then a minority rule is as inevitable as a disproportionate concentration of wealth.
“If I love myself truly and deeply, would I let myself experience this?” The answer was always “no” for the author.
Whatever you make, it's your creation. Make it your dream come true.
Don't worry about how much work it is. Think about how great the results will be.
You’ll do better if you wait for investments to come to you rather than go chasing after them. You tend to get better buys if you select from the list of things sellers are motivated to sell rather than start with a fixed notion as to what you want to own. An opportunist buys things because they’re offered at bargain prices. There’s nothing special about buying when prices aren’t low.
In contrast, if we know what we want and align our life to what matters most, to reality, time will slow down. All of those things we have spent our life chasing are nothing more than a distraction from what matters most.
The mind is a well-designed system that is able to accomplish a great deal in parallel. You can perform a conscious behavior and a nonconscious one at the same time.
Follow a practice. People embarking on any form of change will gain stability and comfort though practicing something daily. The practice provides a stable base during the instability of change.
All human societies contain inventive people. It's just that some environments provide more starting materials and more favorable conditions for utilizing inventions than other environments.
It’s difficult to explain, but in some ways it can be easy to be supportive when your friend is hurt or sad. You may find it is more challenging to be wholeheartedly supportive when extreme good fortune befalls a friend and not you.
I summarize my insights into price wars very simply: there are smart industries and there are self-destructive industries. What is the difference? The smart ones avoid price wars, and the self-destructive ones get stuck in them. The smart ones are profitable; the self-destructive ones incur losses or destroy profits. The problem is that it only takes one self-destructive competitor to render an entire industry self-destructive. That’s why it is better to have smart competitors.
The self seems to emerge from a relatively small cluster of brain areas.
On human nature: Man is a learning animal, and the essence of the species is encoded in that simple term. The mastery of skills that are not genetically programmed is the most characteristically human of all activities.
“…their obsession with detail was a way of masking cluelessness about the bigger picture.”
The lesson of history is that man is tough.
Five dog night is an Australian phrase referring to a very cold night because you would need to use five dogs as blankets.
“Being too far ahead of your time is indistinguishable from being wrong.”
One lesson of history is that religions have a way of reviving themselves.
To head north, a knight may use the North Star to guide him, but he will not arrive at the North Star. A knight’s duty is only to proceed in that direction.
“On our own we simply don't know how to get things done the same way you do things. But, like everyone else, we want to do the best we possibly can. When we sense you've given up on us, it makes us feel miserable. So please keep helping us, through to the end.”
Denial inhibits energy while realistic acknowledgment of the truth releases it.
Remember, if you think the things that are in the power of others are in your own power, then you will be hindered, frustrated, and annoyed.
Time management is more about knowing your priorities clearly than finding balance.
Wernicke's area in the brain plays a critical role in language and deciphering meaning. It is 7x larger in human than in other primates and is one of the key biological differences between our brain and other animals.
Professional investors: coming in each day for work and doing nothing.
Rather than targeting a desired rate of return, even an eminently reasonable one, investors should target risk.
The quality of a choice cannot be judged just by the result. (I first learned this in baseball. Just because a pitch you call or play you call doesn't work out doesn't make it a poor choice. It could have been the right call, but bad luck. Or vice versa.)
Everything was involved in what made us.
Measurement can come in many forms. For example, Whole Foods requires new employees to do a four week trial period and they are only hired if they earn positive votes from 2/3 of their coworkers. This is a form of peer monitoring (or we could call it peer measurement).
Consistency is the ultimate key to success.
Brain Shortcut 1: Fit in. Humans have a strong urge to fit in and work with one another. For example, one reason many people buy green cars like a Toyota Prius is to “fit in” and showcase their personality and beliefs about living green. Additionally, we often keep track of who is doing the work in a group project or who pays for dinner because people want to feel like things are “fair.” We do not like cheaters or people who don’t contribute their fair share. Social contracts are very important to humans.
The first thing that any education ought to give a man is character, and the second thing is education.
According to Einstein’s special relativity theory, time is a description of distance traveled.
This question gently shifts your focus from wherever you are to self-love.
“It costs nothing to ask wise advice from a good friend.”
Three desires seem to be part of the nonconscious personality: the need for affiliation, power, or achievement.
The basic lesson of history is that humans are essentially what they have been all throughout history. He changes his habits, but not his instincts.
The less a buyer knows objectively about the quality of the products and prices in an assortment, the stronger the pull of the “magic of the middle” will be.
“My preconceptions about meditation were misconceptions.”
Do the behavior first and let the feelings follow.
When you take up another’s cross, you must be willing to sometimes get crushed by its weight.
The central thesis of this book is that human personality resides in two places: the adaptive nonconscious mind and in conscious construals of ourselves.
History is a combination of the crimes and absurdities of humankind and the parting contributions. This enabled each generation to proceed with a greater heritage than the one before.
“Selling out is harder than it looks. Diluting your product to make it more commercial will just make people like it less.”
Seek out new ideas and try new things.
Appearances are deceitful, I know, but so long as they are, there’s nothing like having them deceive for us instead of against us.
“Be humble or get humbled,” Grandfather would say. “A knight is never so arrogant as to think he has nothing left to learn.”
The mind operates most efficiently by relegating a good deal of high-level mental processing to the nonconscious.
I learned that good advice is not expensive. It is quite affordable, if you can recognize its value.
Subliminal messages have little to no effect on consumer behavior when used in advertising.
Knowing the small details doesn't mean you comprehend the whole picture.
Brand Profit: Pay enough for your brand and you win because people know you. (Personal note: I hate this one.)
“If it is to your advantage, make a forward move. If not, stay where you are.”
Culture is transferred from person to person through language and imitation. Accurate imitation depends on our unique human ability to see the world from someone else’s vantage point.
“Most people don’t know why they’re doing what they’re doing. They imitate others, go with the flow, and follow paths without making their own. They spend decades in pursuit of something that someone convinced them they should want, without realizing that it won’t make them happy.”
If you develop a great working relationship with a particular restaurant, you can get a kickback, a private room, or a discount.
“After sitting for two hours your good cholesterol drops by 20 percent.”
If you want to truly master something, you must be willing to remain a beginner and look a fool. The beginner’s mind is required for learning anything new.
No idea can be any better than the action taken on it.
The present is merely the past rolled up into this present moment.
Dan Gilbert study: participants reported a wandering mind 48% of the time and “a wandering mind is an unhappy mind.” (Think about how different a wandering mind is from a mind in flow. And we know that flow is one of the most happy and fulfilling experiences we can have.)
Important point: you can never affirm a statement, merely confirm its rejection. There is a big difference between “this has never happened” and “this will ever happen.” You can say the first, but never truly confirm the second. It just takes one counter example to prove all previous observations wrong. We never know things for sure, only with varying degrees of certainty.
If people follow up with you after the dinner and say, “How can I repay you?” Or, “How can I give value back?” Then, take them up on the offer and ask for an introduction to one additional amazing person that would love to be at a future dinner.
Small changes in behavior can lead to small changes in your self-concept. And small changes in self-concept can make the next change easier.
Most investors are primarily oriented toward return, how much they can make, and pay little attention to risk, how much they can lose.
You need a deep why for doing stuff. With a why that is meaningful enough, you will do almost anything. (Think of Kristy exercising for the wedding.)
Increase your ability to earn. Improve your skills. As you perfect your craft, your ability to earn more increases.
On the suffering that often accompanies death: “With what strife and pains we come into the world we know not, but ’tis commonly no easy matter to get out of it.” -Sir Thomas Browne, Religio Medici
Question: how many organisms get selected for? In a given population, what are the odds of a particular set of traits living on and how robust are those odds? What percentage of genes remain during this process?
By pursuing things we believe to be important and breaking them down into their smallest parts, time slows and more is accomplished.
In a company where your peers decide who stays around, there is no room for people who don't pull their weight.
The moments when we don’t give a fuck and take action are often the moments that most define the course of our lives.
High risk, in other words, comes primarily with high prices.
Strategy 3: Let it ride. Make the default decision a better one. Rely on people to “opt out” rather than “opt in.” It’s the difference between requiring consent vs. assumed consent. Basically, people procrastinate on everything. In this way, you let people lock themselves into better behaviors. This is also a really compelling example of the fact that people aren’t paying attention. We live our lives with inattention and inertia.
Accepting trial and error means accepting error. And human brains don't seem to be very good at doing that.
IQ as a measure of intelligence sort of misses the point because intelligence is a collection of complex, multifaceted abilities not one general ability.
Much of what we want to know about ourselves resides outside of conscious awareness.
Neural Darwinism, Gerald Edelman's theory of consciousness, is essentially experiential natural selection. In other words, just as natural selection gradually leads the species in a particular direction so do our personal experiments and experiences lead us in a particular direction. We discover what we like, what we don't like, what works for us, how to walk, and so on through a series of experiences and experiments. It's like natural selection, but on an individual scale. It's natural selection in our own brains and lives.
The master of any game is generally the master of practice as well.
Most of what we fear is not useful and not real. When fear arises your job is to remind yourself of this. “Not useful. Not real. Continue on.”
There is no such thing as a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity.
Margaret Mead’s definition of culture: “The systematic body of learned behavior which is transmitted from parents to children.” This definition is correct about learned behaviors being passed down, but mistakenly assumes this process only occurs from parents to children.
Everyone says that health is really important but if you look at how people actually live they seem to believe the opposite.
Allostasis vs. homeostasis. In homeostasis, there is a single set point the body tries to maintain. In allostasis, there are upper and lower boundaries at the extremes, but the set point adjusts based on the needs of the situation.
A life with blindness is about a lot more than being blind, but when we imagine life as a blind person we tend to only think about seeing and forget all the other parts of life.
On the stupidity of judging people based on their intelligence: I learned to value people for their actions, rather than their thoughts.
When investors do not demand compensation for bearing illiquidity, they almost always come to regret it.
People have asked me thousands of times to name the most important aspect of pricing. I answer with one word: “value.”
There is no example in history of a society maintaining moral life among the masses without religion as a force for binding people together.
Don’t confuse letting go with going soft. Just because you’re aware of what is going on and being mindful about it does not mean you just let things go when you have the ability to take action on them and improve. The way to respond to adversity is often to work through it, not to avoid it altogether in the name of acting Zen.
Agriculture allowed food production per unit area to increase, which meant a given area could support a larger population. This allowed farming cultures to defeat hunter gatherer cultures by sheer force due to larger populations. This, in turn, led to the spread of more agricultural societies across the globe.
He is the definition of The Helsinki Bus Station Theory. So many of his acts started as something learned from a friend or adapted from a coworker. Eventually, he stayed on the bus long enough to transform what he learned into his own routine.
Laughter is the favorite weapon of the group. It is used by kids around the world to keep others in line with their expectations and norms.
The one physical feat where humans would outperform nearly all other animals of equal (or even larger) size is endurance running.
Epidemiology, ecology, and evolutionary biology are developing better methods for dealing with the confounding factors often present in natural experiments.
You must figure out the things that make profit and dump the things that don’t.
What goal would cause you to be obsessed?
Premium pricers have strong brands: One function of these strong brands is to transform a technological advantage—which is often temporary—into a long-lasting image advantage.
Keep a daily gratitude journal about your spouse. Write down one thing you are thankful for each day about your spouse then give them the book as a gift one year later.
Learning “how to think” really means learning how to exercise some control over how and what you think.
What we think is reality is merely just a version of reality. It's just our interpretation of the world. More in Chapter 3 of audiobook.
Freedom and equality are everlasting enemies. When one fails, the other dies.
For example, to a person driving a car, the objects in the car (his iPod or Big Gulp) appear to be motionless despite the fact that they are moving at the speed of the car. The objects are at rest with respect to the driver.
Many students block their imaginations because they're afraid of being unoriginal. They believe they know exactly hat originality is.
Your problems are not privileged in their severity or pain. You are not unique in your suffering.
Each of us has a vision of the ideal life we want to live. Living congruently with our ideal is how time slows down. Consequently, success is defined as living that ideal for the maximum amount of time. The sooner we get there, the longer we have to live.
For some reason, we are obsessed with achieving uniformly high standards in industry even though it is precisely the opposite (variation and selection) that got us this far in the first place. In fact, if, for example, every hospital did things the same way, we would struggle to improve because nobody would test new ideas.
Most people try to “squeeze meaning in around the edges” of their day rather than dedicating their work day to meaningful things. “Work for more than a living.”
People who spend money on experiences are happier than those who spend on material things.
“There is no tragedy so heartbreaking as introspection.”
An investor needs do very few things right as long as he avoids big mistakes. WARREN BUFFETT
The plateaus, the ups, and the downs are even greater in our relationships than in other areas of life. And you will discover that your greatest learning happens on the plateaus.
With most people happiness is something that is always just a day off. But I have made it a rule never to put off being happy till to-morrow.
No one person can become so well-informed in one lifetime to rethink and fully understand the customs and demands of the entire society.
Hardy recommends using a Seinfeld calendar for public accountability too. Hangout in the office, etc. so other people can see it.
The evolutionary mix of small steps and occasional wild gambles is the best possible way to search for solutions.
You can't control the outcome, but why wouldn't you want to try to control what you can? Even if the cards are stacked against you in life your best bet is to try your hardest.
Duchamp loved playing competitive chess. He enjoyed how clear cut it was. Unlike art, which always had reasoning and conclusions about a particular piece, chess was logical and clear. There was a winner and a loser. Duchamp thought the two opposing interests provided some balance to his life.
Of all the possible routes to investment profit, buying cheap is clearly the most reliable.
“Knowledge of our own mortality is the greatest gift God gives us.” It is so easy to exist rather than to live… Unless you know a clock is ticking.
The gap between what we know we should do and what we actually do is enormous.
JOEL GREENBLATT: The math behind the compounding of negative returns helps ensure this outcome (e.g., a 40 percent loss in one year requires a return of 67 percent to fully recover).
Food production was a key component in the determining the strength of a society. People sharing similar ancestors inhabited New Guinea and Indonesia, but the Indonesians were still hunter gatherers while the New Guineans had develop agriculture. When Austronesians invaded the region, Indonesians fell under their control, but New Guineas (with their food, germ resistance, and technologies) were able to resist.
Strategy 5: Reframe the choices. Consider if Petsmart asked customers to “donate to animal shelters” vs. “donate to save homeless pets.” It’s a small shift, but a big difference. Homeless pets is a very personal, emotional phrase and it leads to more action. Basically, this is just great copywriting. Word choice matters. This is especially big to consider when crafting behavior for businesses and governments.
The researcher / tourist study where a construction worker obscures the researcher with a door. We don't notice changes if we are not focused on an experience as it changes. In this case, we rely on our memories to remember and recognize a change, but our memories are quite faulty.
Rejection of alternatives liberates us. In a strange way, commitment to one thing offers more freedom than anything else because it relieves you of all the second guessing about what else is out there.
People should like something less when its price rises, but in investing they often like it more.
The fellow who can’t read human nature can’t manage it.
Only a fool would try to compress 100 centuries into 100 pages of conclusions. We proceed.
Use your mistakes to focus. They are an indicator of where to direct your energy.
So often, we hold beliefs so tightly we don’t even realize they can be questioned—arrogance, blind certainty, a closed-mindedness that’s like an imprisonment so complete that the prisoner doesn’t even know he’s locked up.
Any new philosophy, even if wrong in some respects, is good for creativity.
Failure is everywhere. Ten percent of American companies disappear every year.
Leveraging other people’s time, skills, and money is essential for getting where you want to go faster. You simply don’t have the time to do it all.
Great discussion of science in the last half of the epilogue.
“Work is a purpose, not a place.”
People will often fight over who gets to be responsible for successful and happiness. But taking responsibility for our problems is far more important because that’s where real learning comes from.
These assumptions about rationality and information first came into doubt through the work of Herbert A. Simon1 (Nobel Prize, 1978). In his view, people have only limited capacity to absorb and process information. For that reason, they do not strive to maximize their profit and their utility. Instead, they content themselves with a “satisfactory” outcome. He coined the term “satisficing” to describe this behavior.
Investors are frequently lured by the prospect of quick and easy gain and fall victim to the many fads of Wall Street.
De Facto Standard Profit: The more people who buy, the more valuable your become. Network effects drive your profit up.
Each baby learns how to walk and how to pick things up in their own way. We do not each follow the same motor patterns. Instead, we experiment with various motor patterns and, over the course of weeks and months, select the ones that work best for us. In this way and in many others, we make our own individual paths through life.
Every time we spend money, we make an indication about what we value.
Problems never stop. They merely get exchanged or upgraded.
10 Buddhist Principles for the Modern Worker: 1) Don’t be a jerk. 2) When necessary, hide the Zen. 3) Meditate. 4) The price of security is insecurity, until it’s not useful. 5) Equanimity is not the enemy of creativity. 6) Don’t force it. 7) Humility prevents humiliation. 8) Go easy with the internal cattle prod. 9) Non-attachment to results. 10) Ask, “What matters most?”
Many personality studies predict behavior only slightly better than chance.
If you desire to help you friend do not do so in a way that brings their burdens onto you. There are many ways to help people. You don’t have to choose the ways that restrict your time, money, energy, or ability to care for yourself.
A child’s goal is not to become a successful adult no more than a prisoner’s goal is to become a successful guard. A child’s goal is to be a successful child. Thus, the influence of peers is stronger than the influence of adults.
All tropical rainforests are within 10 degrees of latitude of the equator.
The environment is still the master of man and other species.
Imitation was one of the key steps in the evolution of humans. Imitation allows us to learn by example, which means we made the massive shift from Darwinian evolution (which takes millions of years) to cultural evolution (which can spread ideas and skills rapidly).
Fun idea: he wore the same shirt at all three of his children's births. “My birthing shirt.”
A thought loop is a pathway laid down by constant use. With enough time and intensity, if you repeat it again and again, you start to create a mental river that controls you. You believe it is automatic and the reality you live in, but really it is just a mental loop you have repeated too many times.
“If you've got your health, you can always make some money. But all the dough in the world can't buy back your health.”
